S.  HRG.  110–1198 

COMMUNICATIONS,  BROADBAND,  AND 
COMPETITIVENESS:  HOW  DOES  THE  U.S. 

MEASURE  UP? 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

APRIL  24,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

78–804 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 24, 2007  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Mefford, Brian R., President and CEO, Connected Nation, Inc. 

Drobot,  Dr.  Adam,  Chief  Technology  Officer  and  President,  Advanced  Tech-
nology Solutions, Telcordia Technologies; Advisor to the Board, Communica-
tions Research, Telecommunications Industry Association  ..............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Eisenach,  Jeffrey  A.,  Ph.D.,  Chairman,  Criterion  Economics;  Adjunct  Pro-
fessor, George Mason University School of Law  ................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
.........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Scott,  Ben,  Policy  Director,  Free  Press;  on  behalf  of  Free  Press,  Consumers 
Union, and Consumer Federation of America  ...................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Wallsten,  Ph.D.,  Scott,  Senior  Fellow  and  Director,  Communications  Policy 
Studies, The Progress & Freedom Foundation  ..................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Wolf,  Jack  Keil,  Stephen  O.  Rice  Professor,  University  of  California  at  San 
Diego; Vice President, Technology, QUALCOMM, Inc.; Member, Committee 
on  Telecommunications  Research  and  Development,  National  Research 
Council, The National Academies  .......................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
2 
1 
72 
45 
48 
43 
2 
51 

56 
60 

29 
32 
3 
6 

10 
12 

68 
70 

63 
64 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

COMMUNICATIONS,  BROADBAND,  AND 

COMPETITIVENESS:  HOW  DOES  THE  U.S. 

MEASURE  UP? 

TUESDAY,  APRIL  24,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:03  a.m.,  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The  CHAIRMAN.  This  morning,  the  Committee  will  examine  com-
munications,  broadband  and  competitiveness  and  we  look  forward 
to  hearing  from  the  witnesses  on  how  the  United  States  measures 
up. 

On this front, the news is not all good. Just yesterday, the Orga-
nization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development  reported  that 
the  United  States  had  fallen  to  15th  in  the  world  in  broadband 
penetration.  In  some  Asian  and  European  countries,  households 
have high-speed connections that are 20 times faster than ours for 
half  the  cost.  While  some  will  debate  what  in  fact  these  rankings 
measure,  one  thing  that  cannot  be  debated  is  the  fact  we  continue 
to fall further down the list. 

In the year 2000, the United States ranked fourth. Last year, we 
dropped  to  12  and  just  yesterday,  we  found  out  that  we  have 
slipped  further  to  15.  The  broadband  bottom  line  is  that  too  many 
of our international counterparts are passing us by and for this, we 
are  paying  a  price.  Some  experts  estimate  that  universal 
broadband  adoption  would  add  $500  billion  to  the  U.S.  economy 
and create more than a million new jobs. 

Compounding  the  situation  is  the  state  of  information  and  com-
munication  technology  and  research.  Today,  we  see  less  of  the  vi-
sionary  long  term  research  that  took  place  at  Bell  Labs  and  re-
sulted in the breakthrough technologies that made our communica-
tions  industry  the  envy  of  the  world  and  instead,  competition  has 
forced  companies  to  focus  on  research  tied  to  short  term  returns. 
While  this  strategy  may  be  good  for  the  bottom  line,  it  sacrifices 
any  chance  our  Nation  has  to  operate  the  test  bed  for  new  tech-
nologies  and  applications  that  will  be  developed  in  the  new  econ-
omy. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

2 

In a digital age, the world will not wait for us so it is imperative 
that we get our broadband house in order and our communications 
policy  right.  Part  of  the  process  of  getting  it  right  includes  having 
a firm understanding of the scope of our challenge. 

To  help  these  goals,  we  plan  to  introduce  two  bills  shortly.  First 
is  the  Broadband  Data  Improvement  Act  to  improve  broadband 
data collection at both the Federal and state levels. Second, the Ad-
vanced Information and Communications Technology Research Act, 
which will promote innovation and will improve our commitment to 
basic research on information and communications technology here 
in the United States. 

While  there  are  many  issues  on  telecommunications  policy  that 
divide  us,  it  is  my  hope  that  attention  to  these  discrete  issues, 
stronger  communications  research  and  more  useful  data  about 
broadband  can  receive  bipartisan  support.  And  on  that  note,  I’d 
like to recognize our Vice Chairman, Senator Stevens. 
STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I’m 
pleased that you are emphasizing broadband deployment as we did 
in the last Congress. Very clearly, this is something we have to ex-
plore.  I’m  hopeful  that  we  can  concentrate  not  only  on  the  areas 
that are on what we call the South 48 but also upon your state and 
mine  where  we  have  situations  where  some  portions  of  our  states 
can be reached only by satellite. I want to be sure that we include 
the  discussion  of  satellite  capabilities  in  these  hearings,  and  uni-
versal  service  is  an  important  component  of  the  total  discussion. 
I’m  encouraged.  We’ve  had  one  hearing  already  on  universal  serv-
ice reform. 

Another subject that has to be discussed in conjunction with this 
discussion  is  the  debate  on  the  Internet  Tax  Moratorium,  which 
will  expire  this  fall.  So  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  in  this 
area. It is a very difficult area, I think, for us to come to an agree-
ment on but I will do everything I can to work with you to get that 
agreement. Thank you. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  thank  you  very  much.  Now  I’ll  recognize  Sen-

ator Dorgan. 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much.  Let  me 
echo the comments of my colleague from Alaska. This is a very im-
portant issue and I’m pleased at the focus on it. I went back to my 
hometown  one  day,  a  town  of  300  people  and  knocked  on  the  door 
of my little boyhood home. I hadn’t been there for many, many dec-
ades  and  asked  the  woman  who  answered  the  door  if  I  could  walk 
in and see the house where I grew up. And on the porch where we 
used to butcher chickens every spring, instead of butchering chick-
ens, she was actually running a business on the Internet. She had 
little  bracelets  hanging  on  a  stanchion  and  a  camera  on  an  arm 
and  she  was  taking  a  picture  of  the  bracelet  and  I  said,  ‘‘what  are 
you  doing?’’  She  said,  ‘‘well,  I  sell  jewelry  on  the  Internet.’’  From 
a  little  town  of  300  people  in  my  little  home  where  I  grew  up,  she 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

3 

has  a  business  to  sell  jewelry  on  the  Internet  and  it  describes,  I 
think,  what  is  made  possible  by  all  of  this  everywhere,  anywhere 
if  you  have  good  bandwidth.  From  telemedicine  to  distance  learn-
ing  to  e-Commerce,  not  to  mention  the  unique  availability  of  con-
tent and information and news and entertainment. 

This is really important. But it’s really important that we do well 
in  this  area  and  you  know,  we  have  a  Federal  Communications 
Commission  that  considers  speeds  of  200  kilobytes  broadband 
speed.  Well,  of  course,  it  is  not  and  they  consider  areas  where  one 
person  in  an  entire  Zip  Code  having  broadband  means  that  whole 
area is being served and of course, it isn’t. So we rank well behind 
other  countries  in  penetration.  We  have  a  lot  of  challenges  here 
and  I  think  your  focus  by  putting  together  this  hearing  and  the 
focus that this Committee has previously put on this issue is really 
very important. 

This  will  require,  I  think,  an  aggressive  marketplace  and  also 
thoughtful  assistance  in  public  policy  to  get  right.  Mr.  Chairman, 
thank you. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  We  are  pleased  to  have 
two panels. Our first panel consists of the President and Chief Ex-
ecutive  Officer  of  ConnectKentucky  and  Connected  Nation,  Incor-
porated, Mr. Brian Mefford. Then the Policy Director of Free Press, 
Mr. Ben Scott; and the Chairman of Criterion Economics, LLC and 
Adjunct  Professor  of  George  Mason  University  School  of  Law,  Dr. 
Jeffrey Eisenach. May I recognize Mr. Mefford. 

STATEMENT OF BRIAN R. MEFFORD, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

CONNECTED NATION, INC. 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  Sen-
ator  Dorgan,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  be  with  you  today. 
It  is  both  an  honor  and  a  privilege.  My  name,  as  you  said,  Mr. 
Chairman,  is  Brian  Mefford  and  I’m  the  President  and  CEO  of 
Connected  Nation,  a  national  nonprofit  that  has  been  working 
across  the  country  with  states  and  private  sector  providers  and 
technology companies to close the digital divide, of which you have 
just spoken. 

Connected  Nation  is  the  parent  company  of  ConnectKentucky, 
our  Kentucky-based  organization  that  has  served  as  the  dem-
onstration project of sorts for Connected Nation. It is the Kentucky 
story specifically that I’m here to share with you today. 

Three  years  ago,  Kentucky  faced  a  challenge  that  is  common  to 
all  states  in  the  country.  The  needs  of  the  day  called  for  applying 
technology to traditional and historic challenges such as healthcare 
and education and government service delivery. So we were talking 
and  strategizing  around  the  concepts  of  e-Government  and  tele-
medicine  and  virtual  education,  distance  education.  But  we  were 
struck  by  the  reality  of  the  situation  at  the  time  so  we  surveyed 
the  landscape  and  realized  that  it  was  the  basic  building  blocks, 
the foundation that was not in place in order for us to successfully 
execute  all  these  types  of  policies  and  these  types  of  applications. 
We  realized  that  not  only  did  Kentucky  not  have  those  basic 
building  blocks  in  place  but  relative  to  other  states,  the  Common-
wealth  was  literally  at  the  bottom  of  the  barrel  in  a  lot  of  in-
stances, according to a lot of indicators. So we decided that we first 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

4 

had  to  take  a  step  back  and  address  those  basic  building  blocks— 
broadband access, general technology literacy, the awareness of the 
importance  of  technology  at  the  most  grassroots  level  and  the  ac-
tual use of technology. 

So we determined to devise an extremely aggressive plan at that 
time  and  we  used  the  structure  of  a  public/private  partnership  to 
ensure that the strategies and our approach remain market-driven 
to  the  largest  degree  possible.  And  that  has  been  important  over 
the life of the project. 

We  worked  with  the  Kentucky  Governor,  Ernie  Fletcher,  to  de-
velop this plan and to execute this plan that was launched in Octo-
ber  2004  as  Kentucky’s  Prescription  for  Innovation.  It  was  a  plan 
that found immediate support from the legislature and was able to 
engage local communities from the very beginning. 

We  established  aggressive  goals  and  tactics  with  this  plan  that 
has proven to be comprehensive in nature and I’ll talk briefly about 
the  three  overriding  goals  of  the  plan  and  the  first  one  was  that 
we would have full broadband deployment everywhere in Kentucky 
by the end of 2007. 

Now, we realized that we first had to understand where we were 
and  so  we  evaluated  the  regulatory  landscape  at  the  time.  We 
began  a  series  of  in-depth  demand-side  studies,  surveying  con-
sumers,  surveying  businesses  on  how  they  use  technology,  why  or 
why do they not use technology and then we also looked at the sup-
ply side of the situation. 

So in your packets in front of you, you have an example of some 
of  the  maps,  which  are  also  displayed  here  on  the  easel  that  rep-
resent  an  inventory  of  where  broadband  is  available  across  all 
types  of  providers  in  Kentucky,  all  types  of  providers,  all  types  of 
different technologies and the important thing I can tell you about 
these  maps,  Mr.  Chairman,  is  that  they  allowed  us  to  do  the  in-
verse  analysis  and  to  look  at  the  unserved  areas  and  to  focus  our 
attention  on  how  to  address  those  unserved  areas  of  Kentucky, 
those areas that did not have broadband. 

Second,  we  decided  we  needed  to  dramatically  improve  tech-
nology  literacy  and  impact  computer  and  Internet  use  specifically. 
Third,  we  wanted  to  effect  a  localized  approach  and  so  we  said  we 
will  create  and  form  local  leadership  teams,  what  we  have  called 
e-Community  Leadership  Teams  in  each  of  Kentucky’s  120  coun-
ties.  The  bottom  line  is  we  wanted  a  comprehensive  approach  that 
accounts  for  both  supply  and  demand  realities  and  one  that  relies 
on  research  to  determine  where  we  were  at  the  start,  where  we 
needed to go and to track our progress along the way. 

I’m  glad  to  be  able  to  sit  here  with  you  today  and  report  very 
dramatic  and  positive  results  that  came  from  this  work  over  the 
past two and a half years. In terms of broadband availability, when 
we began, Kentucky was covered to the degree of about 60 percent 
of  households  were  able  to  access  broadband.  Today,  92  percent  of 
households  can  access  broadband  and  that  represents  roughly 
550,000 households over one and half million people roughly. 

We’re on track to reach that 100 percent goal by end of this year 
in  terms  of  broadband  coverage.  Broadband  use  at  home,  we’ve 
seen  a  73  percent  increase  and  that’s  a  data  point  that  to  me  is 
perhaps  as  significant  as  the  coverage  aspect  because  that’s  one  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

5 

those  indicators  where  Kentucky  ranked  near  last  in  terms  of 
household  use  and  so  our  growth  rate  in  broadband  use  has  actu-
ally  led  the  Nation  and  has  allowed  us  to  catch  up  with  at  least 
half the states in the country. 

PC  ownership,  computer  ownership  has  increased  by  20  percent 
over the last couple of years relative to a 4 percent growth rate na-
tionally.  We  have  those  e-Community  Leadership  Teams,  those 
grassroots  teams  working  on  planning  at  the  local  level  in  each  of 
our 120 counties. 

Private  telecom  investment  has  reached  an  unprecedented  level 
in  Kentucky  and  in  just  over  the  last  2  years,  we’ve  seen  at  least 
650  million  invested  from  the  private  sector,  which  is  a  level  un-
precedented in Kentucky. 

I  can  also  report  that  the  impact  in  Kentucky  has  been  even 
more  significant  than  the  outcomes.  So  before  we  began,  Kentucky 
was  plagued  by  what  was  termed  as  a  brain  drain  problem.  Our 
university  graduates  were  leaving  at  an  alarming  rate.  Today,  we 
can  report  that  graduates  are  staying  in  Kentucky  at  a  rate  of  86 
percent  of  the  total  and  that’s  relative  to  73  percent  when  we 
began. 

Today,  95  percent  of  Kentucky  natives  who  graduate  from  uni-
versities  and  colleges  are  remaining  in  Kentucky.  Our  Ph.D.  can-
didates who finish their programs, the rate that they are remaining 
in  Kentucky  has  nearly  doubled,  up  from  27  percent  to  52  percent 
today. 

The reasons why are manyfold but certainly we can directly cor-
relate  the  job  growth  that  has  occurred  in  Kentucky  over  the  past 
2  years  and  in  that  timeframe,  14,500  new  technology  jobs  have 
been  created  in  Kentucky.  In  the  IT  sector  alone,  in  the  past  2 
years,  Kentucky’s  growth  rate  for  jobs  has  been  31  times  the  na-
tional  growth  rate  in  the  IT  sector.  So  that’s  actually  a  reversal  of 
the  trends,  the  job  trends  prior  to  the  implementation  of  this  pro-
gram. 

In  summary,  Kentucky  as  a  microcosm,  has  demonstrated  the 
importance of the national broadband discussion and the relevance 
of technology to America’s ability to compete. Based on our experi-
ences in Kentucky, we know that technology diminishes the signifi-
cance of distance. 

In  the  past,  opportunities  to  thrive  have  depended  largely  on 
one’s  proximity  to  major  markets.  Technology  has  made  the  dis-
tance  factor  irrelevant.  In  other  words,  Mr.  Chairman,  with  the 
availability  of  cutting-edge  technology,  businesses  and  entre-
preneurs  can  thrive  just  as  well  in  rural  America  as  in  other 
places, such as Los Angeles and New York. Technology has become 
the  great  equalizer,  creating  opportunities,  fueling  better  edu-
cation,  higher  quality  healthcare  and  better  quality  of  life,  regard-
less  of  where  an  individual  or  community  happens  to  be  located. 
This  same  dynamic,  however,  represents  both  a  huge  opportunity 
and a major threat for the United States. Other countries have in-
vested in broadband and related technologies toward achieving uni-
versal  access  and  like  Kentucky,  they  have  managed  to  leapfrog 
their  previous  standings  and  to  become  a  competitive  force  in  the 
economy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

6 

It is the hope of Connected Nation that this Congress—that this 
Committee can call the country to arms on this issue by conveying 
the  sense  of  urgency  that  exists  for  action.  The  Nation  needs  a 
comprehensive approach that is good for markets and communities. 
No  doubt,  it  is  a  challenge  of  historic  proportion.  Just  as  previous 
times called for a national response to the need for railroads, high-
ways,  electricity  and  telephone  service,  the  broadband  challenge  of 
today calls for an aggressive and comprehensive response to ensure 
that  America  remains  the  dominant  leader  in  the  global  economy. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Mefford follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BRIAN R. MEFFORD, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

CONNECTED NATION, INC. 

Background 

Connected  Nation,  Inc.  is  a  national  non-profit  organization  known  for  its  ability 
to  close  the  digital  divide.  Through  its  partnerships,  programs,  and  policies  Con-
nected  Nation  makes  technology  work  for  previously  underserved  communities  and 
markets,  improving  community  life  and  economic  development  while  enhancing 
markets  for  technology  providers.  Connected  Nation’s  proven  methodologies  are  de-
livering  dramatic  results  that  translate  into  more  efficient  public  services  and  en-
hanced quality of life. Connected Nation’s work in Kentucky, ConnectKentucky, has 
been identified as a national model for the expansion of broadband. 

Connected Nation’s proven methodologies enable comprehensive technology expan-
sion  efforts  that  effectively  enhance  the  supply  of  available  broadband  while  dra-
matically increasing demand through state and local grass roots awareness/adoption 
campaigns.  Connected  Nation  specializes  in  increasing  technology  access  and  lit-
eracy  towards  greater  digital  inclusion  for  all.  This  technology  expansion  improves 
economic development, healthcare, education, and public safety; and provides a bet-
ter way of life for Americans. 

Charting  the  course  for  the  United  States’  technology-centric  future,  Connected 
Nation  creates  partnerships  between  the  public  and  private  sectors.  These  partner-
ships  encourage  cooperation  for  mutually  beneficial  purposes—making  the  cost  of 
technology  expansion  go  down  and  the  demand  for  technology  go  up.  Our  com-
prehensive  approach  to  technology  expansion  works  for  communities  and  markets. 

Research and Mapping 

Connected  Nation’s  broadband  inventory  maps  are  industry  leaders.  These  GIS 
maps  create  an  inventory  of  existing  broadband  services  based  on  provider  deploy-
ment  data.  This  analysis  effectively  helps  broadband  providers  to  more  effectively 
target their build out resources. Connected Nation’s market intelligence (maps, sur-
vey data and grassroots demand aggregation) benefits companies by causing the cost 
of doing business to go down and the ease of doing business to go up. 

This broadband inventory map is publicly available and based on provider deploy-

ment data. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
F
F
E
M
4
2
4

7 

Beyond accurately measuring the inventory of broadband services, Connected Na-
tion’s  research  measures  other  important  items  related  to  the  expansion  of 
broadband.  For  example,  What  are  the  consumer  barriers  to  broadband?  Or,  How 
do businesses use broadband? 

Based  on  these  findings,  programs  can  be  developed  that  encourage  digital  inclu-
sion.  For  example,  our  research  indicated  that  while  industry  assumed  that  the 
monthly fee was a primary barrier to the adoption of household broadband the lack 
of  a  computer  at  home  ranked  even  higher.  We  developed  No  Child  Left  Offline  as 
a  partnership  based  solution.  No  Child  Left  Offline  has  facilitated  cooperation 
among private partners, corporate foundations and state governments to place com-
puters and printers into the homes and schools of disadvantaged children. 
Connected Nation’s Impact 

Connected  Nation’s  model  is  based  in  a  simple  premise  that  technology  can  be 
good  for  communities  and  markets.  Comprehensively  engaging  both  supply  and  de-
mand  realities  is  the  best  plan  for  success.  The  results  from  ConnectKentucky  con-
firm the strength of Connected Nation’s model. 

Launched in 2004, Kentucky’s Prescription for Innovation is a comprehensive plan 
to  accelerate  technology  statewide,  particularly  in  the  areas  of  broadband  avail-
ability and computer literacy and use. ConnectKentucky is implementing this initia-
tive  which  maintains  four  key  objectives  for  impacting  statewide  technology-based 
economic development: 

• Full broadband deployment; 
• Dramatically  improved  use  of  computers  and  the  Internet  by  all  Kentuckians; 
• A  meaningful  online  presence  for  all  Kentucky  communities,  to  improve  citizen 
services and promote economic development through e-government, virtual edu-
cation, and online healthcare; and 

• Local  technology  leadership  teams  in  every  community  to  develop  and  imple-
ment technology growth strategies for local government, business and industry, 
education,  healthcare,  agriculture,  libraries,  tourism,  and  community-based  or-
ganizations. 

As  identified  by  the  Prescription  for  Innovation,  technology  can  dramatically  ex-
pand  economic  development  opportunities  and  improve  the  quality  of  life  for  Ken-
tuckians. With expanded technology, opportunities are within reach, such as: 

jobs to replace the decline of traditional manufacturing jobs; 

• Developing  a  competitive  economic  advantage  for  attracting  today’s  high-tech 
• Residing  in  one  of  Kentucky’s  rural  communities  and  succeeding  in  a  career 
• Better and less expensive healthcare; and 
• An  education  that  prepares  Kentucky’s  children  to  prosper  in  a  globally 

that formerly required moving to a major metropolitan area; 

networked world. 

To fully address each of these opportunities and to ensure that Kentucky provides 
an  increasingly  attractive  environment  for  technology  expansion,  ConnectKentucky 
employs a comprehensive approach that has been identified as a national leader and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
F
F
E
M
4
2
4

8 

a model program for the rest of the country to follow.1 Last year, ConnectKentucky 
received  the  U.S.  Economic  Development  Administration’s  2006  Excellence  in  Inno-
vation Award. 
What Is ConnectKentucky? 

life.  Through 

ConnectKentucky connects people to technology in world-altering ways: improving 
the lives of the formerly disconnected; renewing hope for previously withering rural 
communities; driving increases in the number of tech-intensive companies and jobs; 
and nurturing an environment for lifetime learning, improved healthcare, and supe-
rior  quality  of 
its  partnerships,  programs  and  policies 
ConnectKentucky  makes  technology  work  for  previously  underserved  communities 
and markets, improving community life and economic development while enhancing 
markets for technology providers. 

ConnectKentucky  works  with  supply  and  demand  realities  in  a  manner  that  re-
spects communities and gets results. ConnectKentucky is engaged with all 120 Ken-
tucky counties, local business and community leaders, and private sector technology 
companies  to  facilitate  comprehensive  technology  expansion  efforts  that  both  en-
hance  the  supply  of  broadband-related  technology  and  create  demand  by  catalyzing 
and delivering grassroots awareness, literacy and use of technology. 
Impact of ConnectKentucky 

Through  the  work  of  ConnectKentucky  and  its  partners,  Kentucky’s  Prescription 

for Innovation has led to the following successes during the last 2 years: 

by 4 percent; 

• Kentucky  is  recognized  as  the  national  leader  in  technology  acceleration  with 
the  Prescription  for  Innovation  repeatedly  acknowledged  as  the  national  model 
for states; 
• Broadband  availability  has  increased  from  60  percent  to  92  percent  of  house-
holds  able  to  subscribe,  representing  504,000  previously  unserved  households 
and more than 1.2 million residents that can now access broadband; 
• Broadband use at home has increased 73 percent, a rate that has led the nation; 
• Broadband use among Internet connected businesses rose from 65 percent to 85 
• Home  computer  ownership  grew  by  20  percent  while  the  national  average  rose 
• More  than  $650  million  in  private  capital  has  been  invested  in  Kentucky  (un-
• Nearly 2,000 home computers have been distributed to the homes of underprivi-
• eCommunity  Leadership  Teams  have  been  established  in  every  Kentucky  county 
• More  than  70  percent  of  Kentucky  counties  now  operate  or  are  in  the  process 
of  constructing  a  meaningful  web  presence  for  e-government  and  online  citizen 
services. Two years ago, only one-third of Kentucky counties had a website, and 
many of these were not functional; 
• 22,000,000+  positive  media  impressions  have  covered  Kentucky  technology 
• Kentucky  is  on  track  to  be  the  first  state  with  100  percent  broadband  coverage. 

leged Kentucky students through the No Child Left Offline program; 

creating grassroots technology growth plans across nine sectors; 

precedented); 

percent; 

growth; and 

ConnectKentucky’s Economic Impact: A Case Study 

At an increasing rate, companies are locating to Kentucky, entrepreneurs are de-
veloping  businesses  in  Kentucky,  and  jobs  are  growing  in  Kentucky  because  the 
Commonwealth now has the technology infrastructure and an increasing technology- 
savvy workforce to support business growth. On track to become the first state with 
100  percent  broadband  coverage  with  nation-leading  increases  in  broadband  use  at 
home and work. 

Over  the  last  2  years,  more  than  14,500  total  technology  jobs  have  been  created 
in Kentucky.2 The most appropriate place to isolate and measure the direct employ-

1 ConnectKentucky  has  been  cited  as  a  national  best  practice  by:  the  U.S.  Economic  Develop-
ment  Administration,  the  U.S.  Government  Accountability  Office  of  Congress,  the  White  House 
Office  of  Technology,  Federal  Communications  Commission,  Appalachian  Regional  Commission, 
USDA  Rural  Utilities  Service,  Congressional  Research  Service,  Center  for  Digital  Government, 
Southern  Growth  Policies  Board,  Communications  Workers  of  America,  Rural  Telecommuni-
cations Congress and numerous states across the Nation. 

2 Bureau  of  Labor  Statistics  (BLS)  for  the  2-year  period  beginning  January  2005  through  De-
cember 2006. Includes jobs created in the following NAICS sectors: information; finance; profes-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

9 

ment  impact  of  broadband  expansion  efforts  is  in  the  Information  Technology  (IT) 
sector.  During  the  same  2  year  period,  in  the  IT  sector  alone,  Kentucky  jobs  have 
grown  at  a  rate  31  times  the  national  growth  rate:  3.1  percent  for  Kentucky  versus 
0.1 percent nationally. 
Chart 1 
Kentucky Growth vs. National Growth in Information Technology Jobs 

During the first 2 years of the Prescription for Innovation, Kentucky IT jobs grew 

by 3.1 percent, outpacing national growth by 31 times. 

Connected Nation’s Kentucky engagement, ConnectKentucky, has been recognized 
as a national leader by: the U.S. Government Accountability Office of Congress, the 
White House Office of Technology, U.S. Economic Development Administration, Fed-
eral Communications Commission, Appalachian Regional Commission, USDA Rural 
Utilities  Service,  Congressional  Research  Service,  Center  for  Digital  Government, 
Southern  Growth  Policies  Board,  Communications  Workers  of  America,  Rural  Tele-
communications Congress and numerous states across the Nation. 
Reversing the ‘‘Brain Drain’’ in Kentucky 

The closing of the digital divide is already yielding dividends in the quality of life 
for  Kentuckians.  By  closing  the  digital  divide,  computer  literacy  has  increased,  the 
number of high tech jobs has increased, and Kentucky communities are enjoying the 
return  of  their  offspring.  Consider  these  developments  in  higher  education  related 
to  how  ConnectKentucky  has  helped  Kentucky  address  the  ‘‘brain  drain’’  challenge 
that all states face: 

work—a 17 percent increase since 2000. 

• Today,  86  percent  of  all  Kentucky  graduates  remain  in  Kentucky  to  live  and 
• Since  2000,  there  has  been  a  50  percent  increase  in  the  number  of  out-of-state 
• For  those  graduates  who  came  in  as  Kentucky  residents,  95  percent  of  them 
• The  percent  of  doctoral  degree  students  who  stay  in  Kentucky  has  nearly  dou-

students who remain in Kentucky. 

now stay. 

bled (27 percent to 52 percent). 

sional,  science,  and  technical;  management;  and  healthcare.  These  sectors  are  comprised  pri-
marily  of  high  tech  jobs  and  all  jobs  within  these  sectors  are  ‘‘technology  based’’.  Other  sectors 
include additional technology jobs; however, these jobs are aggregated with other nontechnology 
jobs,  such  as  in  the  manufacturing  sector.  As  BLS  does  not  disaggregate  these  jobs,  they  could 
not be included in the figure above, which results in an understatement in the reporting of tech-
nology jobs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
F
F
E
M
4
2
4

Connected Nation’s Legislative Agenda 

10 

Connected Nation provides the leadership that delivers technology for strong com-
munities  and  open  markets.  Our  work  is  predicated  on  the  notion  that  there’s  no 
reason  for  anyone  in  America  to  be  on  the  wrong  side  of  the  digital  divide.  Here’s 
why: 

like ConnectKentucky. 

• Connected Nation’s work has proven to be effective in state based engagements 
• Each state has underserved communities that desperately need access to afford-
• National  public  and  private  entities  are  looking  for  a  means  of  cooperating  for 

able and dependable broadband. 

our greater national good. 

Therefore, Connected Nation encourages legislation that bridges the digital divide 

Connected  Nation  advocates  a  national  legislative  agenda  that  accomplishes  the 

for all of America. 

following: 

by encouraging and funding public-private partnerships at a state level; 

• Provides  solution  for  ubiquitous  broadband  deployment  and  increased  adoption 
• Establishes  a  grant  program  to  enable  each  state  to  develop  a  comprehensive 
approach  to  broadband  deployment  while  simultaneously  driving  broadband 
adoption and technology development at a local community level; 
• Allows  nonprofit  organizations  that  have  established  a  partnership  with  state 

government to apply for funding to: 
» Identify  and  map  the  gaps  in  broadband  service—those  areas  without 
broadband  availability—and  then  work  collaboratively  with  all  providers  to 
fill  those  gaps  in  a  manner  that  supports  their  business  plans  and  works  for 
communities; 

» Measure and track broadband and information technology use among citizens 
and  businesses,  investigate  barriers  to  adoption  at  a  local  level,  and  provide 
market analysis for unserved areas; 

» Develop  local  technology  planning  teams  with  members  representing  a  cross 
section  of  the  community,  including  business,  telecommunication  labor,  K–12 
education,  health  care,  libraries,  higher  education,  community-based  organi-
zations, local government, tourism, parks and recreation, and agriculture; 

» Equip  and  facilitate  local  technology  planning  teams  with  the  tools  and  re-

sources to improve technology use within each sector; and 

» Establish effective programs to improve computer use and Internet access for 

disenfranchised populations. 

This public-private partnership approach establishes the collaborative environment 
that encourages investment, drives technology adoption, and empowers grassroots-led 
community development and ultimately, strengthens America. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Mefford.  It’s  a  very 

impressive testimony. May I now recognize Mr. Ben Scott. 

STATEMENT  OF  BEN  SCOTT,  POLICY  DIRECTOR,  FREE  PRESS; 
ON  BEHALF  OF  FREE  PRESS,  CONSUMERS  UNION,  AND 
CONSUMER FEDERATION OF AMERICA 
Mr.  SCOTT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman  and 
Members  of  the  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  I 
am a consumer advocate from a public interest organization and I’d 
like  to  start  this  morning  with  a  quick  analysis  that  we  conducted 
of the five things that matter most to a broadband consumer. 

Number one is availability. Can I get broadband? Number two is 
competition, do I have choices? Number three is speed—is my con-
nection  fast  enough  to  run  the  applications  on  the  Internet  that  I 
like best? Number four is value—is the price affordable and reason-
able  for  what  I’m  getting  and  finally,  adoption.  Did  I  actually  buy 
the service? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

11 

In  each  case,  we  found  serious  problems.  Roughly  10  percent  of 
households  still  do  not  have  a  wireline  broadband  provider.  We 
found  the  market  is  not  competitive.  It  remains  a  rigid  duopoly  at 
the residential level and 96 percent of residential advanced service 
lines  are  either  cable  or  DSL  and  there  is  no  viable  third  tech-
nology that can compete head-to-head on price and speed. 

Broadband  capable  cell  phones,  like  BlackBerries  and  Trios, 
much  as  I  love  mine,  are  expensive.  They  are  slow  and  they  are 
seldom  used  as  substitutes  for  a  wireline  connection  at  home.  We 
would  be  wise  to  shelf  the  hype  on  this  point  about  wireless 
broadband  and  face  the  reality  that  it  is  not  yet  a  substitutable 
competitor.  Regrettably,  even  the  700  megahertz  auction  that  is 
currently  pending  at  the  FCC  appears  unlikely  to  realize  the  goal 
of a true wireless third pipe. 

We also found that over half of all broadband connections in the 
United  States  are  slower  than  2.5  megabytes  per  second,  at  best, 
1⁄10 the speed of those connections common in Europe and Asia and 
not  fast  enough  to  run  next-generation  applications.  Worse,  Amer-
ican  consumers  routinely  pay  between  $7.00  and  $10.00  a  mega-
byte. Compare that to the less than one dollar that the top nations 
in the world pay. 

In short, American consumers are paying more for less than our 
global  counterparts.  About  60  percent  of  Americans  are  not  yet 
broadband  subscribers,  either  because  it  isn’t  available,  it  isn’t  af-
fordable or it simply isn’t attractive enough for them to buy. 

Mr.  Chairman,  as  you  mentioned,  new  data  released  this  week 
by  the  OECD  shows  that  we  dropped  from  12th  to  15th  in  the 
OECD  nations.  This  is  down  from  4th  in  2001.  We’re  still,  in  my 
mind—our  growth  rate  between  2005  and  2006  puts  us  20  instead 
of 30. This isn’t just a matter of pride at stake. This is real money 
because  the  network  affects  the  economic  benefits  of  higher 
broadband  penetration,  which  accumulate  exponentially.  That 
means  that  even  a  small  increase  in  our  broadband  penetration 
rate  translates  into  billions  of  dollars  in  consumer  surplus.  While 
we aren’t capturing those dollars, somebody else is. 

Now,  defenders  of  the  status  quo  will  argue  that  America’s  poor 
performance  is  misleading  because  of  our  low  population  density 
and  there  is  a  certain  intuitive  logic  to  this.  But  when  you  look  at 
the  data  very  closely,  the  geographic  differences  between  countries 
don’t really explain our performance relative to our global counter-
parts. 

What  matters  much  more  is  household  income  and  poverty. 
Those  factors  swamp  geography  in  their  explanatory  value  in  the 
models.  In  the  aggregate,  it’s  not  that  broadband  isn’t  available  to 
most Americans—we’re just not buying it. In other words, we need 
more competitive, affordable services with more attractive features 
to make it worth a family’s hard-earned dollars. 

So  how  do  we  fix  these  problems?  I  think  we  need  a  bold  vision 
for  a  national  broadband  policy.  To  begin,  I  couldn’t  agree  more 
with  Mr.  Mefford—we  need  better  data  from  the  FCC.  We  need  to 
find  the  unserved  areas  in  this  country  on  a  block  by  block  basis, 
not  on  a  Zip  Code  basis  and  we  also  need  to  measure  price  and 
speed to monitor the progress of competition. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

12 

We  also  need  to  study  the  traffic  on  the  Internet.  Currently,  not 
a  single  data  link  on  the  Internet  backbones  are  available  for  re-
searchers  to  study  the  problems  of  cyber  security,  privacy,  spam 
and  congestion.  Further,  I  think  we  need  to  invest  in  programs 
that bring equipment and training to under-served communities so 
that  it  makes  sense  to  connect  to  the  Internet.  If  you  don’t  have 
a computer, broadband connection doesn’t do you much good. 

Above  all,  we  need  competition  policy  to  drive  down  prices.  We 
need competition policy to accelerate speeds and deliver a more at-
tractive product to consumers. Up to now, we have bet the farm on 
competition between technologies like DSL and cable. It just hasn’t 
worked out. We’ve only managed to more deeply entrench vertically 
integrated telephone and cable incumbents. 

By  contrast,  most  of  the  global  leaders  have  embraced  policies 
that bring competition not just between technologies but also with-
in  each  technology  platform.  We  must  seriously  consider  that  this 
combination is the key to regaining our stature as the world’s lead-
ing  technology  nation.  We  must  not  sacrifice  the  long-term  inter-
ests  of  the  country  for  the  short-term  interest  of  incumbents  that 
have long shielded themselves from an open market. 

In  the  short  term,  we  should  move  forward  on  a  variety  of  pro-
gressive policies, including the opening of TV white spaces for unli-
censed  wireless  use.  We  should  protect  the  rights  of  local  govern-
ment to offer broadband service. We should transition the universal 
service programs to broadband and we should safeguard the Inter-
net market for goods and services through net neutrality rules. Fi-
nally,  we  should  explore  opening  our  networks  to  unleash  more 
competitive market forces. 

In  my  view,  this  is  a  paradigm  shifting  moment  for  American 
telecommunications. It is imperative that we choose wisely and we 
as  consumer  advocates,  look  forward  to  working  with  this  Com-
mittee  on  your  legislative  agenda.  I  thank  you  for  your  time  and 
attention and I do look forward to your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Scott follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BEN SCOTT, POLICY DIRECTOR, FREE PRESS, ON BEHALF 

OF FREE PRESS, CONSUMERS UNION, AND CONSUMER FEDERATION OF AMERICA 

Summary 

Free  Press,1 Consumers  Union,2 and  Consumer  Federation  of  America 3 appre-
ciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  broadband  competitiveness.  As  consumer  advo-
cates,  we  strongly  support  policies  that  will  bring  more  broadband  competition  to 
American  households.  The  current  broadband  problems  we  face  are  severe  and  the 

1 Free  Press  is  a  national,  nonpartisan  organization  with  over  350,000  members  working  to 

increase informed public participation in media and communications policy debates. 

2 Consumers Union is a nonprofit membership organization chartered in 1936 under the laws 
of  the  state  of  New  York  to  provide  consumers  with  information,  education  and  counsel  about 
goods,  services,  health  and  personal  finance,  and  to  initiate  and  cooperate  with  individual  and 
group efforts to maintain and enhance the quality of life for consumers. Consumers Union’s in-
come  is  solely  derived  from  the  sale  of  Consumer  Reports,  its  other  publications  and  from  non-
commercial  contributions,  grants  and  fees.  In  addition  to  reports  on  Consumers  Union’s  own 
product  testing,  Consumer  Reports  with  more  than  5  million  paid  circulation,  regularly,  carries 
articles on health, product safety, marketplace economics and legislative, judicial and regulatory 
actions which affect consumer welfare. Consumers Union’s publications carry no advertising and 
receive no commercial support. 

3 The Consumer Federation of America is the Nation’s largest consumer advocacy group, com-
posed  of  over  280  state  and  local  affiliates  representing  consumer,  senior  citizen,  low-income, 
labor,  farm,  public  power  and  cooperative  organizations,  with  more  than  50  million  individual 
members. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

13 

consequences of resting on the status quo unacceptable. Recent broadband policy at 
the  FCC  has  not  embraced  a  free  market  approach  to  enabling  competition,  but 
rather  supported  the  entrenched  incumbency  of  a  rigid  duopoly.  Going  forward,  we 
must break out of this box and reassert the principles of public interest communica-
tions  policy  enshrined  in  the  Communications  Act—to  bring  essential  communica-
tions services at affordable rates to all Americans. 

We  recommend  this  Committee  undertake  a  sweeping  inquiry  into  a  variety  of 
broadband  policy  options  and  begin  moving  toward  a  comprehensive  national 
broadband policy. Step one in this process will be a thorough confrontation with the 
problems  in  the  current  broadband  market.  It  is  important  that  we  set  aside  the 
myths  and  excuses  we  have  used  to  justify  our  broadband  troubles  up  to  now.  The 
reality  is  that  the  U.S.  broadband  market  has  significant  failures  in  the  three 
metrics that matter most: availability, speed, and value (cost per unit of speed). De-
spite  years  of  promoting  universal  availability,  there  are  still  roughly  10  percent  of 
American  households  that  lack  a  terrestrial  broadband  provider.  We  pay  more  for 
a lot less bandwidth than our global competitors. Finally, we do not have a competi-
tive  market  that  is  pushing  speeds  up  and  prices  down  at  a  rate  sufficient  to  raise 
our  stature  relative  to  the  rest  of  the  world.  In  a  study  released  this  week  by  the 
Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development,  the  U.S.  has  dropped 
from  12th  to  15th  in  broadband  penetration  among  the  30  member  nations  in  the 
last  6  months.  Our  growth  rate  relative  to  the  other  OECD  nations  over  the  past 
year ranks at 24th place. 

Tackling  these  challenges  will  take  bold,  aspirational  leadership.  To  begin,  we 
need to improve the depth and breadth of the data the FCC collects from broadband 
providers  so  that  we  better  understand  our  problems  and  our  progress.  We  must 
then  undertake  a  variety  of  policy  initiatives  to  bring  competition  to  the  market-
place including: ensuring spectrum auctions produce real competitors not vertical in-
tegration;  opening  the  TV  white  spaces  for  unlicensed  use;  protecting  the  rights  of 
local  governments  to  offer  broadband  services;  guaranteeing  the  interconnection  of 
networks  on  nondiscriminatory  terms;  transitioning  USF  programs  to  broadband; 
safeguarding the Internet’s free market for goods, services and speech through net-
work neutrality rules; and investing in programs that bring equipment and training 
to underserved communities. 

We  rely  on  the  market  forces  of  a  duopoly  to  produce  robust  cross-platform  com-
petition  at  our  peril.  When  the  chief  supporters  of  the  status  quo,  wait-and-see  ap-
proach  to  the  arrival  of  a  third  competitor  to  DSL  and  cable  are  the  incumbents 
themselves,  we  should  understand  that  they  do  not  expect  it  will  happen.  Further, 
we can see that most of the global leaders in broadband performance have embraced 
so-called  ‘‘open  access’’  network  rules,  policies  that  bring  competition  both  between 
and within technology platforms. This combination of ‘‘intermodal’’ and ‘‘intramodal’’ 
competition  is  the  key  to  regaining  our  once-lofty  stature  as  the  world’s  technology 
leader.  We  must  not  sacrifice  the  long  term  economic  and  social  interests  of  the 
country for the short term interests of a duopoly marketplace that has long shielded 
itself  from  free  market  competition.  This  is  a  paradigm  shifting  moment  for  Amer-
ican  telecommunications.  It  is  imperative  that  we  choose  wisely.  We  look  forward 
to working with the Committee as it moves forward. 
Part I. What Is the ‘‘Broadband Problem’’? 

For many years now, the Congress has grappled with the policy challenges of real-
izing  universal,  affordable  access  to  high-speed  Internet  services.  The  facts  are  un-
ambiguous. A significant number of American households—around 10 percent—have 
no available terrestrial broadband service.1 A much larger percentage—over 40 per-
cent—have service available to them, but they do not subscribe, foregoing the social 
and  economic  benefits  of  connectivity  because  of  high  prices,  a  lack  of  equipment 
and  training,  or  simple  disinterest.2 Rural  areas  lag  behind  urban  areas  in 
broadband  access.  The  poorest  among  us  are  the  least  likely  to  gain  access  to  the 
technologies  that  could  lead  to  social  mobility.  The  cost  to  our  economy  and  the 
quality of life in our society mounts each successive year that these problems go un-
solved.  Meanwhile,  alarmingly,  the  U.S.  is  falling  behind  the  rest  of  the  world  in 
broadband  penetration  and  market  performance,  ceding  the  tremendous  benefits  of 
leading the world in network connectivity to others. 

Once called the digital divide, this policy issue is now often recognized by the sim-
ple  but  unenviable  moniker:  the  ‘‘broadband  problem.’’  Dozens  of  scholarly  articles 
and books about the subject have been written in an effort to clarify the stakes, the 
options, and the evidence in favor of one solution over another. It is one of the most 
important policy issues of our time. It would be impossible for us to provide in this 
setting  a  full  accounting  of  the  broadband  problem.  Instead,  we  will  offer  the  Com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

14 

mittee  a  discussion  and  recommendations  to  answer  two  central  questions:  what  is 
going wrong and what should be done about it. 

We  are  unique  among  the  world’s  leading  technology  nations—we  lack  a  com-
prehensive  national  broadband  policy.  There  is  no  time  like  the  present  to  remedy 
this  situation  by  applying  visionary  leadership  in  this  space  and  establishing  a 
broad set of policy initiatives to right the ship. 
Evaluating the U.S. Broadband Market 

For years now, the U.S. Government has set goals to realize universal, affordable 
broadband  service  for  the  country.  This  is  consistent  with  our  long  history  of  using 
policy to promote the expansion of essential communications services. In 1934, when 
the  Communications  Act  set  the  goal  for  communications  policy  ‘‘to  make  available 
to all people of the United States, a rapid, efficient, nationwide and world-wide wire 
and  radio  communications  service  with  adequate  facilities  at  reasonable  charges,’’ 
two-thirds  of  the  American  people  did  not  have  telephone  service.  It  was  this  for-
ward  looking  commitment,  sustained  over  decades,  which  gave  America  the  finest 
communications network in the world. 

The  President  called  for  us  to  reach  the  universal  broadband  milestone  by  this 
year.  There  is  now  no  chance  we  can  achieve  that  result.  While  it  is  true  that  the 
total number of broadband lines deployed in the U.S. is rising and the total number 
of  broadband  users  is  now  near  50  percent  of  the  country,  the  U.S.  growth  rate  in 
broadband penetration compared to other nations is not encouraging. Looking at the 
amount of growth in broadband penetration between December 2005 and December 
2006,  the  U.S.  is  ranked  24th  out  of  30  among  OECD  nations.3 Simply  put,  other 
nations  are  surpassing  us.  In  2004,  when  the  U.S.  was  ranked  10th  in  broadband 
adoption among industrialized nations, the President quipped, ‘‘Tenth is 10 spots too 
low,  as  far  as  I’m  concerned.’’ 4 Since  then,  study  after  study  evaluating  the 
broadband performance among the world’s leading nations has shown the steady de-
cline of the U.S. down the ranks. Though some have scrutinized the data from these 
studies  to  find  some  qualifications  to  ease  our  wounded  pride,  the  trend  lines  are 
not 
in  error.  We  trust  the  President’s  displeasure  has  grown  with  our 
underwhelming  performance  and  that  he  will  gladly  work  with  Congress  to  solve 
these problems as rapidly as possible. 

The  broadband  problem  is  most  commonly  assessed  through  a  raw  headcount  of 
households that have access to high-speed Internet service, what services are avail-
able, and how many consumers subscribe to those services. These are valuable data 
points that give us a picture of competition in the marketplace and consumer behav-
ior. Accordingly to the best available data: 

broadband adopters.5 

• Extrapolating  from  FCC  data,  nearly  60  percent  of  U.S.  homes  are  not 
• The  rate  of  residential  broadband  adoption  continues  to  slow.  From  June  2005 
to June 2006 the number of residential advanced service lines increased 34 per-
cent. But from June 2004 to June 2005 the increase was 62 percent.6 
• 37 percent of ZIP codes have one or less cable and/or DSL provider.7 Given that 
FCC  ZIP  code  data  overstates  the  level  of  broadband  deployment,  this  should 
be viewed as a conservative figure. 
• Some  states  have  large  gaps  in  coverage.  Over  40  percent  of  South  Dakota 
households  are  not  wired  for  cable  broadband.  Over  40  percent  of  New  Hamp-
shire and Vermont households are not wired for DSL.8 
• The  broadband  market  remains  a  duopoly.  96  percent  of  residential  advanced 
• There are no viable 3rd ‘‘pipe’’ competitors. 

services lines are either cable or DSL.9 

» From  June  2005  to  June  2006  there  were  only  637  new  broadband  over 
powerline  (BPL)  connections  added,  bringing  the  total  to  just  over  5,000  na-
tionwide, or 0.008 percent of all U.S. Broadband connections.10 

» From  December  2005  to  June  2006  the  number  of  advanced  service  satellite 

broadband connections DECREASED by 40 percent.11 

» Mobile  wireless  broadband  from  cellular  carriers  enjoyed  a  rapid  growth  rate 
in the last year. However, these connections remain slow and costly compared 
to wireline alternatives. They are not substitutable competitors with DSL and 
cable  modem,  but  rather  form  a  complementary  market  dominated  by 
vertically integrated firms with little incentive to cannibalize wireline market 
share. (See below for analysis). 

This  record  of  performance  has  not  positioned  us  well  in  the  race  for  global  com-
petitiveness—with all of the economic and social benefits at stake. According to the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

15 

OECD,  the  U.S.  is  15th  among  the  30  member  nations  in  broadband  penetration, 
lagging  behind  the  acknowledged  world  leaders,  the  Netherlands  and  South  Korea, 
but  also  Canada  and  all  of  Scandinavia.12 The  ITU,  evaluating  a  larger  number  of 
countries  than  the  OECD,  places  the  U.S.  at  16th.13 A  separate  ITU  study  meas-
uring a variety of factors in the Digital Opportunity Index, places the U.S. at 21st.14 
This is a particularly valuable analysis because it explores eleven different variables 
of technology development to assess each country in the study including the propor-
tion  of  households  with  telephones,  mobile  telephones,  computers,  and  Internet  ac-
cess; the rates of connectivity to the communications infrastructure; and the cost of 
connectivity relative to per capita income. Notably, the U.S. dropped from 8th place 
in the Digital Opportunity Index in 2000 to 21st place by 2005. We are ranked 36th 
relative to other nations in the increase in the absolute value of our Digital Oppor-
tunity Index score between 2000 and 2005. 

It is critical to recognize that our evaluation of the health of the broadband mar-
ket must not end with a calculation of the available services, platform market share, 
and  subscribership.  There  are  three  key  metrics  for  understanding  the  broadband 
problem: availability, speed, and value (cost per unit of speed). In crafting a national 
broadband policy, we must recognize that true marketplace competition is the touch-
stone  that  yields  marked  improvements  in  all  three  metrics.  Though  the  sizable 
service  gaps  that  leave  rural  America  without  a  viable  broadband  connection  are  a 
huge  problem,  this  is  likely  the  easiest  issue  to  resolve.  Far  more  challenging  are 
the starkly unfavorable comparisons in speed and value which separate us from the 
world  leaders  in  broadband.  These  data-points  suggest  that  we  have  a  long  way  to 
go  to  catch  up  with  the  rest  of  the  world,  even  if  we  manage  to  reach  the  goal  of 
universal availability.15 

• According  to  Takashi  Ebihara,  Senior  Director  of  the  Corporate  Strategy  De-
partment  at  NTT  East  Corp,  Americans  pay  7  times  as  much  on  a  cost-per- 
megabit basis for bandwidth compared to the Japanese—$.70 versus $4.90.16 
• According  to  the  OECD,  Subscribers  in  Japan,  Sweden,  Korea,  Finland  and 

France pay the least per Megabit per second (Mbps) of connectivity 
» Japan: $0.22 
» Sweden: $0.35 
» South Korea: $0.42 
» Finland: $0.59 
» France: $0.82 
» In  the  U.S.  a  3  Mbps  DSL  line  retails  for  about  $30,  or  $10  per  Mbps,  while 

a 6 Mbps cable line sells for about $45, or $7.50 per Mbps. 

• A 50 mbps connection in Japan costs $30 per month. Such speeds are not even 
available in the U.S. American customers can expect to pay $20–$30 per month 
for  (at  best)  3  mbps  of  DSL  connectivity  or  between  $40–$50  per  month  for  4– 
8 mbps of cable modem connectivity. Not only do American consumers settle for 
less, we often pay more for it.17 
• A  French  company  offers  the  ‘‘triple  play’’—50  mbps  of  symmetrical  broadband 
service, unlimited telephony and cable television—for 30 euros per months. Nei-
ther  this  level  of  service  nor  this  price  point  is  available  in  the  U.S.  by  a  wide 
margin.18 
• The proportion of slow connections is on the rise. In December 2005, 15 percent 
of broadband lines had upload speeds slower than 200 kbps. By June 2006 this 
had  increased  to  22  percent  of  lines.  The  proportion  of  DSL  lines  that  had 
upload  speeds  slower  than  200  kbps  increased  over  the  12/06–6/06  time  period 
from 18.4 percent and 18.9 percent.19 
• Over half of all broadband connections in the U.S. are slower than 2.5 Mbps.20 
• Prices aren’t dropping. Pew data 21 showed a year-to-year increase for cable, and 
a  slight  decrease  for  DSL—but  the  bulk  of  that  is  due  to  low-intro  slow-speed 
teaser rates. Yes, broadband speeds are slowly increasing, but we would expect 
a competitive broadband market to yield BOTH quality increases and price cuts. 
The consequences of lagging performance are severe. Thomas Bleha, in his widely 

read 2005 article describes the situation so aptly it is worth quoting at length: 

In  2001,  Robert  Crandall,  an  economist  at  the  Brookings  Institution,  and 
Charles Jackson, a telecommunications consultant, estimated that ‘‘widespread’’ 
adoption  of  basic  broadband  in  the  United  States  could  add  $500  billion  to  the 
U.S.  economy  and  produce  1.2  million  new  jobs.  But  Washington  never  pro-
moted such a policy. Last year, another Brookings economist, Charles Ferguson, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

16 

argued  that  perhaps  as  much  as  $1  trillion  might  be  lost  over  the  next  decade 
due  to  present  constraints  on  broadband  development.  These  losses,  moreover, 
are  only  the  economic  costs  of  the  United  States’  indirection.  They  do  not  take 
into  account  the  work  that  could  have  been  done  through  telecommuting,  the 
medical  care  or  interactive  long-distance  education  that  might  have  been  pro-
vided in remote areas, and unexploited entertainment possibilities. 
The large broadband-user markets of Northeast Asia will attract the innovation 
the  United  States  once  enjoyed.  Asians  will  have  the  first  crack  at  developing 
the  new  commercial  applications,  products,  services,  and  content  of  the  high- 
speed-broadband era. Although many large U.S. firms, such as Cisco, IBM, and 
Microsoft,  are  closely  following  developments  overseas  and  are  unlikely  to  be 
left  behind,  the  United  States’  medium-sized  and  smaller  firms,  which  tend  to 
foster the most innovation, may well be. 
The Japanese and the South Koreans will also be the first to enjoy the quality- 
of-life benefits that the high-speed-broadband era will bring. These will include 
not  only  Internet  telephones  and  videophones,  but  also  easy  teleconferencing, 
practical telecommuting, remote diagnosis and medical services, interactive dis-
tance education, rich multimedia entertainment, digitally controlled home appli-
ances, and much more.22 

The Elusive Third Pipe—Why Wireless Won’t Save Us 

To  the  extent  that  U.S.  broadband  policy  has  been  guided  by  any  logic,  it  is  the 
argument  that  intermodal  or  cross-platform  competition  will  be  the  savior  of  na-
tional  broadband  performance  in  the  marketplace.  While  much  of  the  rest  of  the 
world  has  opened  up  vigorous  competition  within  platforms,  we  have  staked  our 
broadband future on competition between platforms. So far, it has not worked out— 
the  U.S.  broadband  market  has  long  been  a  rigid  duopoly  that  shows  few  signs  of 
weakening. 

The  lack  of  price  competition  between  DSL  and  cable  modem  is  apparent  in  the 
marketplace.  Cable  operators  have  made  no  attempt  to  match  DSL  on  price. 
Comcast  CEO  Brian  Roberts  poured  cold  water  on  the  idea  that  he  is  concerned 
about  introductory  price  cuts  in  DSL.  ‘‘We  continue  to  believe  and  continue  to 
charge  for  our  services  a  rate  that  we  think  is  a  great  value  because  the  product 
is  so  much  better.  When  Hyundai  cuts  their  prices,  BMW  isn’t  exactly  upset  about 
it.’’ 23 Though  they  have  ticked  off  consumers  who  want  higher  speeds,  they  pri-
marily  rely  on  bundled  services  to  hold  customers.  The  DSL  operators  have  aimed 
their  marketing  strategy  at  transitioning  dial-up  customers  with  introductory  rates 
to  low-end  DSL.  However,  this  practice  is  ebbing.  Recent  industry  analysis  shows 
that introductory DSL prices are rising; so are prices for bundled services. According 
to  a  recent  press  report,  Banc  of  America  analyst  David  W.  Barden  noted  that  ‘‘a 
duopoly  is  emerging  where  cable  and  phone  companies  can  avoid  provoking  price 
cuts  in  their  core  services.  Carriers,  for  instance,  can  discount  DSL  service  while 
keeping prices up on phone service, and cable firms can drop prices for phone serv-
ice but maintain higher pay-TV rates.’’ 24 

The broadband problem in the U.S. flows from a simple policy mistake—a decision 
to rely upon a duopoly of telephone and cable companies to decide where and when 
to deploy this vital infrastructure with no overarching social responsibilities whatso-
ever.  They  have  slow  rolled  deployment,  kept  prices  far  above  those  in  other  na-
tions, and emphasized bundles of services targeted to upper income Americans built 
around ‘‘franchise’’ services. The results is restricted availability and a network that 
is intended to maximize short run profits, not the long run national interests of so-
cial welfare. 

Though  some  might  maintain  that  duopoly  competition  is  sufficient,  it  is  the  ex-
pectation  of  a  third  pipe  competitor  that  has  propped  up  the  logic  of  relying  on 
intermodal  competition  to  reach  our  policy  goals.  The  steady  promise  in  hearings 
such as this one over the last year or two has been that a viable wireless competitor 
is right around the corner. This hypothetical wireless competitor will throw open the 
gates  of  competition,  unleash  market  forces,  and  the  genius  of  the  invisible  hand 
will  drive  down  prices,  increase  innovation,  and  turn  the  U.S.  back  onto  the  path 
toward  regaining  global  leadership  in  broadband  technology.  Some  commentators 
claim that the wireless competitor has already arrived in the form of 3G mobile cel-
lular broadband. For example, Steve Largent, the President and CEO of CTIA made 
this comment before this Committee in May of 2006: ‘‘As we enter our third decade, 
the  wireless  industry  is  poised  to  enter  a  Wireless  Renaissance,  bringing  advanced 
services  like  wireless  Internet,  to  more  than  200  million  mobile  Americans.’’ 25 Re-
cent data from the FCC seem to support this point of view. Sixty percent of the in-
crease  in  broadband  connections  over  the  past  6  months  is  due  to  mobile  cellular 
wireless connections.26 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

17 

But  these  promising  statistics  are  only  promising  because  they  are  misleading. 
The FCC counts a broadband capable PDA subscriber exactly the same as a residen-
tial  DSL  or  cable  modem  subscriber  when  counting  broadband  connections.  The 
problem is that the wireless and wireline broadband products are in completely dif-
ferent  product  markets.  They  are  not  comparable  in  either  performance  or  price; 
they  are  not  substitutable  services;  and  they  are  certainly  not  direct  competitors. 
Though  no  precise  data  exists,  it  seems  obvious  that  the  overwhelming  majority  of 
subscribers to mobile broadband devices have not canceled their wireline broadband 
service  as  a  result.  The  wireless  product  is  a  complementary  product  for  which  the 
consumer pays extra. Most consumers do not use mobile wireless broadband on cell 
phones for the same purposes as a residential broadband connection. Consider these 
facts: 

• These  new  mobile  broadband  lines  are  for  the  most  part  mobile  devices  with 
a  data  service  capable  of  accessing  the  Internet  at  >200  kbps  speeds.  They  are 
highly  unlikely  to  be  used  as  a  primary  home  broadband  connection.  In  fact, 
89.5  percent  of  mobile  wireless  connections  are  business  subscribers,  not  resi-
dential subscribers.27 
• In  total,  17  percent  of  all  broadband  lines  counted  by  the  FCC  are  now  mobile 
wireless.  But  only  3.8  percent  of  advanced  service  lines  are  mobile  wireless 
(>200  kbps  in  both  directions),  and  only  2.5  percent  of  residential  advanced 
service  lines  are  mobile  wireless.28 What’s  more,  the  three  largest  mobile  data 
carriers  are  AT&T,  Verizon  and  Sprint.  Two  of  these  three  carriers  are  also 
ILECs, and are the number one (AT&T) and number three (Verizon) most sub-
scribed  to  broadband  Internet  service  providers,  and  are  the  top  2  DSL  pro-
viders  in  the  United  States.29 Sprint’s  joint  venture  with  cable  operators  also 
diminishes any potential role it could play as a third pipe. 
• It  is  important  to  note  that  the  multi-functionality  of  cellular  phones  with 
broadband  data  components  may  contribute  to  an  overstating  of  the  true  level 
of mobile broadband use. A provider of a DSL line only reports to the FCC the 
lines  that  are  actively  subscribed  to  (and  presumably  used).  However,  if  a  cel-
lular  customer’s  mobile  device  is  capable  of  data  transfers  at  >200  kbps,  then 
they  are  counted  as  a  broadband  line,  even  if  the  customer  rarely  uses  the  de-
vice for non-voice purposes. 
• Cellular  broadband  connections  are  duplicate  connections—that  is,  very  few 
people  subscribe  to  and  use  a  mobile  broadband  connection  as  their  home 
broadband  connection.  Furthermore,  mobile  wireless  connections  are  not  sub-
stitutes  for  cable  or  DSL  connections.  These  connections  are  slow,  have  strict 
bandwidth  caps,  and  other  restrictions,  such  as  users  not  being  allowed  to  use 
the connection for VoIP applications (Internet phone) and numerous other Inter-
net-based functionalities.30 

Appendix A gives the exact specifications of price, speed, and bandwidth limits of 
mobile  wireless  broadband  products  from  the  major  carriers—AT&T,  Verizon  and 
Sprint.  These  services,  while  valued  by  consumers,  are  not  competitors  to  wireline 
broadband  service.  They  have  not  brought  the  competition  necessary  to  drive  down 
prices  and  drive  up  speeds  in  the  overall  broadband  market.  It  would  be  unwise  to 
bet  that  they  will.  Vertically  integrated  carriers  that  dominate  the  wireline 
broadband  market  are  highly  unlikely  to  offer  a  wireless  broadband  product  that 
can  potentially  cannibalize  their  wireline  marketshare.  It  is  far  better  business  to 
offer a complementary service. 

If 3G mobile broadband won’t bring us competition, surely the auction of the 700 
MHz band will do so, right? Will 4G finally bring us the third pipe in this ‘‘Wireless 
Renaissance’’?  Not  likely.  The  DTV  transition  has  long  been  touted  as  the  moment 
when  wireless  broadband  will  come  into  its  own.  A  senior  executive  at  Motorola 
made  these  comments  in  July  of  2005:  ‘‘The  spectrum  that  will  be  made  available 
at  700  MHz  as  a  result  of  the  transition  to  digital  television  provides  a  unique  op-
portunity  to  provide  facilities-based  competitive  broadband  services.’’ 31 His  com-
ments  are  typical  of  the  hopes  many  have  expressed  to  this  Committee.  The  fre-
quencies vacated by the broadcasters in 2009 are up for auction early next year, and 
this  ‘‘beachfront  spectrum’’  is  thought  by  many  to  be  the  answer  to  our  broadband 
competition woes. 

To  be  sure,  the  700  MHz  auction  could  be  the  last,  best  chance  to  bring  a  third 
pipe to the market. It has been hailed as such by legislators, regulators, and indus-
try  leaders  alike.  Yet  the  favorites  to  win  this  auction  (the  major  cellular  carriers) 
really do not intend to deliver the third pipe. Further there are technical limitations 
that  come  with  the  proposed  structure  of  the  auction  that  would  make  it  very  dif-
ficult  for  any  licensee  to  produce  the  desired  outcome.  It  is  quite  a  striking  dis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

18 

connect. All of the rhetoric about this auction promises the inauguration of the elu-
sive  third  pipe  in  wireless  broadband.  But  none  of  the  facts  of  what  the  FCC  is 
doing will realize those lofty goals. Why is there such a divide between the rhetoric 
of  700  MHz  as  the  promised  land  of  the  third  pipe  and  the  reality  of  the  auction? 
First, there is nothing that says the winning bidders must use the frequencies to 
offer wireless broadband services that are true competitors to DSL and cable. Look-
ing at the likely winners of the auction, it is clear that a competitive market is the 
last thing on their minds. The incumbent carriers are thought by most odds-makers 
to be the most likely winners in this auction—just as they were in the last spectrum 
auction  for  Advanced  Wireless  Services  frequencies.  These  companies  are  the  Na-
tion’s  leading  providers  of  DSL  service.  Why  would  they  use  the  700  MHz  licenses 
to  offer  a  wireless  broadband  service  that  cannibalizes  their  own  market  share  in 
DSL?  The  answer  is  they  would  not—not  here  anymore  than  they  have  in  3G  cel-
lular broadband. They are far more likely to use this spectrum to offer new services 
which  consumers  will  buy  on  top  of  their  existing  wireline  voice  service,  wireline 
broadband service, and wireless voice service. This new service, 4G wireless, will be 
an enhanced mobile data service capable of delivering limited amounts of video and 
audio to a handheld device. This is not an unwelcome product, of course, but it will 
not  solve  the  broadband  problem;  it  will  not  bring  a  ‘‘third  pipe’’;  and  it  will  not 
bridge the digital divide to poor and rural communities. 

Second,  most  of  the  other  bidders  in  the  pool  will  be  looking  to  grab  spectrum  to 
fill  out  the  geographic  coverage  area  of  their  existing  cellular  networks.  This  will 
also  allow  them  to  compete,  to  some  degree,  with  AT&T  and  Verizon  Wireless,  the 
industry leaders. This is not an unwelcome development either, but by itself, it will 
not solve our broadband problem. 

Third,  none  of  the  spectrum  blocks  up  for  auction  are  large  enough  to  provide  a 
true  alternative  to  DSL  and  cable  modem  no  matter  the  intentions  of  the  bidders. 
The  largest  block  up  for  auction  is  10  MHz.  That  translates  into  about  15  mbps  of 
capacity spread over a cell sector. Depending on the density of users in that sector, 
the  actual  throughput  performance  experienced  by  a  customer  will  struggle  to  ex-
ceed 2 mbps on the download, and probably will be less.32 That’s not bad today, but 
down the line as DSL and cable providers eventually increase speeds to 5–10 mbps 
of  throughput  for  each  user,  that  wireless  service  will  not  be  a  true  competitor.  It 
will be a reasonable broadband experience for a wireless device used for limited ap-
plications,  but  it  will  not  be  a  substitute  for  a  residential  wireline  connection.  To 
have that, we would have to allocate at least 30 MHz to the task. 

Fourth, at present, none of the spectrum blocks up for auction are conditioned on 
‘‘open access’’ rules—though we have filed comments at the FCC asking for this and 
other  proposals  to  maximize  the  utility  of  the  auction.33 Why  are  these  important? 
Essentially, this is the only way to make a spectrum allocation into a truly competi-
tive market for connectivity to the Internet, software applications, and devices that 
attach  to  the  network.  Open  access  simply  means  that  the  licensee  sells  access  to 
the  network  on  a  wholesale  basis  at  commercial  rates.  Any  number  of  ISPs  that 
choose  may  come  and  buy  bandwidth  and  compete  for  customers.  Everyone  shares 
the same transmitter and connectivity; they compete on customer service and price. 
These networks are neutral in two important respects. First, bandwidth on this net-
work  is  available  to  any  ISP  on  nondiscriminatory  terms.  Everyone  pays  the  same 
rates  for  the  same  wholesale  products  to  compete  fairly  in  the  market.  Second,  the 
network  is  neutral  toward  the  devices  and  applications  running  on  the  network. 
Provided  they  do  not  harm  the  network,  any  innovative  piece  of  software  or  hard-
ware  a  company  can  dream  up  may  connect  to  the  network  and  sell  to  consumers. 
In turn, the broadband network provider is fully compensated for use of its network. 
This is the ultimate free market. 

Such  a  system  of  intramodal  competition  in  the  700  MHz  band  using  blocks  of 
spectrum large enough to compete with wireline products is the only chance to real-
ize the impact of the elusive third pipe. Few observers are optimistic enough to be-
lieve the FCC intends to go in this direction. If Congress is interested in preventing 
a serious disappointment and the loss of a golden opportunity to deliver broadband 
competition, intervention in this auction process is imperative. 
Myths, Excuses, and the Deplorable State of Broadband Data Collection 

A  former,  senior  FCC  official  once  quipped:  ‘‘you  can’t  manage  what  you  don’t 
measure.’’ By that standard, the FCC hasn’t been managing much of anything effec-
tively in the broadband market. For years now, analysts have been pointing out the 
poverty  of  the  data  collection  regime  used  by  the  Commission.34 The  GAO  did  a 
study  pointing  out  the  embarrassing  flaws  in  the  FCC’s  methodology,  showing  that 
FCC overstated broadband provider availability by 400 percent in some instances.35 
Finally,  the  FCC  seems  to  be  getting  the  message.  They  have  opened  a  Notice  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

Proposed Rule Making into the matter.36 Until such time as the Commission issues 
new rules, however, we are still suffering with a set of long standing problems: 

19 

• The FCC still uses an absurd standard of broadband, 200 kbps. This was barely 
fast  enough  to  have  a  tolerable  Internet  experience  in  1999,  but  in  2007  it  is 
too  low  to  enjoy  streaming  video,  flash  animation,  and  other  features  common 
to today’s Internet applications.37 

• The  FCC  still  uses  the  highly  discredited  metric  of  broadband  availability,  the 
ZIP  code  system  that  the  GAO  has  criticized  as  vastly  overstating  the  level  of 
availability and competition within the broadband market.38 

• Though there is a steady increase in number of providers in ZIP codes, the GAO 

report shows these numbers are inflated over 400 percent.39 

• The GAO put the median number of providers available to an individual family 
at 2, and determined that at 1 out of every 10 households had no access whatso-
ever.40 

• The ZIP code method misses micro gaps in service availability. If the data were 
collected  at  ZIP+4,  we  would  see  that  service  availability  varies  from  block  to 
block in many areas. 

• The  FCC  measures  only  1  of  the  3  major  indicators  of  broadband  performance: 
availability.  Price  and  speed  data,  critical  to  understanding  how  to  make  good 
policy, are simply unavailable. 

• The FCC erroneously treats wireless broadband service as a complete substitute 
for  wireline  broadband  service,  rather  than  as  a  more  expensive  and  feature- 
poor supplement. 

Associate Director John Horrigan at Pew Internet noted that a key problem with 
the  study  of  the  U.S.  broadband  market  ‘‘is  the  fact  that  there’s  not  good  data  in 
the  U.S.  on  connection  speed.  Yes,  people  are  adopting  broadband  at  a  good  clip  in 
the  U.S.,  but  we  don’t  know  how  fast  their  connections  are.  The  FCC  has  no  good 
data on network speed, and that’s not a question that you can reliably get by doing 
a telephone survey.’’ 41 

Another serious problem with the debate over the health of our broadband market 
has  been  the  red  herring  of  population  density.  Apologists  for  the  poor  U.S. 
broadband numbers are quick to attribute the low penetration level to this country’s 
relatively low population density. FCC Chairman Kevin Martin authored a piece in 
the Financial Times stating: ‘‘Given the geographic and demographic diversity of our 
nation,  the  U.S.  is  doing  exceptionally  well.  Comparing  some  of  the  ‘leading’  coun-
tries with areas of the U.S. that have comparable population density, we see similar 
penetration rates.’’ 42 

Martin blamed U.S. geography for our poor broadband performance, but the facts 
tell a different story. For the 30 nations of the OECD, population density is not sig-
nificantly correlated with broadband penetration. Indeed, one of the world’s leading 
broadband nations, Iceland, has one of the lowest population densities in the world. 
Furthermore,  5  of  the  14  countries  ahead  of  the  U.S.  in  the  OECD  broadband 
rankings have lower population densities than the U.S. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

20 

While  there  may  be  a  theoretical  reason  to  think  that  population  density  should 
be  correlated  with  broadband  penetration,  in  real  world  measurements  comparing 
performance at the national level that is not the case. What Martin is likely trying 
to  convey  is  the  phenomenon  of  ‘‘economies  of  density.’’  In  theory,  it  should  be  less 
costly  on  a  per-line  basis  to  deploy  broadband  to  an  area  that  is  highly  populated 
than  one  that  is  sparsely  populated—all  other  things  being  equal.  But  population 
density  is  not  the  relevant  metric  to  capture  this  phenomenon—as  people  tend  to 
cluster  in  cities,  regardless  of  the  overall  geographical  area  of  a  particular  country. 
The relevant metric is ‘‘urbanicity,’’ or the percentage of a nation’s population living 
in urban areas or clusters. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
T
T
O
C
S
4
2
4

s
p
e
.

1
T
T
O
C
S
4
2
4

21 

When  the  relationship  between  urbanicity  and  broadband  penetration  is  exam-
ined,  there’s  only  a  very  weak,  statistically  insignificant  correlation.  Countries  like 
the  Netherlands  and  Switzerland  have  lower  percentages  of  their  population  living 
in urban areas than the United States yet have higher broadband penetration rates. 
Similarly,  countries  like  New  Zealand  and  Germany  have  higher  percentages  of 
urban  population  than  the  United  States  but  lower  broadband  penetration  levels. 
In total, 8 of 14 countries ahead of the U.S. in the OECD broadband rankings have 
lower percentages of their population living in urban areas. 

In  short,  geographic  factors  alone  cannot  explain  why  the  United  States  lags  be-
hind. Factors like income, income distribution, public policy, and market competition 
play a far bigger role. 
Part II: Fixing the Broadband Problem 

The  first  step  is  establishing  a  serious  national  broadband  policy.  Currently,  we 
are  ‘‘the  only  industrialized  state  without  an  explicit  national  policy  for  promoting 
broadband.’’ 43 In  response  to  a  recent  request  to  compare  Japanese  and  American 
broadband policy, a Japanese telecom executive noted: ‘‘I don’t think at the moment, 
the United States has any national policy. The idea is, let the market do it.’’ 44 The 
key problem is that U.S. broadband policies have not even engaged the free market, 
choosing  instead  to  wait  for  the  elusive  intermodal  competition  to  come  along  and 
challenge  the  stagnant  duopoly  of  DSL  and  cable.  It  is  in  this  void  that  we  must 
reassert  the  commitment  to  a  ubiquitous,  affordable  21st  century  communications 
network  for  all  Americans.  The  framework  of  public-private  partnership  in  policy- 
making that characterized the technology boom of the 1990s worked because public 
policy guided the thrust of development. As Thomas Bleha describes it: ‘‘The private 
sector did the work, but the government offered a clear vision and strong leadership 
that  created  a  competitive  playing  field  for  early  broadband  providers.’’ 45 When  we 
talk about public private partnerships, we do not mean situations in which the pri-
vate  sector  profits  at  the  expense  of  the  public;  we  mean  partnerships  that  serve 
the  public  interest,  which  is  difficult  when  public  policy  is  not  clearly  articulated. 
The  national  broadband  policy  should  be  designed  around  aspirations  to  par-
ticular social and economic outcomes, not the business models of the incumbent tele-
communications  carriers.  We  need  to  identify  our  goals  and  work  backward  to  find 
the  right  policies.  We  suggest  goals  that  address  our  shortfalls  in  each  of  the  three 
major indices of broadband performance: availability, price, and value (cost per unit 
of speed). 

Goal #1—Establishing universal availability of broadband services 
Goal  #2—Bringing  competitive,  affordable  services  and  programs  to  stimulate 
adoption in undersubscribed areas 
Goal #3—Enhancing the speed, coverage, and reliability of communications net-
works  to  spawn  the  next  generation  applications  that  will  raise  the  social  and 
economic value of connectivity 

What would success look like? To regain global leadership in broadband and maxi-
mize  the  social  benefits  of  a  network  economy,  we  need  to  establish  a  framework 
that  supports  an  evolving  communications  infrastructure  that  will  ultimately  pro-
vide 100 megabits of symmetrical connectivity to every home in America in the next 
decade.  From  the  passage  of  the  Communications  Act  in  1934  to  the  Telecommuni-
cations Act in 1996, the American telephone network evolved through rapid techno-
logical  change  and  an  immense  expansion  of  service  and  services.  It  was  an  infra-
structure  built  with  private  capital  subject  to  public  obligations  and  oversight.  We 
must  certainly  adapt  to  the  more  dynamic  world  of  today,  but  we  are  suffering  be-
cause we have abandoned the key role of public policy. 

To achieve the goal, we will need vigorous, multi-modal competition—that is, com-
petition  between  delivery  platforms  (e.g.,  DSL,  cable,  and  wireless)  as  well  as  com-
petition  within  delivery  platforms.  We  cannot  and  should  not  bet  our  digital  future 
on  one  form  of  competition.  We  should  ensure  that  the  content/applications  market 
that  sits  adjacent  to  the  connectivity/access  market  also  retains  maximum  competi-
tiveness,  as  it  always  has,  by  precluding  market  power  in  network  ownership  from 
distorting the market for Internet content. This will maximize innovation in the con-
tent market and increase the likelihood that the next ‘‘killer application’’ will attract 
more  and  more  Americans  to  subscribe  to  a  network.  Indeed,  this  virtuous  cycle  of 
greater  demand  for  advanced  applications  leading  to  greater  uptake  of  broadband, 
leading  again  to  greater  demand  for  advanced  applications,  seems  to  be  completely 
missing in the FCC’s thinking. We should also invest in social programs that bring 
the equipment and training needed to help disadvantaged communities into a place 
where it makes sense to connect. So-called digital inclusion programs are often over-
looked in the consideration of the broadband future. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

22 

To  realize  these  goals,  we  will  need  to  establish  a  national  broadband  policy 
framework  that  is  comprehensive  and  aggressive  in  pursuit  of  market  competition 
and  advanced  network  capabilities.  Not  all  of  these  changes  will  be  supported  by 
the  incumbent  industries.  But  it  is  essential  that  we  recognize  that  the  short-term 
financial interests of dominant firms must not be permitted to overshadow the larg-
er national interest in charting a successful path for our digital future. 

Where should we start? 

Study the Problem—Improve Data Collection 

We should begin by addressing our data problems. We should conduct a broad in-
quiry into costs, feasibility, technologies, and deployment strategies that can be ini-
tiated  through  creative  policymaking.  To  do  this  effectively,  we  needed  better  data. 
We  need  to  know  at  a  granular  level—block  by  block—where  broadband  service  is 
available and where it is not. But we must go beyond that. We must collect informa-
tion about the price and speed of connections as well. We need to know about serv-
ice  agreements  as  well—early  termination  fees  in  long  term  contracts  and  other 
switching  costs  may  distort  our  understanding  of  the  real  levels  of  competition  in 
the  market.  Without  this  information,  we  cannot  quickly  identify  the  gaps  in  the 
service market and remedy market failures that hold prices high and service quality 
low. 

Programs  like  ConnectKentucky  represent  a  valuable  model  to  consider  for  Fed-
eral  policy—particularly  in  its  focus  on  working  with  local  communities.  But  the 
Federal  Communications  Commission  must  also  play  its  role  of  central  adminis-
trator—collecting  and  evaluating  the  massive  amounts  of  information  we  could  be 
using  to  make  broadband  policy.  Simple  changes  in  the  Section  706  requirements 
for  telecommunications  carrier  reporting  would  dramatically  clarify  the  picture  of 
what is happening in our broadband market. 

We  should  also  set  to  work  studying  the  cost  and  feasibility  of  broadband  tech-
nologies.  For  many  years,  it  has  been  the  stated  goal  of  the  U.S.  Government  to 
make  broadband  connections  universal.  Yet  we  do  not  have  reliable  cost  estimates 
for realizing that goal, much less have we compared the costs of deploying different 
technologies to accomplish the task. For years, we have heard that technologies like 
broadband  over  power  lines  and  satellite  wireless  broadband  were  inches  from 
transforming  the  marketplace.  Yet  we  did  not  study  these  issues  sufficiently  to  de-
termine that those estimates were overblown and unrealistic. A paucity of informa-
tion  has  led  us  to  false  expectations  and  delay,  distracting  from  the  need  to  seek 
out the necessary data points to make policy. 

Beyond  the  collection  of  market  data,  we  should  look  to  empower  the  research 
community  (both  government  and  university  led)  to  study  the  Internet.  It  is  hard 
to believe, but not a single data link on the privately-owned Internet backbone today 
is  available  for  study  by  researchers.  Our  understanding  of  the  flow  of  traffic  over 
the  network  is  very  limited  as  a  result.  Using  the  proper  safeguards  to  guarantee 
privacy and protect proprietary commercial information, we should empower the re-
search  community  to  study  the  problems  of  the  Internet  that  inhibit  our  progress, 
including  security  issues,  spam,  routing  tables,  peering,  packet  loss,  latency,  jitter, 
and a wide variety of topics that could benefit from the application of scientific scru-
tiny.  We  should  put  the  country’s  greatest  minds  to  work  on  these  problems  to  as-
sist  our  network  owners.  This  collaborative  model  of  research  and  production  has 
always  been  the  basis  of  technological  leaps  in  the  Internet  space.  At  present,  the 
only government programs looking into these matters are not driven by competition 
policy,  but  rather  by  national  security.  The  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s 
PREDICT program offers a useful model for this Committee to explore.46 

Possessing data about our own broadband market will be an enormous advantage, 
but  we  should  look  beyond  our  borders.  We  should  look  at  the  nations  that  have 
surpassed  us  in  the  creation  of  competitive  broadband  networks  to  learn  which 
strategies  have  proven  successful  and  why.  There  has  been  no  serious  effort  to  do 
this  to  date.  Yet  the  research  is  being  done  in  our  universities.  Two  recent  studies 
have compared the policies that have shaped the U.S. broadband market with those 
in  Europe  and  South  Korea.  In  both  cases,  the  findings  show  that  the  root  cause 
of our problems is based in a lack of competition policy.47 

It  is  worth  dwelling  on  this  point.  The  policy  that  scholarship  indicates  is  the 
MOST  responsible  for  success  in  the  international  broadband  market—open  access 
to  network  infrastructure  for  intramodel  competitors—is  precisely  the  policy  that 
the U.S. has abandoned. Ironically, this policy was originally initiated in the FCC’s 
own  Computer  Inquiry  decisions  of  the  1970s  and  1980s,  which  allowed  Internet 
service  providers  to  purchase  underlying  telecom  inputs  on  a  nondiscriminatory 
basis. Many believe this ISP ‘‘open access’’ policy, along with the Carterphone prin-
ciples  of  the  1960s,  helped  pave  the  way  for  the  rise  and  enormous  success  of  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

23 

Internet. Later, the Telecommunications Act of 1996 briefly opened up the local net-
work  so  that  competing  carriers  could  use  the  local  loop  to  provide  DSL  and  other 
advanced  data  functionalities.  Unfortunately,  in  both  cases  these  pro-competitive 
precedents were eviscerated in subsequent legal and regulatory disputes, essentially 
because they were not in the short term financial interests of incumbents. Asia and 
Europe adopted and embraced open access—betting on the long-term benefits of the 
policy—and they have used it to leap-frog the U.S. in the race for global broadband 
supremacy.  Professor  Amit  Schejter’s  ground-breaking  analysis  of  this  dichotomy  is 
laid out in a working paper attached to this testimony. 

A similar analysis comparing U.S. and South Korean broadband policy also high-
lights  the  divergent  paths  on  open  access  rules  that  have  led  to  higher  and  lower 
barriers to entry (respectively) in the broadband market. The study concludes: 

The  sluggish  progress  of  intermodal  and  intramodal  market  competition  ex-
plains  a  part  of  the  sluggish  demand  in  the  residential  high  speed  Internet  ac-
cess market in the U.S., while the South Korean market was able to grow rap-
idly  due  to  fierce  competition  in  the  market,  mostly  facilitated  by  the  Korean 
government’s  open  access  rule  and  policy  choices  more  favorable  to  new  en-
trants  rather  than  to  the  incumbents.  Furthermore,  near  monopoly  control  of 
the residential communications infrastructure by cable operators and telephone 
companies  manifests  itself  as  relatively  high  pricing  and  lower  quality  in  the 
U.S.  The  more  favorable  terms  from  which  the  dominant  providers  have  bene-
fited, and government’s deregulation, may limit business opportunities for other 
Internet service providers.48 

Japan’s NTT East continues to make heavy investments in fiber-optics despite re-
quirements that it must share its network with competitors. When asked to explain 
why,  an  NTT  executive  cited  the  long  term  benefit  to  the  country.  ‘‘We  see  the  fu-
ture,  and  then  we  do  what  we  feel  is  right,’’  he  said.49 As  a  result  of  this  vision, 
Japan  (like  many  of  the  world’s  leading  broadband  nation)  has  multiple  wireline 
competitors  offering  broadband  in  each  market.  In  the  United  Kingdom,  BT  has 
agreed to a split between its retail and wholesale operations, which has both created 
intramodal  competition  over  BT’s  local  loops  and  led  to  greater  overall  investment 
in broadband facilities. The evidence is clear: the results of broader consumer choice 
are lower prices, higher speeds, and greater innovation. 

Professor  Schejter  points  out  that  the  U.S.  may  be  well  served  to  learn  from  the 
European and Asian examples: ‘‘Observing international broadband adoption trends 
and rates, one cannot fail to notice that while Europe is plunging ahead, with some 
countries leaving even Asian powerhouses behind, the United States, which was the 
original  leader  in  both  making  the  first  regulatory  moves  and  adopting  Internet 
technology,  is  slowly  falling  behind.  What  is  it  then  that  makes  Europe  different 
than  the  United  States,  and  what  can  the  United  States  learn  from  the  European 
experience in order to revive broadband penetration?’’ 50 
Enact Multi-Modal Competition Policy 

The  vision  for  our  national  broadband  policy  should  be  bold,  aspirational,  and 
comprehensive.  The  problems  in  the  marketplace  will  not  be  solved  by  tweaking 
around  the  edges;  nor  will  they  be  solved  by  enacting  policies  that  are  functionally 
subsidies  of  status  quo,  incumbent  business-models.  We  need  to  reject  the  conven-
tional  political  wisdom  of  complacent  incrementalism  and  embrace  a  policy  inquiry 
into  all  the  possible  options  for  putting  our  broadband  future  back  on  track.  Now 
is not the time to make artificial declarations that some ideas are off the table and 
narrowly focus on particular proposals. No one policy idea is the silver bullet. It will 
require many different initiatives aimed at different levels of the broadband market 
to accomplish our goals. In short, it must be ‘‘multi-modal’’—by which we mean that 
it  must  foster  competition  both  within  and  between  broadband  technology  markets. 
A useful way to categorize policy proposals is to group them according to the net-
work  layer  to  which  they  apply.  To  simplify  for  present  purposes,  the  broadband 
market  can  be  understood  as  two  separate  arenas:  (1)  a  physical  connection  to  the 
Internet  and  the  technologies  used  to  transmit  information  over  the  network;  and 
(2)  the  applications  and  content  delivered  via  that  Internet  connection  and  the  de-
vices used to receive them. We can and should target broadband policy in both lay-
ers  of  the  network  to  maximize  the  productivity  of  both  markets.  This  policy  has 
two  broad  components:  engendering  greater  competition  at  the  physical  layer,  and 
crafting  protective  safeguards  for  the  application  layer.  Though  each  of  these  pro-
posals deserves analysis and explanation, for the purposes of this testimony, we will 
simply list them out for discussion. This may serve as a consumer blueprint of ideas 
for a national broadband policy. We would encourage other stakeholders to offer the 
Committee similar, comprehensive proposals for consideration. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

24 

Policies for the Physical Layer 

The  physical  layer  is  not  just  wires  and  cables.  It  is  any  means  of  delivering  a 
broadband  connection  and  the  baseline  rules  and  consumer  protections  governing 
that delivery system. By extension, policies aimed at the physical layer include any 
effort to expand the reach, capacity, competitiveness or efficiency of these networks 
to  serve  residential  and  business  customers.  In  turn  these  networks  support  the 
spread of advanced Internet applications that can be accessed and used by all Amer-
icans. 

• Allocation  of  licensed  public  spectrum  aimed  at  creating  a  viable  wireless 
broadband  competitor—We  should  approach  policy  opportunities  like  the  auc-
tion  of  700  MHz  frequencies  with  the  goal  of  bringing  new  entrants  into  the 
market that are independent of wireline incumbents. 

• Expansion  of  unlicensed  public  spectrum—The  greatest  success  of  recent 
broadband  policies  is  WiFi,  or  unlicensed  spectrum.  We  should  expand  the 
availability of unlicensed spectrum into lower frequencies by opening up the un-
assigned  television  channels  (also  known  as  ‘‘white  spaces’’)  for  wireless 
broadband.  We  applaud  this  Committee  for  its  work  on  this  issue  and  rec-
ommend the Kerry-Smith bill for passage. 

• Reform and transition the Federal universal service programs from dial-tone to 
broadband—We  should  move  our  valuable  USF  programs  into  the  21st  century 
with  targeted  subsidies  and  accountability  benchmarks  to  support  broadband 
deployment in high-cost areas. 

• Reasonable  and  nondiscriminatory  interconnection  between  facilities-based  pro-
viders—Since  the  Internet  is  nothing  more  than  a  global  network  of  inter-
connected private and public networks, it is imperative that each interconnects 
with  one  another  to  maximize  the  efficiency  and  utility  of  the  overall  network. 
• Reintroduce intramodal competition into the broadband market—Though recent 
FCC decisions have moved away from this model of competition policy, it is im-
perative  that  it  is  not  abolished.  Intramodal  competition  through  open  access 
to  network  infrastructure  has  been  the  cornerstone  of  international  broadband 
successes. We should embrace open access plans in the licensing of the 700 MHz 
band and establish policies to bring competition back in the wireline space. 

• Explore  financial  incentives  to  expand  broadband  capacity  in  the  last  mile— 
Successful policies overseas have included direct government investment in wir-
ing public facilities, low-interest loans for public and private broadband projects, 
tax incentives for networking equipment, accelerated depreciation, debt guaran-
tees and other targeted investments in our digital future.51 

• Authorize and protect the right of local governments to provide broadband serv-
ices—Municipalities  have  led  the  charge  in  recent  years  to  fill  gaps  in  the 
broadband  market  and  build  services  that  exceed  those  offered  by  commercial 
incumbents. This effort to bring competition and innovation to the marketplace 
should be encouraged. We applaud the work of the Committee on this issue and 
recommend a bill offered by Senators Lautenberg and McCain. 

• Collect  data  and  map  the  broadband  market  on  an  ongoing  basis—We  cannot 
solve problems that we do not understand. Our current state of broadband data 
collection is unacceptable. FCC should be instructed to collect more granular in-
formation  on  service  as  well  as  price  and  speed  data  on  all  broadband  connec-
tions. Programs should be initiated to help map the broadband market. 

• Require network owners to offer customers stand-alone or ‘‘naked’’ DSL or cable 
modem service—The promise of VoIP competition in the voice market has been 
stymied by the bundling practices of the incumbent operators. To give this alter-
native  a  viable  chance,  policymakers  should  put  in  place  protections  for  this 
consumer benefit. 

Polices for the Applications Layer 

The applications layer, in this analysis, refers to the marketplace for content, ap-
plications, services and devices that flow over, or connect to, the Internet. This eco-
nomic space at the ‘‘edge’’ of the network architecture has been a remarkable engine 
of economic growth in the last decade. In addition, this is the space where network 
technologies meet democratic discourse and open cultural expression. Because of the 
open marketplace at the edge of the network, an open sphere for public speech has 
developed that rivals the printing press as the most important development in mod-
ern political communication. Policies aimed at the application layer should recognize 
its centrality to the economic and democratic health of the Nation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

25 

• Network  Neutrality  should  be  established  as  the  cornerstone  of  broadband  pol-
icy—We  should  protect  an  open  market  for  speech  and  commerce  on  the  Inter-
net  for  consumers,  citizens  and  businesses  alike.  To  do  this,  we  should  apply 
nondiscrimination safeguards to the broadband ramps leading onto the Internet 
that prohibit owners of the physical layer of the network from gate-keeping the 
applications layer of the network. 

• Carterphone rules should apply to the wireless broadband platform—We should 
recognize  and  remedy  the  contradictions  in  fostering  an  open  market  for  wire-
less broadband on a platform emerging from the closed networks of cellular te-
lephony. The walled garden of the PCS world should not be permitted to cripple 
the  potential  of  mobile  wireless  broadband.  All  devices,  applications  and  serv-
ices that do not harm the network should be permitted access. 

• Pair broadband expansion with digital inclusion programs—Bringing broadband 
to  underserved  areas  will  do  no  good  if  local  communities  lack  the  computers 
and  training  necessary  to  access  the  network.  We  should  design  and  empower 
social  programs  to  bring  technology  and  skills  to  communities  and  work  with 
local leaders to establish meaningful connections. 

• Facilitate  ongoing  research  into  network  traffic  and  data  management—The 
dearth  of  information  about  what  is  happening  on  the  Internet  cripples  our  ef-
forts  to  address  some  of  the  most  pressing  problems  in  the  application  layer: 
spam,  cyber-security,  privacy,  and  traffic  management.  Policymakers  should 
seek  to  make  available  the  tools  researchers  need  to  provide  the  best  available 
answers to these problems. 

Conclusion 

The status quo is unacceptable. If we watch and wait, trusting that today’s artifi-
cially-constrained  marketplace  will  magically  solve  the  broadband  problem,  we  will 
see the U.S. slip farther behind the rest of the world and widen the digital divide— 
both  domestically  and  internationally.  The  consequences  are  too  severe  to  tolerate 
this narrow path. 

The  current  trend  lines  are  clear.  We  continue  to  have  large  gaps  in  broadband 
service  across  the  Nation.  Worse  still,  the  networks  we  do  have  are  slower,  more 
expensive,  and  less  competitive  than  the  global  leaders  in  broadband  performance. 
Our  reliance  on  intermodal  competition  has  not  proven  successful,  as  we  remain 
mired in a rigid duopoly. The optimistic predictions about mobile cellular broadband 
do not appear to hold any real promise of a viable ‘‘third pipe.’’ Meanwhile, network 
operators  are  following  the  demands  of  quarterly  returns—investing  in  networks 
where  costs  are  lowest  and  profits  highest  and  leaving  the  rest  of  the  market  be-
hind.  Perversely,  the  proposals  of  the  incumbents  include  dismantling  the  open, 
neutral marketplace for commercial applications and political speech to squeeze out 
higher  revenues.  The  result  in  the  value  chain  and  in  the  public  sphere  will  be  a 
resounding net loss. This is robbing Peter to pay Paul, and the Congress should re-
ject and look beyond such a short sighted approach to real solutions. We must reject 
the  argument  that  an  open  Internet  and  a  high  capacity  network  are  mutually  ex-
clusive goals. We must have both for our information marketplace to prosper. 

The  first  step  on  the  road  to  broadband  recovery  is  understanding  the  problem. 
We  must  rectify  the  deplorable  state  of  data  collection  in  the  broadband  market. 
What we do not know undercuts our ability to craft and target viable solutions. Sec-
ond, we must shed the myths about our failures and the false promises that a mag-
ical  resurrection  of  our  fortunes  is  right  around  the  corner.  Third,  we  must  study 
the  successes  of  other  nations  to  determine  which  policies  are  the  best  bets  for  the 
digital future of the U.S. Now is not the time to take ideas off the table, it is a mo-
ment for aspirational inquiry and bold vision. 

Finally,  the  Congress  should  move  forward  with  a  comprehensive  national 
broadband  policy.  This  should  be  a  broad  platform  of  initiatives  that  addresses  the 
complexity  of  the  issue  and  maximizes  our  chances  for  near  and  long  term  success. 
The focus of these policies should be: (1) enhancing competition between and within 
the technologies that deliver broadband connectivity; (2) protecting competition and 
speech in the content flowing over the Internet; (3) expanding opportunities to bring 
new  broadband  providers  to  the  market  using  new  technologies;  (4)  using  targeted 
economic  incentives  to  stimulate  investment  in  underserved  areas;  (5)  establishing 
programs that couple broadband deployment with technology provision and training; 
and 6) promoting a permanent research agenda that facilitates the collection of data 
in the market and on the network. 

Solving  the  broadband  problem  is  a  serious  challenge  of  signal  importance.  We 

look forward to working with the Committee to find productive solutions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

26 

APPENDIX A 

Sample Mobile Broadband Offers 

Mobile broadband service programs are expensive, slow, not universally available, 

and severely restrictive. A sample of available offers: 52 
Sprint 

In Rev A coverage areas (available to 100 million people) 
• Download Speed: 600–1,400 kbps 
• Upload Speed: 350–500 kbps 
• Price:  $59.99  per  month  with  a  2-year  contract.  OR  $79.99  per  month  with  a 

1-year contract. 
» $36 activation fee 
» $200 early termination fee. 
» Numerous taxes, surcharges, and fees 

In non-Rev A coverage areas (available to 94 million additional people) 
• Download Speed: 400–700 kbps 
• Upload Speed: 50–70 kbps 
• Price: Same as above 
Service restrictions: 
• ‘‘Use as a private line or frame relay service substitution, service, or like equiv-
alent,  is  prohibited.  Not  available  while  roaming.  Premium  content  not  avail-
able. Shared data not available.’’ 

• ‘‘We reserve the right to limit or suspend any heavy, continuous data usage that 
adversely  impacts  our  network  performance  or  hinders  access  to  our  network. 
If  your  Services  include  unlimited  web  or  data  access,  you  also  can’t  use  your 
Device  as  a  modem  for  computers  or  other  equipment,  unless  we  identify  the 
Service  or  Device  you  have  selected  as  specifically  intended  for  that  purpose.’’ 

Verizon 

In Rev A coverage areas (available to 135 million people) 
• Download Speed: 600–1400 kbps 
• Upload Speed: 350–500 kbps 
• Price:  $59.99  per  month  with  a  2-year  contract.,  AND  customer  must  also  be 

a Verizon voice customer. OR $79.99 per month with a 1-year contract. 
» $25–$35 activation fee 
» $175 early termination fee. 
» Numerous taxes, surcharges and fees 

In non-Rev A coverage areas (available to 67 million additional people) 
• Download Speed: 400–700 kbps 
• Upload Speed: 50–70 kbps 
• Price: Same as above 
Service restrictions: 
• ‘‘Examples  of  prohibited  uses  include,  without  limitation,  the  following:  (i)  con-
tinuous uploading, downloading, or streaming of audio or video programming or 
games; (ii) server devices or host computer applications, including, but not lim-
ited  to,  Web  camera  posts  or  broadcasts,  automatic  data  feeds,  automated  ma-
chine-to-machine connections or peer-to-peer (P2P) file-sharing; or (iii) as a sub-
stitute or backup for private lines or dedicated data connections. 
• Will  terminate  service  if  you  exceed  5GB  per  month—or  about  6  CD’s  worth  of 

data (800MB each). 

AT&T 

(No mention of Rev A deployments) 
• Download Speed: 400–700 kbps 
• Upload Speed: 50–70 kbps 
• Price: $59.99 per month with a 2-year contract AND subscription to a voice plan 
that’s  at  least  $39.99  per  month.  OR  $79.99  per  month  with  a  1-year  contract. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

27 

» $36 activation fee 
» $175 early termination fee. 
» Numerous taxes, surcharges and fees 

Service restrictions: 
• ‘‘Prohibited  uses  include,  but  are  not  limited  to,  using  services:  (I)  with  server 
devices  or  with  host  computer  applications,  including,  without  limitation,  web 
camera posts or broadcasts, continuous jpeg file transfers, automatic data feeds, 
telemetry applications, PeerMto-Peer (P2P) file sharing, automated functions or 
any  other  machineMtoMmachine  applications;  (II)  as  substitute  or  backup  for 
private lines or dedicated data connections; (III) for Voice over IP’’ 

• ‘‘Unlimited  plans  cannot  be  used  for  uploading,  downloading  or  streaming  of 

video content (e.g., movies, tv), music or games.’’ 

• ‘‘Service  is  not  intended  to  provide  full-time  connections,  and  the  Service  may 
be discontinued after a significant period of inactivity or after sessions of exces-
sive usage. Cingular reserves the right to (i) limit throughput or amount of data 
transferred, deny Service and/or terminate Service, without notice’’ 

Endnotes 

1 ‘‘Broadband Deployment is Extensive throughout the United States, but it is Dif-
ficult  to  Assess  the  Extent  of  Deployment  Gaps  in  Rural  Areas,’’  Government  Ac-
countability  Office,  Report  to  Congressional  Committees,  GAO–06–426,  May  2006. 
2 Extrapolated from ‘‘High-Speed Services for Internet Access as of June 30, 2006,’’ 
Industry  Analysis  and  Technology  Division,  Wireline  Competition  Bureau,  Federal 
Communications Commission; calculated assuming one line per household, based on 
July  1,  2006  Census  household  estimates;  S.  Derek  Turner,  ‘‘Broadband  Reality 
Check II,’’ Free Press, Consumers Union, and Consumer Federation of America, Au-
gust 2006, Available at http://www.freepress.net/docs/bbrc2-final.pdf. 

3 Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development,  ‘‘OECD  Broadband 

Statistics to December 2006’’, http://www.oecd.org/sti/ict/broadband. 

4 Richard  Hoffman.  ‘‘When  It  Comes  To  Broadband,  U.S.  Plays  Follow  The  Lead-
er,’’  InformationWeek,  15  Feb  2007,  http://www.informationweek.com/story/show 
Article.jhtml?articleID=197006038. 

5 ‘‘High-Speed Services for Internet Access as of June 30, 2006,’’ Industry Analysis 
and  Technology  Division,  Wireline  Competition  Bureau,  Federal  Communications 
Commission.;  calculated  assuming  one  line  per  household,  based  on  July  1,  2006 
Census household estimates. 

6 Ibid. 
7 Ibid. 
8 Ibid. 
9 Ibid. 
10 Ibid. 
11 Ibid. 
12 Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development  (OECD),  ‘‘OECD 

Broadband Statistics to December 2006,’’ http://www.oecd.org/sti/ict/broadband. 
13 http://www.itu.int/ITU-D/ict/statistics/atlglance/top20lbroadl2005.html 
14 World  Information  Society  Report,  August  2006,  http://www.itu.int/osg/spu/ 

publications/worldinformationsociety/2006/wisr-web.pdf. 

15 For  a  detailed  background  on  product  availability  in  Europe,  see:  Ofcom,  The 
International  Communications  Market  2006,  http://www.ofcom.org.uk/research/ 
cm/cm06/main.pdf. 

16 Grant  Gross,  ‘‘U.S.  customers  pay  considerably  more  than  the  Japanese  for 
bandwidth,’’  IDG,  4  April  2007,  http://www.infoworld.com/archives/emailPrint.jsp 
?R=printThis&A=/article/07/04/04/HNjapbroadbandl1.html. 

17 Ibid. 
18 ‘‘Neuf  Offers  50  Mbps  in  Paris  for  30  EUR  per  month,’’  MuniWireless,  7  March 

2007, http://www.muniwireless.com/article/articleview/5771/1/2/ 

19 ‘‘High-Speed  Services  for  Internet  Access  as  of  June  30,  2006,’’  Industry  Anal-
ysis  and  Technology  Division,  Wireline  Competition  Bureau,  Federal  Communica-
tions Commission. 

20 Ibid. 
21 John B. Horrigan, ‘‘Home Broadband Adoption 2006,’’ Pew Internet & American 

Life Project, May 28, 2006. 

22 Thomas  Bleha.  ‘‘Down  to  the  Wire.’’  Foreign  Affairs,  May/June  2005.  http:// 
www.foreignaffairs.org/20050501faessay84311/thomas-bleha/down-to-the-wire.html. 

23 See: http://www.dslreports.com/shownews/65917. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

28 

24 See: James S. Granelli, ‘‘Prices going up for phones, Net,’’ 1 Feb 2007, Baltimore 
Sun,  http://www.baltimoresun.com/business/bal-bz.pricing01feb01,0,1370518.story? 
coll=bal-business-headlines. 

25 Testimony before the U.S. Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Trans-
portation,  S.  2686,  Communications,  Consumer’s  Choice,  and  Broadband  Deploy-
ment Act of 2006, May 18, 2006. 

26 ‘‘High-Speed  Services  for  Internet  Access  as  of  June  30,  2006,’’  Industry  Anal-
ysis  and  Technology  Division,  Wireline  Competition  Bureau,  Federal  Communica-
tions Commission. 

27 Ibid. 
28 Ibid. 
29 Leichtman Research Group, May 2006. 
30 See:  Tim  Wu,  ‘‘Wireless  Net  Neutrality,’’  New  America  Foundation,  February 

2007, http://www.newamerica.net/publications/policy/wirelesslnetlneutrality. 

31 Michael  D.  Kennedy,  Senior  Vice  President,  Motorola,  Before  the  U.S.  Senate 

Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, July 12, 2005. 

32 This estimate of bit rates (roughly 1.5 bits per hertz) in the 700 MHz band was 
provided  by  an  engineer  responsible  for  one  of  the  entities  preparing  to  bid  for  a 
700  MHz  license.  It  was  confirmed  independently  by  two  other  wireless  engineers 
as a reasonable estimate given the frequency, power levels and modulation schemes 
available today. 

33 Consumers  Federation  of  America,  et.  al.,  ‘‘Ex  Parte  Comments  of  the  Ad  Hoc 
Public Interest Spectrum Coalition,’’ PS Docket No. 06–229, WT Docket No. 06–150, 
05–211,  96–86,  April  5,  2007,  Available  at  http://www.freepress.net/docs/pisc 
700mhzpart2.pdf. 

34 Turner, op. cit. 
35 GAO, op. cit. 
36 Development of Nationwide Broadband Data to Evaluate Reasonable and Time-
ly  Deployment  of  Advanced  Services  to  All  Americans,  Improvement  of  Wireless 
Broadband  Subscribership  Data,  and  Development  of  Data  on  Interconnected  Voice 
over Internet Protocol (VoIP) Subscribership), Notice of Proposed Rule Making, WC 
Docket  No.  07–38,  April  16,  2007,  Available  at  http://hraunfoss.fcc.gov/edocsl 
public/attachmatch/FCC-07-17A1.pdf. 

37 Turner, op. cit. 
38 GAO, op. cit. 
39 Ibid. 
40 Ibid. 
41 Quoted in: Richard Hoffman. ‘‘When It Comes To Broadband, U.S. Plays Follow 
The  Leader,’’  InformationWeek,  15  Feb  2007,  http://www.informationweek.com/ 
story/showArticle.jhtml?articleID=197006038. 

42 Kevin  Martin,  ‘‘Why  Every  American  Should  Have  Broadband  Access,’’  Finan-

cial Times, April 2, 2006. 

43 Thomas  Bleha.  ‘‘Down  to  the  Wire.’’  Foreign  Affairs,  May/June  2005.  http:// 
www.foreignaffairs.org/20050501faessay84311/thomas-bleha/down-to-the-wire.html. 

44 Gross, op. cit. 
45 Bleha, op. cit. 
46 See: https://www.predict.org/. 
47 See Richard Taylor and Eun-A Park, ‘‘Barriers to Entry Analysis of Broadband 
Multiple  Platforms,  Comparing  the  US  to  South  Korea,’’  Paper  presented  to  the 
Telecommunications  Policy  Research  Conference,  September  29–October  1,  2006, 
Washington,  D.C.,  http://web.si.umich.edu/tprc/papers/2006/636/TPRC2006Bar 
riersToEntry.pdf; Amit Schejter, ‘‘From all my teachers I have grown wise, and from 
my  students  more  than  anyone  else:  What  Lessons  Can  the  U.S.  Learn  from 
Broadband  Policies  in  Europe?’’  Working  Paper,  2007,  Pennsylvania  State  Univer-
sity. 

48 Taylor and Park, op. cit. 
49 Gross, op. cit. 
50 Schejter, op. cit. 
51 Gross, op. cit. 
52 Published offerings of Sprint, Verizon and AT&T as of April 19, 2007. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Scott. May I now rec-

ognize Dr. Eisenach? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

29 

STATEMENT  OF  JEFFREY  A.  EISENACH,  PH.D.,  CHAIRMAN, 
CRITERION  ECONOMICS;  ADJUNCT  PROFESSOR,  GEORGE 
MASON UNIVERSITY SCHOOL OF LAW 
Dr.  EISENACH.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman, 
members  of  the  Committee.  It’s  an  honor  for  me  to  be  here  today. 
I’m  going  to  summarize  the  written  testimony,  which  I  presented 
but I am going to refer to the charts in the back of that testimony 
so  you  may  want  to  have  those  in  front  of  you.  I  apologize  to  the 
audience if they didn’t get all of those. 

I  would  start  by  saying  that  the  connection  between  broadband 
deployment  and  prosperity  is  now  widely  acknowledged  and  most 
advanced  nations  have  adopted  policies  to  increase  broadband  in-
vestment  and  make  broadband  services  widely  available  at  afford-
able prices. It makes sense to ask as we do today and as you today, 
how well or poorly the U.S. is doing in this regard. 

Now,  just  as  some  saw  Russia’s  1957  launch  of  the  Sputnik  sat-
ellite as an indicator that the U.S. had fallen behind in a key tech-
nology,  some  today  look  at  the  familiar  OECD  statistics  and  con-
clude that we’re behind or at least falling behind in the broadband 
race. 

Happily,  it  turned  out  our  fears  about  losing  the  space  race  to 
the  Russians,  to  say  the  least,  were  exaggerated  and  I  suspect  the 
same  is  true  with  respect  to  our  fears  about  broadband.  But  Sput-
nik  did  get  Americans’  attention.  It  spurred  us  into  action  and  a 
little of both today on the broadband front is very much needed. 

With  that  in  mind,  my  testimony  focuses  primarily  on  two  top-
ics—the  need  for  better  information  about  broadband  deployment 
and the state of broadband deployment in rural America. 

First  the  data  we  do  have  tells  us  we  are  doing  a  lot  of  things 
right.  Figure  1  in  my  testimony,  for  example,  shows  that  invest-
ment  in  communications  equipment  as  reported  by  the  Bureau  of 
Economic  Analysis  at  the  Commerce  Department,  has  increased 
over 40 percent since we significantly de-regulated broadband back 
in 2003. 

Figure  2  from  the  FCC  shows  that  the  overall  number  of 
broadband  connections  is  growing  rapidly—52  percent  between 
June  2005  and  June  2006.  It  also  shows  that  wireless  broadband 
is  growing  explosively,  from  under  400,000  in  2005—400,000  con-
nections  to  over  11  million  a  year  later  and  that’s  a  growth  rate 
of about 2,800 percent. This growth, these two figures, are directly 
connected—the growth as a direct result of the high rates of invest-
ment  that  we  have  and  appear  to  be  continuing,  as  shown  in  Fig-
ure 1. 

But how do we compare with other nations? A lot has been writ-
ten  on  that  topic  and  a  lot  has  been  said  today  and  more  will  be 
said but today, I would like to just add one thought for your consid-
eration and simply put, that thought is that where you are depends 
a lot on where you have been. 

Figure  3  shows  what  may  be  a  familiar  graph  and  that  is  how 
new  technologies,  especially  technologies  like  telephony,  fax  ma-
chines  and  the  Internet,  where  network  effects  are  important.  It 
shows how those new technologies propagate through society—how 
they  spread.  They  tend  to  follow  an  ‘‘S’’  pattern.  Initially,  uptake 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

30 

is  slow.  Then  a  tipping  point  is  reached  and  propagation  acceler-
ates as if suddenly, everyone has to have one. 

Eventually,  the  product  reaches  a  saturation  point  when  every-
one who will ever want that product already has got it, where truly 
every  major  IT  product,  from  the  telephone  to  the  fax  machine  to 
the  iPod,  has  followed  this  pattern  and  broadband  is  no  exception. 
Now,  the  four  charts  in  Figure  4  show  the  S  curve  at  work  and 
I  should  say,  these  are  based  on  what  is  now  obsolete  data  from 
the OECD, which un-helpfully released its statistics after my testi-
mony  was  prepared  but  I  think  the  data  is  nevertheless  indicative 
and  valid.  Belgium  and  Korea,  both  of  which  lead  the  U.S.  in 
broadband  adoption,  seemed  to  have  reached  at  least  temporary 
saturation  points.  Their  S-curves  flattened  out.  Poland  and  Aus-
tralia,  both  of  which  lag  behind—Poland  far  behind—have  passed 
at least a local tipping point and adoption is growing rapidly. 

Now let’s turn to those OECD rankings. In Figure 5, we show the 
June  2006  usual  OECD  data  with  the  U.S.  ranked  12th  in  the 
world  at  that  time,  as  measured  by  the  number  of  broadband  con-
nections  per  100  inhabitants.  But  in  Figure  6,  I  have  added  an-
other  set  of  bars  and  those  show  the  growth  rate  of  penetration 
over  that  same  period  of  time,  this  from  June  2005  to  June  2006. 
Notice  first  and  in  general,  the  countries  where  broadband  adop-
tion  is  growing  most  rapidly  are  the  ones  where  the  level  of  pene-
tration is lowest while growth in countries with higher penetration 
in general has begun to slow. 

Where  is  the  U.S.  on  its  S-curve?  First  note  that  there  is  about 
25  percent  annual  growth  and  I  think  we  may  have  seen  a  slow 
down  in  the  most  recent  statistics,  I  don’t  make  too  much  of  6 
months  worth  of  data  on  that  front.  But  at  25  percent  annual 
growth,  the  U.S.  has  one  of  the  fastest  growth  rates  of  any  of  the 
high  penetration  rate  countries—far  above  countries  like  Belgium 
and  Canada  and  Japan  and  Korea,  which  again  seem  to  have  hit 
temporary saturation levels. 

If you turn to Figure 7, it seems clear that broadband growth in 
the U.S. is continuing at a healthy pace and I’d also go back to Fig-
ure 2, which shows the same thing. So coming back to the question 
of  do  we  have  enough  data?  Clearly,  we  have  enough  data  to  per-
form  a  lot  of  useful  analyses  to  compare  how  we’re  doing  at  this 
level to other countries and so forth. 

But  when  you  dig  a  little  deeper,  there  is  also  a  lot  we  don’t 
know and in my opinion, what we don’t know is hindering our abil-
ity to make informed policy choices. For example, first as the GAO 
has  noted,  the  current  FCC  data  on  broadband  availability  is  not 
very  useful  in  assessing  rural  deployment.  It  tells  us  whether  one 
or  more  providers  have  customers  in  each  Zip  Code  but  it  doesn’t 
tell  us  how  many  households  or  businesses  in  that  Zip  Code  actu-
ally  have  broadband  availability  nor  does  it  tell  us  anything  about 
the quality or price of service. 

Second,  the  last  time  the  Census  Bureau  released  data  on  com-
puter and Internet adoption, including broadband adoption, was in 
2005  and  the  data  was  gathered  in  October  2003.  Now  given  the 
dynamic  nature  of  broadband  deployment,  it  might  as  well  have 
been collected in 1903—it’s simply not helpful. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

31 

Third,  the  most  recent  official  data  available  on  small  business 
broadband penetration was collected in late 2003 as part of a study 
by the Small Business Administration. 

Now  admittedly,  there  is  a  lot  of  data  available  from  both  for- 
profit  and  not-for-profit  sources  such  as  the  Pew  Internet  &  the 
American Life Project. But these private sources cannot and do not 
make up for the paucity of official data from the U.S. Government. 
The  FCC’s  recent  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  on  improving 
broadband  data  collection  is  a  hopeful  step  in  the  right  direction 
but  other  agencies,  including  the  Census  Bureau  need  to  do  better 
as well. 

One specific reason that has been mentioned here today: we need 
better  data  to  inform  the  important  discussion  now  underway 
about broadband deployment in rural America. 

Rural  America  lags  behind  the  cities  and  suburbs  in  broadband 
adoption.  If  you  go  to  Figure  8,  we  see  the  best  data,  I  think,  that 
is available on this from the Pew Internet & American Life Project 
in 2005, which shows that only 24 percent of rural households had 
broadband connections compared with about 40 percent on average 
for the rest of the country. 

On  the  other  hand,  the  data  we  do  have  also  suggests  that 
broadband  is  now  available  to  the  overwhelming  majority  of  rural 
households  and  that  availability  is  increasing.  In  expert  testimony 
I filed on behalf of Verizon earlier this year in Virginia, I examined 
in  detail  the  state  of  telecommunications  competition  in  the  State 
of Virginia, including the availability and use of broadband. The re-
sults there, it seems to me, are quite encouraging. 

Figure  9  shows  the  growth  of  broadband  services  based  on  the 
FCC’s admittedly imperfect Form 477 data. Now we took this data 
and translated it into the wire center level so we were actually able 
to estimate for each wire center, the level of broadband availability. 
Now  while  the  FCC  data  are  imperfect,  it  nevertheless  shows 
that  the  trend  is  very  much  in  the  correct  direction.  If  you  look  at 
the  bottom  line  on  the  chart,  you  see  that  even  in  the  most  rural 
wire  centers,  there  are  an  average  of  four  providers  providing 
broadband  service  someplace  in  that  wire  center  and  again,  that 
does  not  go  to  every  individual,  as  we  know,  of  course.  That’s  the 
weakness in the FCC data. 

Figure  10  shows  the  availability  of  cable  modem  service  and  it 
too,  is  by  and  large,  encouraging.  Eighty-eight  percent  of  house-
holds  have  access  to  cable  modem  service,  which  is  equivalent  to 
99  percent  of  cable  passed  households.  That’s  the  good  news.  But 
the bad news is about 10 percent of households have no cable serv-
ice at all and those households are concentrated in rural areas and 
as a result, there are some rural areas where cable modem service 
is available to only a small fraction of the population. 

But  the  story  still  isn’t  over.  In  Figure  11,  we  see  areas  where 
broadband  is  available  from  fixed  wireless  providers,  including 
some  of  the  most  rural  areas  of  the  state.  Seventy-one  percent  of 
Virginia households have wireless broadband coverage. 

I  looked  closely  at  the  companies  providing  that  coverage,  like 
Citizens  Telecom,  Ntelos  and  Virginia  Broadband  and  found  that 
they  are  offering  robust,  high-speed  connections  at  competitive 
prices.  Virginia  Broadband,  for  example,  bundles  Voice  over  Inter-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

32 

net  service  with  its  wireless  broadband  product,  which  is  now 
available  all  over  central  Virginia  and  rolling  out  rapidly  to  large 
areas of the state. 

Now  I  note  in  my  written  testimony  that  broadband  over  power 
line is also showing real promise, including in the State of Virginia 
where  the  Rural  Utility  Service  is  funding,  through  guaranteed 
loans, some significant projects by the Central Virginia Electric Co-
operative  and  we  should  not  forget  the  rural  telephone  companies, 
which  now  make  broadband  available  to  approximately  90  percent 
of their customers. 

Unfortunately,  the  sort  of  detailed  examination  I  was  able  to  do 
of  the  situation  in  Virginia  at  some  significant  expense  and  over  a 
lengthy  period  of  time,  using  a  lot  of  data  that  is  only  available 
from  the  private  sector,  from  private  providers,  is  not  available  in 
most  states  and  has  not  been  done  in  most  states.  Kentucky  is  an 
encouraging  exception  and  perhaps  a  model  for  what  needs  to  be 
done for the rest of the country. 

To summarize, in my opinion, America is doing pretty well in the 
race to develop 21st century communications but we can do better. 
The first step we need to take is to become better informed because 
we  won’t  get  where  we  need  to  go  if  we  don’t  even  know  where 
we’re starting at. 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  that  completes 
my  testimony  and  I  look  forward  to  any  questions  you  may  have. 
Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Eisenach follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JEFFREY A. EISENACH, PH.D., CHAIRMAN, CRITERION 
ECONOMICS; ADJUNCT PROFESSOR, GEORGE MASON UNIVERSITY SCHOOL OF LAW 
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to 
appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  issues  relating  to  communications,  broadband 
and U.S. competitiveness. 

I have had the opportunity to study communications and broadband policy issues 
over  the  course  of  many  years,  and  in  several  capacities,  including  in  my  current 
positions as an adjunct faculty member at George Mason University Law School and 
as  Chairman  of  Criterion  Economics,  an  economic  consulting  firm  based  here  in 
Washington.  I  should  note  that,  while  my  consulting  practice  often  involves  issues 
relating  to  communications  and  broadband  policy,  I  am  appearing  today  solely  on 
my own behalf. 

The role of information technology in promoting economic growth and productivity 
is well documented. Digital computers allow information to be stored, analyzed, ma-
nipulated—and  turned  into  useful  knowledge.  High  capacity  communications  net-
works  allow  those  computers  to  work  together,  and  increase  exponentially  society’s 
ability  to  create  knowledge  and  put  it  to  work.  Ethernet  inventor  Bob  Metcalfe  for-
malized  this  notion  in  what  has  become  known  as  Metcalfe’s  law:  the  value  of  a 
communications network is a function of the number of users, squared. 

Because  the  relationship  between  broadband  and  prosperity  is  now  so  widely  un-
derstood, nearly every advanced nation has adopted policies aimed at increasing in-
vestment  in  communications  infrastructure  and  making  advanced  communications 
services widely available at affordable prices. There is virtually no limit to the diver-
sity  of  policy  tools  being  deployed,  from  subsidies  and  state  ownership,  on  the  one 
hand, to tax cuts and deregulation, on the other. 

How does the U.S. stack up? Based largely on statistics collected by the Organiza-
tion for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD), some have argued that we 
are  ‘‘behind,’’  or  at  least  ‘‘falling  behind,’’  in  the  broadband  race.  Indeed,  the  now 
familiar chart showing the U.S. at 11th or 12th in the world in broadband adoption 
has  become  sort  of  a  modern  version  of  the  1957  Sputnik  launch—an  indicator,  to 
some,  that  the  U.S.  has  fallen  behind  in  a  key  technology.  Now,  as  then,  the  argu-
ment  is  usually  rolled  out  in  service  of  some  sort  of  proposed  policy  change—more 
regulation,  or  less;  more  subsidies,  or  stronger  tax  incentives;  even  direct  govern-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

33 

ment involvement, as in the case of municipalities building their own telecommuni-
cations networks to compete with private providers. 

Happily, it turned out our fears about losing the space race to the Russians were, 
to  say  the  least,  highly  exaggerated.  I  suspect  the  same  is  true  with  respect  to  our 
fears  about  broadband.  On  balance,  the  U.S.  is  doing  pretty  well  when  it  comes  to 
broadband deployment and adoption. 

That said, it is important for policymakers, including this Committee, to continue 
monitoring  our  broadband  policies  and  making  improvements.  With  that  in  mind, 
I would like to focus today on two topics. First, I would like to suggest that we can 
and should do a better job of collecting information on broadband deployment in the 
U.S.  Second,  I  will  comment  briefly  on  the  state  of  broadband  deployment  in  rural 
America. 
What We Know 

We  know  a  lot  about  broadband  deployment  in  the  U.S.  We  know,  for  example, 
that broadband deployment and adoption are both growing at a very rapid pace, and 
hence that, at least at a macro level, our current policies are working. But we don’t 
know  as  much  as  we  could  or  should  know—or  as  much  as  we  need  to  know—to 
further improve those policies. Let me provide a couple of examples. 

First,  we  have  good  macroeconomic  data  on  the  performance  of  different  sectors 
of the economy, including the IT sector. We can use this data to assess, for example, 
the  effect  of  Federal  Communications  Commission  (FCC)  policies  on  investment. 
Figure  1  presents  information  on  investment  in  communications  equipment  in  the 
U.S., by quarter, from 1996 to the present. The data comes from the Bureau of Eco-
nomic Analysis at the Department of Commerce, and is part of the National Income 
and  Product  Accounts.  At  the  bottom  of  the  chart  I  have  added  a  timeline  showing 
some  key  FCC  policy  decisions  relating  to  broadband  regulation.  As  the  figure 
shows,  investment  in  communications  equipment  began  to  recover  from  the  disas-
trous  2001–2002  ‘‘meltdown’’  at  almost  precisely  the  time  the  FCC  began  deregu-
lating  broadband.  Some  might  say  that’s  just  coincidence,  but  in  my  opinion  the 
chart  provides  clear  evidence  that  removing  excessive  regulation  led  to  greater  in-
vestment. 

History  aside,  Figure  1  demonstrates  an  important  and  largely  undisputed  fact: 
investment  in  broadband  networks  is  moving  ahead  very  rapidly.  The  two  leading 
providers, the telephone and cable companies, are investing literally tens of billions 
of  dollars  to  upgrade  their  networks,  with  cable  companies  adding  voice  telephony, 
telephone  companies  adding  video,  and  both  increasing  dramatically  the  capacities 
of  their  networks  to  carry  high  speed  data.  But  cable  and  telephone  companies  are 
hardly  alone.  Wireless  broadband—both  fixed  and  mobile—is  the  fastest  growing 
broadband delivery mechanism. It is widely expected, for example, that private sec-
tor  firms  will,  later  this  year,  pay  more  than  $10  billion  for  additional  spectrum  in 
the 700 Mhz band that will be used to provide wireless broadband services. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

34 

Source: U.S. Department of Commerce Bureau of Economic Analysis 
Second,  in  addition  to  having  pretty  good  data  on  investment,  we  also  have  good 
aggregate  data,  at  a  national  level,  on  the  extent  of  broadband  adoption.  We  can 
use this data to assess the technologies people use to get broadband, and to compare 
U.S. broadband adoption to adoption rates in other countries. 

For  example,  Figure  2  shows  the  growth  of  high  speed  broadband  connections  in 
the  U.S.  since  1999,  as  reported  by  the  FCC.  Clearly,  broadband  adoption  is  pro-
ceeding  at  a  rapid  pace:  Indeed,  between  June  2005  and  June  2006,  the  number  of 
broadband connections grew by 52 percent. Most remarkable, however, is the growth 
of  wireless  connections:  Between  June  2005  and  June  2006,  the  number  of  mobile 
wireless  broadband  connections  went  from  under  400,000  to  over  11  million,  a 
growth rate of over 2,800 percent. 

s
p
e

.

2
N
E
S
E
4
2
4

I

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
N
E
S
E
4
2
4

I

35 

How  does  this  compare  with  other  nations?  Before  answering  that  question,  it  is 
perhaps  useful  to  step  back  for  a  moment  and  consider  the  process  by  which  new 
technologies  spread.  In  general,  new  technologies—and  especially  technologies  like 
telephony,  fax  machines  and  the  Internet,  where  network  effects  play  important 
roles—propagate  in  a  pattern  known  as  an  ‘‘S’’  curve,  like  the  one  shown  in  Figure 
3. Initially, uptake is slow. Then, a tipping point is reached, and propagation accel-
erates,  as  if,  suddenly,  everyone  has  to  have  one.  Eventually,  the  product  reaches 
a  saturation  point,  and  propagation  slows.  At  that  point,  everyone  who  will  ever 
want  or  need  the  product  already  has  it.  This  pattern  has  characterized  the  propa-
gation of virtually every major new IT product or service, from the telephone to fax 
machine to the iPod. Broadband is no exception. 

To  see  the  S-Curve  at  work,  consider  the  four  charts  shown  in  Figure  4,  which 
show  broadband  propagation  in  four  countries.  Belgium  and  Korea,  both  of  which 
lead the U.S. in broadband penetration (as measured by the OECD), appear to have 
reached  at  least  temporary  saturation  points.  Poland  and  Australia,  on  the  other 
hand, both of which lag behind, have passed at least a local tipping point, and pene-
tration is growing rapidly. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
N
E
S
E
4
2
4

I

36 

With this in mind, let’s turn to the OECD data. Figure 5 shows the usual OECD 
figure,  with  the  U.S.  ranked  12th  in  the  world,  as  measured  by  the  number  of 
broadband connections per 100 inhabitants. In Figure 6, however, I have added an-
other  set  of  bars,  which  shows  2006  growth  rates.  Figure  6  shows  an  interesting 
pattern:  The  countries  in  which  broadband  penetration  is  growing  most  rapidly  are 
the ones where penetration currently is lowest, while growth in countries with high-
er penetration has begun to slow. 

Where  is  the  U.S.  on  its  S-Curve?  Figure  6  shows  that  the  U.S.  has  one  of  the 
fastest  growth  rates  of  any  of  the  high-penetration  rate  countries,  at  25  percent. 
Only the United Kingdom, at 30 percent growth, was significantly faster, while sev-
eral  countries,  including  Canada  and  Japan  as  well  as  Belgium  and  Korea,  appear 
to  have  hit  at  least  temporary  saturation  levels.  As  shown  in  Figure  2  above,  and 
confirmed  in  Figure  7,  broadband  growth  in  the  U.S.  is  continuing  at  a  healthy 
pace. 

s
p
e

.

5
N
E
S
E
4
2
4

I

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
4
N
E
S
E
4
2
4

I

37 

Thus,  at  the  national  level,  we  have  a  lot  of  aggregate  data,  and  we  can  use  it 
to  perform  lots  of  useful  analysis.  And  when  we  do,  it  appears  the  U.S.  stacks  up 
better than some people seem to think. 
What We Don’t Know 

When you dig a little deeper, there is also a lot we don’t know—and what we don’t 

know is hindering our ability to make informed policy choices. For example: 

• As the General Accounting Office noted in a May 2006 report,1 broadband avail-
ability data reported by the FCC in its annual reports under section 706 of the 
Telecommunications  Act  do  not  permit  an  accurate  assessment  of  broadband 
availability  on  a  geographically  disaggregated  basis.  Simply  put,  the  data  col-
lected  through  Form  477,  and  reported  by  the  FCC,  tells  us  whether  one  or 
more  providers  have  customers  in  each  Zip  Code,  but  it  does  not  tell  us  how 

1 U.S. Government Accountability Office, Broadband Deployment Is Extensive Throughout the 
United  States,  but  It  Is  Difficult  to  Assess  the  Extent  of  Deployment  Gaps  in  Rural  Areas, 
GAO–06–426 (May 2006). 

s
p
e

.

7
N
E
S
E
4
2
4

I

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
6
N
E
S
E
4
2
4

I

38 

many households or businesses in that Zip Code actually have broadband avail-
ability. Nor does it tell us anything about the quality or price of service. 

• The  most  recent  U.S.  Government  data  on  broadband  adoption  rates  by  dif-
ferent  segments  of  the  population  (for  example,  broadband  adoption  in  urban 
versus rural areas; adoption by people of different ages; adoption by households 
with children), was collected in October 2003 and published by the Department 
of Commerce in 2004 (in its last Nation Online report) and by the U.S. Census 
Bureau  in  2005  (in  Special  Study  P23–208).  Given  the  overall  growth  rates  we 
have  seen  since  then,  data  from  2003  is  virtually  worthless  for  assessing  the 
effects of our current policies. 

• For a variety of reasons, surprisingly little is known about broadband adoption 
by  businesses,  including  especially  small  businesses.  For  example,  the  most  re-
cent  government  data  available  on  small  business  broadband  penetration  was 
collected in late 2003 as part of a study by the Small Business Administration.2 
Of  course,  the  fact  that  government  is  not  collecting  data  does  not  necessarily 
mean that data is not available. Several non-profit organizations, including the Pew 
Internet and American Life Project 3 and the Center for the Digital Future, 4 conduct 
surveys on Internet use on a regular basis. The Pew Project, for example, regularly 
surveys  Internet  adoption  in  rural  America.  And,  for  those  with  the  means  to  pur-
chase data from private sector sources, much richer data can be had from companies 
such  as  Insight  Research,  In-Stat,  Nielsen//Net  Ratings  and  Warren  Communica-
tions.  I  have  had  the  opportunity  to  use  all  of  these  sources  extensively,  and  while 
the data they provide is certainly helpful, it is far from comprehensive. 

Given  the  importance  of  broadband  to  America’s  economic  competitiveness,  and 
the  appropriately  intense  interest  of  policymakers  in  ensuring  we  are  doing  every-
thing  possible  to  create  a  healthy  environment  for  broadband  deployment  to  all 
Americans, it is clear the government could and should be doing more to collect in-
formation  about  broadband  deployment,  and  to  disseminate  that  information  in  a 
far more timely manner. While the FCC’s recent Notice of Proposed Rulemaking on 
improving  broadband  data  collection  efforts  is  a  hopeful  step  in  the  right  direction, 
other agencies, including the Census Bureau, also need to look at how they can im-
prove their efforts. 
The Rural Challenge 

Let  me  conclude  my  testimony  with  a  brief  discussion  of  broadband  deployment 

in rural America. 

As noted above, official data on rural broadband deployment are relatively sparse. 
In recent years, however, I have had the opportunity to look closely at the data that 
are  available,  from  both  public  and  private  sources.  The  signs,  I  am  pleased  to  re-
port, strongly suggest our current policies are working to rapidly increase the avail-
ability of affordable, high capacity broadband services to rural Americans. 

First, to be clear, there is no doubt that rural America lags behind urban and sub-
urban  regions  in  broadband  adoption.  For  example,  as  shown  in  Figure  8,  the  Pew 
Project’s  most  recent  data  shows  that  only  24  percent  of  rural  households  had 
broadband connections in 2005, as compared with 38 percent in suburban areas and 
40 percent in urban areas. 

2 See  ‘‘A  Survey  of  Small  Businesses’  Telecommunications  Use  and  Spending,’’  Stephen 
Pociask,  TeleNomic  Research  for  the  Office  of  Advocacy,  Small  Business  Administration  Con-
tract  No.  SBA–HQ–02–M–0493,  Washington,  D.C.,  March  2004  available  at  http:// 
www.sba.gov/advo/research/rs236tot.pdf. 

3 See http://www.pewinternet.org/. I serve on the Pew Project’s Board of Advisors. 
4 See http://www.digitalcenter.org/. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

39 

What  is  less  clear,  however,  is  whether  rural  adoption  lags  behind  due  to  lack  of 
availability, or for other reasons.5 Overall, the evidence is strong that broadband is 
generally available in rural America and that availability is increasing rapidly. 

In  expert  testimony  I  filed  on  behalf  of  Verizon  earlier  this  year,  I  examined  in 
detail the state of telecommunications competition in the state of Virginia, including 
the availability and use of broadband.6 The results there, it seems to me, are quite 
encouraging. 

Figure  9,  for  example,  shows  the  growth  of  broadband  services  in  wire  centers 
served by Verizon in the state of Virginia, based on the FCC’s Form 477 data.7 For 
reasons  discussed  above,  these  data  are  far  from  a  perfect  measure,  but  the  trend 
it  represents  is  nevertheless  significant:  The  average  number  of  broadband  pro-
viders in rural areas is growing rapidly, and even wire centers with population den-
sities of less than 100 now average more than four broadband providers. 

Figure  10  presents  data  on  the  availability  of  cable  modem  service  in  Virginia. 
This  map,  which  is  based  on  commercially  available  data  backed  up  by  extensive 

5 There is some evidence, for example, that broadband adoption is correlated with income, and 

incomes in rural America tend to be lower than in urban and suburban areas. 

6 The  publicly  available  version  of  my  testimony  is  available  at  http://scc.virginia.gov/divi-

sion/puc/industry/vvlcomp/rsclapp.htm. 

7 To  produce  this  figure,  we  mapped  data  for  individual  Zip  Codes  (obtained  from  the  FCC) 

into corresponding wire centers within those Zip Codes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

9
N
E
S
E
4
2
4

I

.

s
p
e
8
N
E
S
E
4
2
4

I

40 

original  research  e.g.,  data  from  the  websites  of  individual  cable  providers),  shows 
that  88  percent  of  households  in  Verizon’s  service  territory  in  Virginia  have  access 
to cable modem service. In fact, 99 percent of households passed by cable now have 
access  to  broadband  cable  modem  service  (and  more  than  two-thirds  have  access  to 
voice services from their cable operator). That’s the good news. The bad news is that 
about  10  percent  of  households  have  no  cable  service  at  all,  that  these  households 
are concentrated in very rural areas, and that as a result there are some very rural 
areas  where  cable  modem  service  is  available  to  only  a  small  fraction  of  the  popu-
lation. 

The  story  does  not  end  here,  however.  Figure  11  shows  areas  where  broadband 
is  available  from  fixed  wireless  providers,  based  on  information  obtained  from  the 
providers  themselves.  It  shows  that  wireless  broadband  service  is  available  to  71 
percent  of  Virginia  households,  including  in  many  of  the  most  rural  areas  of  state. 

s
p
e

.

1
1
N
E
S
E
4
2
4

I

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
0
1
N
E
S
E
4
2
4

I

41 

I looked closely at the services offered by these providers, and was positively sur-
prised  by  what  I  found.  Companies  like  Citizens  Telecom,  Ntelos  and  Virginia 
Broadband offer robust, high speed connections, at competitive prices, with minimal 
set up fees.8 

Wireless  broadband  providers  are  not  the  only  innovative  companies  bringing 
broadband to rural areas. Broadband over powerline (BPL) providers are also show-
ing  increasing  promise.  In  Virginia,  for  example,  a  company  called  IBEC  has 
partnered  with  the  Central  Virginia  Electric  Cooperative  to  bring  high  speed  BPL 
services  to  two  service  areas,  and  has  committed  to  roll  out  service  throughout 
CVEC’s multi-county, very rural service territory. IBEC, I should note, has received 
significant support for the Rural Utilities Service loan guarantee program, which in 
my experience appears to represent, on balance, a cost-effective and efficient means 
of providing support for broadband deployments in rural areas. 

Finally, I would note that America’s rural telephone companies are actively rolling 
out broadband services, including fiber to the home, within their service territories. 
OPASTCO,  the  Organization  for  the  Promotion  and  Advancement  of  Small  Tele-
communications  Companies,  reports  that  its  members  offer  broadband  services  to 
approximately 90 percent of their customers.9 

So, overall, there is a lot of activity happening to bring broadband to rural Amer-
ica, and a fair amount of evidence that progress is being made. Unfortunately, how-
ever,  the  available  data  is  limited  in  both  quality  and  geographic  reach.  Some 
states—and  Kentucky  certainly  is  a  leader—have  taken  steps  to  more  comprehen-
sively  assess  what  is  available,  and  where,  and  what  can  be  done  to  ‘‘fill  in  the 
gaps.’’ Those efforts, in my opinion, need to be expanded to a national scale. 
Summary 

To  sum  up,  while  there  are  certainly  flaws  in  our  systems  of  data  collection,  the 
data  that  are  available  show  that  our  current  policies  are  working  reasonably  well, 
both  in  the  aggregate  and,  specifically,  with  respect  to  promoting  broadband  avail-
ability  in  rural  America.  This  does  not  mean,  however,  that  we  can  or  should  be 
sanguine. Too little is known about the adoption and use of broadband, and our cur-
rent data collection efforts provide little information on broadband availability, espe-
cially in rural America. Moreover, important policy issues loom in the immediate fu-
ture  that  could  have  effects—positive  or  negative—on  America’s  broadband  infra-
structure  and,  in  turn,  our  competitiveness  in  the  world  economy.  This  Committee 
is correct to be concerned about these issues, and to give them careful deliberation, 
as it is doing today. 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, that completes my testimony, and 

I look forward to any questions you may have. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Doctor. May I now recog-

nize Senator Stevens? 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  find  this  very  interesting.  I 
want  to  hear  the  other  witnesses  also.  Thank  you  for  the  charts, 
Doctor. I think they are very, very informative. 

Let  me  ask  all  three  of  you—is  Universal  Service  essential  to 

broadband deployment? 

Dr.  EISENACH.  I’ll  be  happy  to  go  first.  Universal  Service  has 
played a very important but uneven role, I think, in broadband de-
ployment.  Formally,  officially,  we  don’t  have  within  the  Universal 
Service  program,  an  official  support  program,  as  you  know,  for 
broadband  deployment.  However,  rural  telephone  companies  have 
been able to and I think to the benefit of certainly their customers, 
to  in  effect,  use  the  Universal  Service  programs  to  upgrade  their 
networks for voice purposes—— 

Senator STEVENS. Well—more than half of Universal Service now 
goes  to  inner  cities—schools,  libraries  and  health  facilities.  Isn’t 
broadband part of that? 

8 Virginia  Broadband,  for  example,  offers  download  speeds  up  to  15  Mbps,  with  400  Kbps  for 
$49.95 per month and 1.2 Mbps for $89.50. The company also offers a bundled VoIP service for 
$32.95 per month for residential customers and $31.95 per seat for businesses. 

9 OPASTCO  Ex  Parte  Presentation  to  FCC  Commissioner  Robert  McDowell,  September  16, 

2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

Dr. EISENACH. Oh, I think that program has also been important, 

42 

sir. I agree. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Let  me  ask  you  all—anyone  else  have  a  com-

ment about Universal Service and broadband? 

Mr. MEFFORD. I would just add, Mr. Vice Chairman, that the re-
sults I have reported from Kentucky—USF did not impact those re-
sults in a big way. In other words, we haven’t counted on USF dol-
lars  in  a  major  way  there,  but  yes,  our  local  schools  and  libraries 
have  utilized  the  program  but  report  that  it  certainly  needs  some 
retooling and we certainly would agree with that. 

Mr.  SCOTT.  Senator  Stevens,  I  think  that  the  insertion  of 
broadband  into  Universal  Service  programs  is  an  essential  part  of 
the  national  broadband  strategy.  I  think  bringing  broadband  to 
rural  areas  will  require  the  same  kind  of  progressive  idea  that  in-
formed  our  commitment  to  bringing  telephone  service  to  every 
American  household.  Because  eventually  we  want  everybody  to 
have a broadband connection, just like we wanted everyone to have 
a  phone  connection  and  I  think  it  is  time  to  make  Universal  Serv-
ice for broadband a part of this country’s policy platform. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mobile  phones  are  an  essential  part  of 

broadband deployment, right? 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  We  don’t  report  mobile  phone  broadband  as  part 

of our reporting on broadband availability on our maps. 
Senator STEVENS. You’re just reporting computer use? 
Mr.  MEFFORD.  It’s  households  ability  to  subscribe  to  broadband 
that  is  represented  in  our  inventory  and  how  we  account  for  that 
92  percent  of  households  served.  So  we  do  not  include  mobile 
broadband in those numbers. 

Senator  STEVENS.  If  the  household  uses  cell  phones,  it’s  not  re-

flected in your figures? 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  No,  sir,  it’s  not.  We’ve  done  that  for  a  number  of 
reasons.  There  are  some  usage  restrictions  that  follow  mobile 
broadband,  cellular  based  or  just  wireless  broadband  through  mo-
bile  phone  networks  that  would  restrict  some  higher  bandwidth 
type  applications.  That’s  one  of  the  reasons  that  we  haven’t  in-
cluded that in this mix. 

Senator STEVENS. But yours does include telephony, doesn’t it? 
Mr.  MEFFORD.  Yes,  sir,  it  does.  It  covers  telephony  and  cable— 
other  forms  of  wireless,  fixed  wireless  is  represented  on  the  map 
as the green circles. So we account for a lot of wireless service, just 
not cellular based. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Was  your  study  at  all  cellular  based,  Dr. 

Dr.  EISENACH.  I’ve  looked  at  that  issue  and  clearly  we  see  that 
wireless  broadband  connections  are  expanding  very  rapidly  in  the 
United States. If you come back to the question of Universal Serv-
ice,  if  that’s  part  of  the  issue,  I  think  the  question,  which  as  we 
all  know,  is  the  extent  to  which  wireless  connections  are  duplica-
tive of wireline connections. So as you look at the Universal Service 
Fund  and  the  rate  at  which  the  growth  of  wireless—of  subsidies 
are  growing  to  wireless  carriers,  I  think  the  question  becomes 
whether  that’s  the  most  efficient  use  of  those  funds  as  opposed  to 
focusing on wireline or at least primary connections to households, 
whether they be broadband or narrow band. 

Eisenach? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

43 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Senator Smith? 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator SMITH. Mr. Scott and all of you, I thank you for your tes-
timony.  Mr.  Scott,  I  was  very  intrigued  by  your  references  to  the 
OECD  and  how  Europe  has  achieved  both  horizontal  and  vertical 
kinds of competition and I wonder if you can tell me what their in-
vestment model was. Do they have some form of net neutrality and 
if so, who made the investments to achieve that? 

Mr.  SCOTT.  I  should  start  by  saying  it  varies  from  country  to 
country but generically speaking about the variety of countries that 
are ahead of us in the broadband race, most of them have multiple 
competitors  in  the  DSL  platform  and  bandwidth  is  plentiful  and 
the question of whether or not quality—— 

Senator SMITH. Who put it in? 
Mr.  SCOTT.  The  investment  has  been  from  the  telecom  car-

riers—— 

Senator SMITH. OK. 
Mr. SCOTT.—for the most part. I mean, there are some countries 
where the incumbent telecom carrier is a legacy network that used 
to  be  owned  by  the  state.  There  are  very  few  left  that  still  have 
controlling  state  ownership  or  any  state  ownership.  That  fact  is 
sometimes rolled out but it’s not actually accurate and the most im-
portant thing, I think, to recognize about these vertical competitors 
within  the  platform  is  that  their  growth  rates  are  really  off  the 
charts. 

Now, it’s interesting that Dr. Eisenach raised the points of Korea 
and  Belgium  as  having  flattened  out,  I  often  work  at  night  and  I 
was up in the middle of the night when the OECD posted the new 
numbers  so  I  was  able  to  get  a  look  at  them  and  actually,  Korea 
and Belgium, which on the S-curve, you would expect to be leveling 
off as a mature market—their growth rates have actually spiked in 
the  last  6  months.  Because  of  the  competition  in  the  market  that 
has  expanded  the  quality  of  those  connections,  they  are  finding 
consumers  who  want  to  buy  broadband  that  weren’t  there  in  the 
marketplace  before  and  that’s  really  the  direction  I  think  we  need 
to go. 

Senator  SMITH.  As  you  probably  know,  the  Telecommunications 
Act  was  all  for  voice  and  we’re  way  beyond  that  at  this  point  and 
we’re  struggling  to  get  to  the  next  level.  I  think  the  picture  you 
paint as to what we want ultimately is very desirable. 

But  we’re  hung  up  on  the  whole  issue  of  net  neutrality  and  the 
investment  model  we  have  here  is  to  say  that  the  incumbent  pro-
viders that you are critical of ‘‘go ahead and make this investment 
and  we’re  just  going  to  make  sure  you  can’t  ever  get  a  return  on 
it.’’  That’s  been,  frankly,  my  stumbling  block  on  net  neutrality.  I 
think  in  concept,  it’s  a  great  idea  but  I  don’t  know  how  to  get  it 
done  in  a  country  with  a  geography  as  big  as  we  have,  if  we  set 
the  rules  by  government  ahead  of  time  so  there’s  no  return  on  in-
vestment. 

You  see  the  dilemma?  How  do  we  get  from  where  you  want  to 
be  and  where  I  want  to  be—the  same  thing—but  get  it  done?  It  is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

44 

Universal  Service?  Is  it  white  space?  I  mean,  is  it  a  combination 
of all of those things? 

Mr.  SCOTT.  I’ve  struggled  with  the  same  question  and  my  start-
ing  point  is  that  I  think  as  a  nation,  we  want  a  network  that  is 
both open and free to commerce and speech on the application side 
and that is robust in its deployment and bandwidth on the physical 
side  of  the  network  and  that  we  can  have  both.  And  we  need  not 
choose  one  or  the  other  and  that  there  are  lots  of  strategies  to 
make sure that the carriers get a return on investment. 

There  are  Universal  Service  strategies.  We  can  look  abroad  at 
how  they’ve  done  in  their  networks.  There  are  various  tax  incen-
tives  that  can  be  put  forward,  accelerated  depreciation.  There  are 
ways  to  make  sure  that  the  investment  is  there  that  doesn’t  re-
quire changing the fundamental nature of the Internet. 

Senator  SMITH.  Is  that  then  sort  of  a  third  way  we  might  con-

sider to how to proceed? To get beyond this? 

Mr. SCOTT. Absolutely, absolutely. I think if we learn the lessons 
of  the  world  leaders  in  broadband,  we  will  get  beyond  the  impasse 
very quickly and we’ll be moving in the right direction. 

Senator SMITH. Is Universal Service one of the avenues? 
Mr. SCOTT. Absolutely. 
Senator SMITH. How about white spaces? I mean, how do you see 

that reform? 

Mr.  SCOTT.  I  think  opening  the  television  white  space  is  the 
quickest  and  easiest  way  to  bring  a  ubiquitous  wireless  connection 
to  the  country.  I  think  it  is  a  space  that  could  enjoy  a  tremendous 
boom  in  innovation.  I  think  one  of  the  greatest  success  stories  in 
broadband in the last few years is WiFi. Opening the white spaces 
is  like  WiFi  on  steroids  and  that  spectrum  has  too  long  sat  dor-
mant and we really ought to make it available. 

Senator  SMITH.  What  do  you  see  happening  if  we  aren’t  able  to 
break through the impasse? What happens? Do we just continue to 
fall behind as a country? 

Mr. SCOTT. If you look at the trend lines on the OECD numbers, 
they are not encouraging and frankly, that worries me because not 
only  do  I  want  to  see  the  Nation  fully  connected  but  every  6 
months that we fall further behind the rest of the world billions of 
dollars of consumer surplus that we’re leaving on the table. 

Senator SMITH. There is another factor—I don’t know if many re-
alize it. We want high tech to remain an American-centered indus-
try  but  if  they  don’t  have  the  infrastructure,  it’s  not  going  to  re-
main an American centered industry. 

Mr. SCOTT. I couldn’t agree more. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr. MEFFORD. Mr. Chairman, if I might add—in relation to what 
you mentioned in your opening remarks about the Broadband Data 
Improvement  Act,  I  would  just  plug  that  as  an  opportunity  to  do 
exactly what you’ve just said, Senator Smith, and it provides a way 
to  empower  states  to  address  these  challenges  at  the  state  level 
and  even  to  work  in  the  public/private  partnership  context  to  ad-
dress these challenges more through a market-based approach. 

As we’ve seen in Kentucky and in other states now, the market- 
based  approach  can  get  us  a  lot  further  along  the  path  than  what 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

45 

we  are  today.  So  I  would  encourage  a  look  at  that,  the  Broadband 
Data Improvement Act. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Senator McCaskill? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  As  I  looked  at 
this issue, I thought, well, there has got to be a program out there 
that’s  been  done  by  Congress  to  help  rural  broadband  access  and 
I  found  one.  It  is  a  program  that,  according  to  a  September  2005 
Department  of  Agriculture  Inspector  General  report,  has  author-
ized  $2.9  billion  for  grants  and  loans  in  rural  areas.  Of  that,  as  of 
March  2005,  only  $181  million  had  been  advanced.  Only  $895  mil-
lion had been funded. The interesting thing about that as I looked 
into the program and looked to see if there were GAO or IG reports 
about it, I found an IG report that nails the program for essentially 
spending  a  huge  chunk  of  the  money  they’ve  spent  on  suburban 
communities—in  Houston,  Texas  and  Los  Angeles.  They  played 
with the definition, even though clearly when you read the bill and 
use  common  sense,  the  legislation  clearly  was  intended  to  get  to 
rural  communities  that  were  not  served,  not  to  suburban  commu-
nities  in  order  to  allow  someone  to  compete  with  other  providers 
who hadn’t received government loans and government grants. 

But in reality, that’s what happened. I’m curious, Mr. Mefford or 
Mr.  Scott  or  Dr.  Eisenach,  if  you’re  familiar  with  this  program.  I 
think,  frankly,  that  $2.9  billion  in  authorization  is  a  pretty  hefty 
authorization. 

I know that there is other legislation pending. I’ve been asked to 
cosponsor  legislation  to  help  do  the  things  like  you  did  in  Ken-
tucky. What’s wrong with the money that we’ve authorized and ap-
propriated being used for this and why isn’t it being used in a way, 
from your perspective, that would actually help solve this problem, 
instead  of  being  another  example  of  where  a  government  program 
isn’t  doing  what  it  was  designed  to  do  and  giving  money  to  folks 
it wasn’t designed to give money to? 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  Senator,  I  think  it’s  a  good  example  of  a  well-in-
tended  initiative  at  the  outset.  I  think  that  perhaps  the  agency 
would  tell  you  that  the  regulations  as  promulgated  perhaps  didn’t 
fit  the  intentions  to  give  them  the  flexibility  perhaps,  that  they 
need but instead of speaking to what they may or may not say, let 
me  speak  to  my—to  our  experiences  with  RUS  funding.  Of  the 
roughly  550,000  households  that  have  been  served  over  the  past  2 
years  in  Kentucky,  I  would  estimate  that  fewer  50,000  of  those 
were impacted by RUS funding and there are a number of reasons 
for that small proportion. 

The  process  is  an  arduous  process  and  it  is  one  that  is  put  on 
as  the  responsibility  of  the  providers  to  navigate.  In  Kentucky,  we 
took  responsibility  for  that,  navigating  that  process  on  behalf  of 
providers  so  bluntly,  I  think  that  a  lot  of  providers  look  at  what 
they  have  to  do  to  get  those  dollars  and  just  decide,  we  don’t 
have—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. It’s not worth it? 
Mr. MEFFORD. It’s not worth it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

46 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  What  makes  you  think  another  program 
done  by  government  is  going  to  be  worth  it,  if  we  did  one  and  it 
was  so  bad  that  people  threw  up  their  hands  rather  than  partici-
pate in it? 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  Well,  I  think  there  is  the  opportunity  to  take  the 
previous  three  and  a  half  years,  4  years  and  learn  from  the  chal-
lenges  of  that  program,  frankly.  I  think  that  one  example  is  that 
the  RUS  funds  cannot  be  used—the  grant  funds  cannot  be  used— 
the  definition  is  very  restrictive  and  so  in  Kentucky,  we  have  ap-
plied  for  RUS  funds  and  received  RUS  funds  for  all  of  our  eligible 
communities  yet  we  still  have  our  toughest  to  serve  areas  remain-
ing unserved. So the program is now irrelevant for Kentucky, based 
on current regulation. 

Senator MCCASKILL. It’s so frustrating to me that rather than fix 
a  program  that  we’ve  created,  we’re  going  to  go  create  other  pro-
grams.  Money  has  been  authorized.  Projects  have  been  funded. 
Very  little  of  that  money  has  been  advanced.  It  is  such  a  good  ex-
ample  of  Congress  wanting  to  do  the  right  thing,  and  reading  the 
law, it’s pretty clear what they were trying to do was to get service 
to  unserved  areas.  They  weren’t  trying  to  provide  competition  in 
areas  that  were  already  served,  and  they  certainly  weren’t  trying 
to  help  wealthy  suburbs  in  Houston,  Texas.  It  seems  to  me  what 
we  should  be  soliciting  is  advice  from  you  and  others  that  have 
tried to utilize this program and fix that program rather than say-
ing,  ‘‘okay,  let’s  start  another  one  because—you  know,  the  regula-
tions  that  are  so  difficult?’’  Guess  who  did  it?  Them.  They  are  the 
ones that did the regulations. It wasn’t you all that did the regula-
tions, and it wasn’t Congress that did the regulations. In fact, they 
have  rewritten  the  definition  of  rural.  It  was  one  definition  and 
then another and now another, and the definition was such that it 
did  not  limit  it  to  those  areas  that  were  unserved  and  struggling. 
I know you have a community of people out there that are trying 
to do exactly what you’ve done with ConnectKentucky. I would ap-
preciate the opportunity to try to take a 2x4 to that agency and fix 
that  program  so  we  can  use  that  money  and  make  that  bureauc-
racy responsive as opposed to saying, ‘‘Well, we wasted that money. 
Let’s  start  another  one  with  no  assurances  that  we’re  not  going  to 
have the same darn thing happen again.’’ 

Dr.  EISENACH.  Senator  McCaskill,  if  I  could  jump  in  because  it’s 
a program I have some experience with. I’ve been through the RUS 
application  process  with  a  client.  I’ve  watched  very  closely  what 
has  happened  with  the  Central  Virginia  Electric  Cooperative  in 
Virginia  and  I  think  I  would  say,  I  share  your  sense,  first  of  all, 
that this is a program that can and should work. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Right. 
Dr.  EISENACH.  There  is  a  lot  going  for  this  program  and  one  of 
the  things  I  think  it  has  going  for  it  is  that  it  does  demand  of  the 
applicant  some  evidence,  some  showing  that  the  applicant  has  a 
business plan—the technology is going to work and so forth. In the 
case of IBEC and the Central Virginia Electric Cooperative in Cen-
tral Virginia, we’re looking at a broadband over power line deploy-
ment and that technology I think has tremendous promise. 

I  think  its  application  in  rural  areas  is  on  the  verge  of  coming 
to fruition. And I think the fact that the RUS provided a loan guar-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

47 

antee to IBEC and CVEC to put in place that system has been es-
sential  to  that  initiative  and  I  think  the  odds  are  very  high  that 
initiative  is  going  to  work.  I  think  the  potential  in  the  RUS  pro-
gram is that it can be a very efficient way of leveraging dollars and 
for that $2.9 billion in guaranteed loan funding, we should be able 
to  get  a  lot  of  bang  for  our  buck,  as  it  were  and  again,  I’d  come 
back and look at some other areas where we’re spending a tremen-
dous amount of money and the Universal Service program, frankly, 
is one of them where we’re spending close to a billion dollars right 
now to provide what are essentially second telephone lines to wire-
less  consumers  in  the  United  States  where  when  we  don’t  have 
broadband availability—any kind of connection in large slots of the 
country.  So  when  you  look  at  the  bang  for  the  buck  that  is  poten-
tial  in  the  RUS  program,  as  compared  to  some  other  programs,  I 
think it is extremely attractive and I think you’re right. A lot more 
focus  on  what  we  need  to  do  to  get  that  program  rolling  is  exactly 
what’s needed. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  I  would  appreciate  any  input  you 
would have on the problems of that program. I don’t have time be-
cause  my  time  is  up  and  I  would  also  like  to  talk—maybe  I  can 
with  the  second  panel—about  the  Universal  Service  Fund,  monies 
that  consumers  are  paying  all  over  the  country  to  provide  phone 
service  in  under-served  areas.  Well,  that’s  dated.  Clearly  the  Uni-
versal  Service  Fund  that  is  out  there  that  consumers  are  paying 
for—it’s a pass-through cost—clearly, we should be capturing those 
monies  to  do  some  of  the  things  that  we’ve  talked  about  here  this 
morning. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
Senator STEVENS. Mr. Chairman, can I comment on that? 
The CHAIRMAN. Please. 
Senator  STEVENS.  On  what  the  Senator  said.  Senator,  I’m  in-
formed  that  the  problem  really  is,  is  that  broadband  speeds  for 
wireless  are  slower,  and  basically  in  the  rural  areas,  we’re  using 
wireless and satellite and therefore, these areas were ineligible. 

Last  year,  we  had  broadband  proposals  in  various  titles  in  our 
bill, which I hope we’ll address again. We had Universal Service re-
form, an extra $500 million for broadband deployment by Universal 
Service.  We  tried  a  streamlined  franchise  reform.  I  don’t  want  to 
take  a  lot  of  time  but  the  white  spaces  concept  and  the  municipal 
broadband title really got into the whole question of deployment on 
a  municipal  basis  rather  than  statewide  basis—all  of  those  were 
designed to try and deal with the problem you mentioned. 

But the problem basically is that we can’t just use the legacy sys-
tems of cable and wire. In Europe, they were wired and they were 
able  to  go  into  broadband  deployment  much  faster  because  they 
don’t have these distant areas like we do in Alaska and Hawaii. As 
a  matter  of  fact,  the  West  itself  was  just  not  wired.  Wireless 
brought  new  communications  methods  to  these  people  but  by  defi-
nition,  it’s  slower  and  not  adaptable  to  this  new  concept.  We  have 
to  find  some  way  to  adapt  it  and  I  think  we  have  to  find  a  new 
way to define Universal Service so it covers these areas and is not 
limited,  as  it  is  now,  to  a  voice  system.  It  is  the  data  deployment 
in rural America that is necessary to catch up with Europe. Thank 
you, Mr. Chairman. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

48 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  Mr.  Chairman,  if  I  might—I’m  sorry.  Again,  I 
would  be  remiss  if  I  did  not  include  in  my  comments  in  response 
to  Senator  McCaskill  that  the  agency—we  have  been  in  contact 
with the agency fairly extensively on—— 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  When  you  say  the  agency,  you’re  talking 

about RUS? 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  RUS,  yes,  ma’am,  on  changes  that  they  are  hope-
ful to make and I think some additional flexibility would be helpful 
in  their  efforts,  obviously.  Another  example  is  of  where  they  could 
use  some  assistance,  I  think,  is  in  the  fact  that  while  it  is  a  $2.9 
billion  program  in  total,  only  $8  million  is  set  aside  annually  for 
the grant program. So perhaps—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. That seems weird, doesn’t it? 
Mr.  MEFFORD.  It  does  and  so  when  you  have  50  states  applying 

for $8 million annually, it makes it a tough program. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Do  the  math.  Right.  So  they  are  basically 
being  stingy  with  the  grants  and  wanting  people  to  do  the  loans 
and  they’ve  made  the  hoops  you  jump  through  for  the  loans  so  in-
credible that it’s not cost effective for companies to access them. 

The  interesting  thing  is,  they  need  additional  time  and  input, 
and  of  course,  this  was  in  the  2002  farm  bill.  We’re  getting  ready 
to rewrite the farm bill, and they still haven’t figured it out. No one 
would ever accuse them of going quickly on this stuff, and frankly, 
this  is  an  area  where  we  ought  to  go  quickly.  Government  ought 
to  be  a  lot  more  nimble  when  we’re  talking  about  technology  be-
cause if you’re not nimble, then you have a tendency to waste a lot 
of  money  because  by  the  time  you  figure  out  what  you’ve  been 
working on, you’re already 10 years behind. Thank you, Mr. Chair-
man. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Arkansas  has  just 
passed  a  new  law  called  Connect  Arkansas  Broadband  Act,  spon-
sored  by  a  friend  of  mine  down  there,  John  Paul  Capps.  The  bill 
would  create  a  public/private  partnership  aimed  at  increasing  the 
broadband  coverage  for  health,  industry,  education  and  general 
economic development. I would like to ask about the Kentucky pro-
gram  and  how  much  can  we  learn  from  what’s  going  on  in  Ken-
tucky and how successful has the Kentucky program been? 

Mr. MEFFORD. Thank you, Senator. Mr. Chairman, I’m glad to be 
able  to  tell  you  that  we  have  been  working  hand-in-hand  with  the 
folks  in  Arkansas  to  help  develop  the  legislation  that  was  passed 
and  continue  to  work  with  them  on  the  creation  of  the  public/pri-
vate  partnership.  The  examples  and  the  model  that  we’ve  devel-
oped in Kentucky originally is highly transferable to every state in 
the Nation. 

Senator PRYOR. Are other states doing it? 
Mr. MEFFORD. Yes, sir. 
Senator PRYOR. Do you know about how many? 
Mr.  MEFFORD.  Well,  Connected  Nation,  our  company  is  engaged 
on  various  levels  with  probably  a  dozen  different  states  and  they 
range across the board in terms of size and geography. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

49 

Senator  PRYOR.  Should  there  be  a  national  level  or  does  this 

work better at the state level? 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  I  think  that  there  is  a  good  opportunity  in  the 
Broadband  Data  Improvement  Act  that  the  Chairman  mentioned 
earlier to empower states—for the Federal Government to empower 
states  to  develop  and  implement  these  types  of  initiatives.  I  think 
it’s  very  important  that  this  is  a  state-based  effort  but  states  need 
more impetus right now to, as Senator McCaskill said, to hurry up 
and get something done. 

Senator PRYOR. As I understand it, you see an increase in capital 
investment, you see a growth in broadband availability around the 
state and you see distribution of computers to underprivileged chil-
dren  in  under-served  communities,  which  I  think  is  great.  But 
what  are  the  big  obstacles  out  there?  What  should  Arkansas  have 
to look forward to in terms of obstacles that we have to overcome? 
Mr. MEFFORD. I think a significant obstacle in the bigger picture 
of  this  type  of  discussion  is  the  fact  that  we  need  to  always  con-
sider  the  demand-side  of  the  equation.  It  is  not  a  field  of  dreams 
prospect  where  we  can  solve  all  of  our  Nation’s  technology-based 
ills by just building the infrastructure. 

We  have  to  focus—whether  it’s  Arkansas  or  Kentucky  or  Cali-
fornia—no  matter  the  state,  we  have  to  focus  on  demand  creation, 
demand  aggregation  type  efforts.  We  have  done  that  through  our 
e-Community  Leadership  Teams  where  we  are  at  the  very  grass-
roots of each of our counties, working to raise the awareness of the 
importance of technology and why our parents should provide their 
children  with  an  Internet  connected  computer  for  doing  homework 
and  so  forth  and  gathering  healthcare  type  information,  and  it’s 
those basic grassroots awareness building efforts that are so impor-
tant in these types of efforts. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Let  me  ask  the  panel  something  generally.  You 
know,  when  you  look  at  some  lists  at  least,  Arkansas  is  47th  out 
of  50  in  terms  of  broadband  deployment.  But  how  reliable  are  the 
numbers?  I  understand  there  are  some  gaps  in  the  stats  and  the 
reporting  from  state  to  state  or  maybe  even  company-to-company 
is  not  maybe  as  consistent  as  it  should  be?  When  you  say  we’re 
47th, does that mean we’re really 47th or do we really have a clear 
picture of what’s going on out there? 

Mr.  SCOTT.  You  don’t  really  have  a  clear  picture  but  the  picture 
is  murky  for  everybody.  To  the  extent  that  there  are  mistakes 
across  the  board,  it’s  unlikely  that  one  state  would  jump  up  the 
ranks if we had more granular data. However, when we go to solve 
the problems and try to identify where the gaps in the market are, 
that’s  when  it  really  breaks  down  and  having  that  data  would  be 
invaluable. 

The  problem  with  the  Zip  Code  method  is  in  a  state  like  Arkan-
sas  where  you’ve  got  a  large  area  in  each  Zip  Code  and  the  popu-
lation  is  spread  out  and  if  one  customer  has  a  DSL  line,  then  ev-
erybody is counted as covered—that could mean that 90 percent of 
that  Zip  Code  has  no  coverage  but  you  don’t  know  that.  So  in  our 
view,  you’ve  got  to  collect  data  down  to  the  zip  plus  four  level  so 
that  you  can  aggregate  those  together  and  match  them  to  census 
records so you can get a better idea of who has broadband and who 
doesn’t and who they are so you can target your programs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

50 

I  also  think  you  need  to  measure  speed  and  price  so  you  can 
identify certain sections of Arkansas that are paying way more for 
less speed than others and why is that and what can we do to rem-
edy it. 

Dr.  EISENACH.  Senator  Pryor,  I  would  add  to  that.  First  of  all, 
I think the data are unreliable. It’s not entirely clear what they are 
measuring for all the reasons we’ve talked about. 

One  thing  I  would  mention  that  has  not  been  talked  about  here 
yet today—it has been discussed a little bit at the Federal Commu-
nications  Commission.  It’s  something  I  think  this  Committee 
should  consider  looking  at,  is  the  power  of  geographic  mapping 
software.  Literally  every  wire  center  in  the  United  States  can  be 
identified  by  its  geographic  coordinates  and  the  streets  that  are 
served  by  that  wire  center  can  be  mapped  out.  The  same  is  true 
for  cable—cable  modem,  cable  voice.  The  same  is  true  for  maps 
showing the coverage areas of wireless, both fixed and mobile wire-
less. 

I gather from the map that we see here from Kentucky that that 
is  the  sort  of  the  software  that  they  utilized  in  their  project.  It  is 
the  sort  of  software  that  I  utilized  in  the  work  that  I’ve  done  in 
Virginia, very similar. The maps at the back of my testimony were 
produced  using  that  software  and  one  thing  I  think  that  we  really 
ought  to  be  asking  the  FCC  is,  at  what  point  do  you  move  from 
what is essentially an archaic technological approach to measuring 
things  by  predefined  areas  to  moving  to  a  geographic  mapping 
technology, which literally can tell you exactly where on the map— 
which street, which mountain, which valley—actually has coverage 
and from whom. 

So I think we may be sort of taking a blunt 20th century instru-
ment when 21st century technology could give us much smarter an-
swers. 

Senator  PRYOR.  You  may  have  just  answered  my  next  question, 
which is my last question I was going to ask Mr. Scott. In your tes-
timony, you say that the ‘‘FCC has not embraced a free market ap-
proach  to  enabling  competition  but  rather  supported  the  en-
trenched,  incumbency  of  a  rigid  duopoly.’’  What  do  you  mean  by 
that? 

Mr. SCOTT. I’ll try to give a short answer to a complex situation. 
Over the last several years, if you look at competition in broadband 
policy,  for  the  last  10  years,  there  were  efforts  to  introduce  com-
petition in the market that were gradually dismantled by the FCC 
over a series of rulings and we, as a philosophical matter, the FCC 
has  decided  that  competition  between  technologies  rather  than 
competition within technologies is the key to the competition prob-
lem. 

So they have instituted policies that support the business models 
of  the  incumbents  in  hopes  that  will  produce  the  kind  of  robust 
competition that will bring broadband everywhere. And in my view, 
it hasn’t worked. That’s what I meant by that. 

Dr.  EISENACH.  Senator,  may  I?  I  just  have  to  add  one  thing  to 
that.  If  you  turn  to  Figure  1  in  my  testimony,  you  see  what  Mr. 
Scott is talking about. The low point on the investment curve here 
is the point at which the FCC took the actions that Mr. Scott com-
plains  about.  What  happened  to  investment  after  those  actions 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

51 

were taken is investment went up 40 percent. What he proposes is 
that  we  return  to  the  low  point  on  this  chart  with  a  lot  of  policies 
that  essentially  punish  investment  in  telecommunications  infra-
structure.  What  has  worked  is  what  we  are  doing  today  and  what 
we  should  be  doing  more  of,  not  going  back  to  the  policies  of  the 
late 1990s, which I think unambiguously failed. 

Mr.  SCOTT.  If  I  might  offer  one  counterpoint  to  that,  which  is, 
there  was  the  crash  of  the  tech  bubble  around  in  there  that  re-
sulted  in  a  decline  in  investment  and  I  would  argue  also  that  in-
vestment is far more responsive to competition. The competition in 
the  Bell  Networks  is  much  more  responsive  to  the  cable  networks 
getting  voice  capabilities  and  stealing  phone  customers  than  it  is 
to  the  policy  prescriptions  that  the  FCC  institutes  or  doesn’t  insti-
tute. 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  I  would  add  that  these  two  are  not  mutually  ex-
clusive.  I  mean,  there  is  an  opportunity  to  gather  data  that  is  a 
purpose  driven  exercise  that  providers  can  get  behind,  participate 
in and collaborate with. 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Chairman, thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Senator Thune? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator THUNE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman and Senator Stevens. 
I  want  to  thank  you  for  holding  the  hearing  today  and  also  thank 
our witnesses for their testimony and input on how we can improve 
an  already  lightning  fast  rollout  of  advanced  telecommunication 
services,  including  broadband  that  we  are  currently  experiencing 
here  in  the  United  States,  and  I  would  just  preface  it  by  saying 
that  a  lot  of  Americans  are  enjoying  the  benefits  of  these  types  of 
Internet  connections  that  can  enhance  our  quality  of  life  in  terms 
of education, entertainment, healthcare, business but there is more 
work  that  can  be  done  in  getting  that  broadband  access  into  the 
farthest  reaches  of  our  country  and  many  of  those  areas  are  in 
places like my home state of South Dakota. 

And I know that it has got to be a combined effort at state, local 
and Federal levels, the government along with private industry. So 
we’re going to have to remain flexible in terms of deployment poli-
cies  and  programs  as  well  as  technologies  because  I  don’t  think 
there is a one-size-fits-all approach to this effort. 

But  it  is  important  to  remember  that  it  is  worth  the  effort. 
Broadband  deployment  means  better  jobs.  It  means  better  edu-
cation and a better quality of life so I look forward to working with 
the members of this Committee and other stakeholders as we tack-
le the issue. 

Mr.  Mefford,  in  your  testimony,  you  mentioned  the  fact  that  in 
Kentucky,  you  had  to  encourage  both  supply  and  demand  for 
broadband  services.  I  want  to  highlight  that  point  because  I  think 
in  some  rural  areas,  we  need  to  focus  on  stimulating  demand  for 
broadband  as  well  and  need  to  ensure  that  Americans  living  in 
rural  areas  understand 
in  business, 
healthcare  and  education,  simply  that  comes  from  ordering  that 
broadband  connection.  Can  you  expand  a  little  bit  on  that  point 
and explain how you stimulated demand in Kentucky? 

the  possible  benefits 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

52 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  Yes,  sir.  Senator  Thune,  thank  you  for  the  ques-
tion  and  I’m  happy  to  expand  on  that.  We  have  created  in  each  of 
the  120  counties  in  Kentucky,  local  leadership  teams  that  we  call 
E-Community  Leadership  Teams.  These  leadership  teams  are  rep-
resentative of a cross-section of each local community. 

So  we  have  leaders  at  one  table  from  local  government,  edu-
cation,  healthcare,  business  and  industry,  agriculture,  tourism, 
community  development  organizations—all  these  people  literally 
sitting around the same table and we take them through a process 
where  we  first  ask,  how  are  you  using  technology  today,  in  this 
community,  in  this  sector?  Then  we  do  a  visioning  type  exercise. 
How  could  you  better  use  technology  that  is  existing  and  that  will 
become  available  in  the  near  future?  And  we  give  them  examples 
of  what  other,  similar  communities  and  sectors  are  doing  around 
the  country  and  in  fact,  around  the  world.  Then  we  give  them  a 
tactical plan that says here are the things you need to do to bridge 
that  gap.  Here’s  where  you  say  you  want  to  be  and  here’s  where 
you need to be. 

Now, the practical realities that have come out of that process— 
one  example  is  in  healthcare.  We  had  one  very  rural  county  in 
eastern  Kentucky  where  those  folks  sitting  around  the  table—you 
had  a  public  health  organization  that  said,  well,  we  really  would 
like to get into E-Health somehow, telemedicine is where we would 
like  to  focus  and  the  local  community  college  said,  well,  that’s  a 
piece of curriculum that we’ve been interested in developing so let’s 
partner together and make these initial investments. 

Well,  we  had,  from  the  business  and  industry  sector,  a  local  co- 
operator  present  for  that  discussion,  and  he  said,  well,  if  you’d  de-
velop a tele-health unit, we can literally roll that unit up to the top 
of the hill and we can do health screenings and things like that for 
my  employees.  That  happened  and  enough  time  has  now  passed 
where  we  now  know  that  business’s  health  insurance  rates  have 
declined and so has absenteeism rates. 

I  give  that  as  an  example  of  a  real  life  observation  of  how  that 
demand  side  activity,  how  it  works  and  how  it  provides  dramatic 
results  for  a  variety  of  sectors  but  at  the  same  time,  as  the  pro-
viders  see  that  kind  of  demand  creation  happening,  they  are  more 
interested again in a market-driven type way, they are more inter-
ested  in  making  more  investments  in  that  community  because 
bandwidth needs are expanding and use has increased. 

Senator  THUNE.  I  appreciate  it.  It’s  been  mentioned,  I  think,  in 
some  of  the  testimony  that  population  density  is  a  key  factor  in 
broadband  deployment  and  I  want  to  just  note  a  couple  of  other 
countries  around  the  world.  Denmark,  which  is  at  the  top  of  the 
list for broadband deployment, has a population density of 128 peo-
ple per square kilometer. 

The Netherlands, which is second on the list, has 466 people per 
square  kilometer.  The  United  States,  which  comes  in  at  12th,  has 
32 people per square kilometer and in my home state of South Da-
kota,  we  have  3.8  people  per  square  kilometer.  But  I  guess  the 
question I would have, and I open this up to anybody on the panel, 
is the United States implementing the right programs and policies 
for broadband deployment for our unique geography and population 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

53 

density  and  will  we  ever  be  able  to  reach  the  level  of  broadband 
penetration of those countries at the top of the list? 

Mr.  SCOTT.  I  can  speak  to  that  question,  Senator  Thune.  While 
I  just  happen  to  have  the  population  density  statistics  in  front  of 
me and you’re right that the top four countries have very high pop-
ulation  densities.  The  next  four  have  really  low  population  den-
sities  and  there  is  an  intuitive  sort  of  thought  that  it  has  got  to 
be population density that’s a problem. 

We  studied  that  question  and  studied  that  question  and  cal-
culated  all  the  variables  and  when  you’re  comparing  data  on  the 
aggregate  between  countries,  it  doesn’t  explain  it.  As  you  get  out 
into  the  rural  areas,  there  are  policies  that  you  need  to  have  in 
place  to  bring  broadband  to  those  areas  but  it  doesn’t  explain  our 
performance relative to other countries. So that’s one point. 

The second point is, I absolutely agree that universal service pro-
grams  aimed  at  broadband  deployment  are  an  essential  part  of 
bringing  broadband  to  those  gaps  in  the  networks  and  the  gaps  in 
the networks are disproportionately in rural areas and the Dakotas 
are at the top of the list. 

Dr.  EISENACH.  Senator,  two  things.  One,  your  point  about  den-
sity,  I  think,  is  well  taken  and  it  is  a  little  bit  more  complex  than 
just  people  per  square  kilometer  or  square  mile.  One  of  the  things 
that affects the speed at which we rolled out our broadband in the 
U.S.  is  the  fact  that  the  copper  line  links  in  the  United  States  are 
much  longer  than  the  copper  line  links  in  Europe,  all  other  things 
being equal, even setting aside population densities. So the way we 
built  our  telecommunications  infrastructure  50  and  100  years  ago, 
is  now  affecting  our  ability  to  roll  out  broadband  over  DSL  lines 
because  DSL  only  works  within  about  18,000  feet  of  a  central  of-
fice.  So  what  we  have  had  is  a  much  higher  cost  per  household 
reached  over  copper  than  they’ve  experienced  in  the  European 
Union. 

Now  what  you’ve  seen  with  rural  telephone  companies  is  you’ve 
seen  them  putting  those  universal  service  subsidies  to  work  to 
build fiber optics much more deeply into their network. OPASTCO 
(Organization  for  the  Promotion  and  Advancement  of  Small  Tele-
communications Companies), which is the association of small tele-
phone  companies,  reports  that  roughly  90  percent  of  customers  of 
small  rural  telephone  companies  now  have  DSL  or  in  many  cases, 
increasingly, fiber to the home. 

In fact, fiber to the home is being built out in a lot of rural com-
munities  faster  than  it  is  being  built  out  in  a  lot  of  urban  commu-
nities in America, thanks to the availability of those subsidies. 

The only other thing I’d say, which was discussed earlier, is that 
while  the  Rural  Utility  Service  broadband  grant  and  loan  guar-
antee  programs,  I  think,  have  been  implemented  imperfectly.  The 
underlying  principle  there,  which  is  leveraging  private  money  and 
particularly  with  those  loan  guarantees,  I  think  is  very  sound  and 
that is a way to target, as we think about what do we do going for-
ward  with  targeting  our  funding  wisely  on  filling  in  the  gaps  on 
broadband.  The  RUS  programs  and  programs  like  that,  that  are 
targeted  and  that  leverage  private  sector  money,  I  think,  are  the 
kinds of programs we ought to be looking at. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

54 

Senator  THUNE.  OK.  I  appreciate  that,  and  that’s  one  of  my  ob-
servations,  too,  that  many  of  those  programs  are  building,  dupli-
cating in areas where you already have some form of service as op-
posed  to  going  into  those  areas  that  don’t,  and  I  think  that  really 
needs  to  be  the  focus  of  those  programs,  is  delivering  and  expand-
ing the scope. Many of the teleco’s in our state, small teleco’s, have 
done  a  good  job  of,  as  you  said,  using  universal  funds  to  reach  out 
to  under-served  areas  but  these  programs  that  we  have  that  pro-
vide incentives, provide capital, I think, do need to be targeted with 
an eye toward those under-developed and under-served areas. 

Dr. EISENACH. Senator, just one thing that I think really does de-
serve  some  attention  is  that  we  now  have  in  Mississippi,  we  have 
areas of Mississippi where we have 16 mobile telephone companies 
receiving universal service subsidies for serving precisely the same 
service territory and we’re talking about real money. We’re talking 
about a billion dollars a year, I think over $100 million a year just 
going to the state of Mississippi in order that people can have sec-
ond  and  third  and  fourth  phone  lines,  in  order  that  when  a  family 
of  five  gets  five  mobile  telephones,  two  parents  and  three  kids— 
quintuples  the  amount  of  universal  service  subsidies  that  is  being 
received  by  whatever  wireless  carrier  is  providing  those  five  tele-
phones. 

Now, we’d all like to have free cell phones for our kids but is that 
the  best  use  of  government  funding  at  a  time  when  there  are  big 
areas  of  the  United  States—Alaska  and  Hawaii  among  them  and 
your state, of course, where we do not have any kind of broadband 
at all? 

Senator THUNE. I appreciate that. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  I’m  glad  Senator  Thune 
brought up the matter of population density. The top five countries 
are  Denmark,  Netherlands,  Korea,  Switzerland  and  Iceland.  They 
are  all  dense,  densely  populated,  smaller  in  acreage  than  the 
United  States.  That’s  one  of  the  problems.  But  my  question  is, 
whenever  people  give  speeches  in  Washington,  they  often  times 
used the word, superpower, to describe the United States so I pre-
sume  an  element  of  pride  is  involved.  But  I  want  to  go  beyond 
pride.  What  impact  do  these  statistics  have  on  the  quality  of  life 
of Americans? On employment, unemployment, on education levels 
and  such?  Is  it  at  a  dangerous  level?  Should  we  be  concerned?  Or 
is this what we can expect? 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  I  would  address  it  to  say,  in  Kentucky,  it  has 
made  all  the  difference  in  the  world  for  these  less  densely  popu-
lated  areas  particularly.  So  when  you  were  talking  about  our  abil-
ity  to  compete  beyond  our  metropolitan  areas—that  is,  where  hav-
ing  this  infrastructure  in  place  is,  in  my  opinion,  critical.  So  as 
we’ve  seen  in  Kentucky,  we  have  kids  who  have  left  and  took  jobs 
in other places, have now come back to Kentucky. 

Now, on a national level, if we did nothing from this day forward, 
which  we’re  confident  won’t  happen  but  if  that  happened,  then 
those  kids  would  be  going  to  other  countries  for  jobs  that  were  at-
tractive  instead  of  just  moving  from  state  to  state  within  the 
United  States.  Our  ability  to  work  efficiently  and  effectively  from 
any location is enabled through this advanced infrastructure. Edu-
cation is able to improve just exponentially in what type of content 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

55 

we can deliver directly to our children, again, no matter where they 
live.  Healthcare  is  able  to  be  delivered  in  a  similar  fashion  where 
we have folks in rural Kentucky who are accessing physicians from 
our  major  metropolitan  areas.  So  again,  we  have  seen  that  this  is 
just vitally important, particularly to our rural communities. 

Mr.  SCOTT.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  I  can  provide  some  numbers 
and I’m pleased to say these numbers come from a study that was 
done  in  2003  by  Dr.  Eisenach’s  firm,  Criterion  Economics.  I  thank 
you  for  those.  They  are  very  informative.  In  2003,  the  broadband 
penetration rate in this country was 20 percent and the economists 
at  Criterion  determined  that  the  consumer  surplus  for  the  country 
at a 20 percent penetration rate was $10 billion. 

But  what  they  showed  is  that  for  every  point  of  increase  in  the 
percentage of penetration, the amount of consumer surplus doesn’t 
increase linearly. It increases on an exponential curve. So if we had 
a 50 percent broadband penetration rate, the annual consumer sur-
plus  would  be  $38  billion  and  if  we  had  a  95  percent  broadband 
penetration  rate,  the  annual  consumer  surplus  would  be  $350  bil-
lion,  at  which  point  we’re  talking  about  real  money  in  this  econ-
omy. Every single point matters as we go up that scale. 

Dr. EISENACH. Senator, I guess I’d make first of all the point that 
coming back to my reference to Sputnik earlier on, maybe the par-
allel really is there. When the Russians launched Sputnik in 1957, 
I  think  there  was  tremendous  concern  that  was  emblematic  that 
the U.S. had really fallen dramatically behind in a key technology, 
that the Russians were ahead of the U.S. in space technology. That 
wasn’t true. 

What  was  true  is  that  they  were  more  focused  on  it  and  at  that 
particular moment in time, they managed to do something that we 
sure wish we had done first. I suspect the same is true today, that 
the  underlying  fundamentals  in  the  United  States  are  pretty 
strong,  but  that  we  do  need  to  get  focused  as  we  did  in  1957  and 
thereafter, on making sure that we do the right things. 

Now  the  larger  question  is,  is  the  fundamental  underlying  ap-
proach  that  we’re  taking  today,  which  is  essentially  to  rely  on  the 
marketplace and to generate competition among infrastructures. Is 
that  the  right  approach  or  should  we  go  back  to  the  approach  we 
tried in the late 1990s? 

As  I  see  what  is  happening  in  the  markets—Mr.  Scott  talks 
about  a  cable/telephone  duopoly  but  then  he  says  that,  in  fact, 
every  time  cable  invests,  telephones  invest  more.  Telephones  in-
vest,  cable  invests  more.  That’s  what  I  see  with  my  eyes.  That 
sounds  like  competition  to  me  and  then  I  look  at  Sprint  making  a 
$3 billion investment in a nationwide WiMax network. 

I look at what the wireless—mobile wireless companies are doing 
in  rolling  out  what  are  really  very  capable  broadband  networks.  I 
look at what Virginia Broadband is doing in Rappahannock County 
and  this  whole  central  part  of  Virginia,  which  is  another  wireless 
network  and  I  see  competition  among  infrastructures.  And  I  see 
that  as  being  extremely  healthy  and  a  path  that  we  should  con-
tinue, not back away from. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  have  many  other  questions  I’d  like  to  submit. 
I  just  note  that  we  have  another  panel  but  I  was  very  shocked  by 
the  statistics  I  just  read  a  few  days  ago.  Last  year,  in  all  the  col-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

56 

leges  and  universities,  40  percent  of  the  Ph.D.  doctorates  were 
granted  to  non-Americans  and  of  that  number,  I  think  80  percent 
went home to their countries. Is that a matter that should concern 
us? 

Mr.  MEFFORD.  Again,  that  validates  and  substantiates  this  fear 
that there is a risk of exodus of our intellectual talent, particularly 
and so the point earlier of what we’ve seen in Kentucky as we have 
focused  on  this  infrastructure  and  seen  jobs  created—again  14,500 
in  the  last  2  years  in  Kentucky,  technology  jobs  alone—that  Ph.D. 
trend  has  reversed  itself.  So  now  we  have  nearly  double  the  num-
ber  of  Ph.D.  candidates  who  finish  programs  staying  in  Kentucky. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  To  the  panel,  thank  you  very  much.  The  record 
will  be  kept  open  for  2  weeks  and  if  we  may,  we’d  like  to  submit 
questions to you for your consideration. 

Mr. MEFFORD. Absolutely. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Mr. MEFFORD. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Our  next  panel  is  the  Chief  Technology  Officer 
and President of Advanced Technology Solutions, of Telcordia Tech-
nologies  and  Advisor  to  the  Board  of  Communications  Research, 
Telecommunications  Industry  Association,  Dr.  Adam  Drobot;  Pro-
fessor,  University  of  California  at  San  Diego  and  Vice  President  of 
Technology at QUALCOMM, Inc., Dr. Jack K. Wolf; and Senior Fel-
low  and  Director  of  Communication  Policy  Studies,  Progress  and 
Freedom Foundation, Dr. Scott Wallsten. 

Gentlemen, welcome and may I call on Dr. Drobot. 
STATEMENT OF DR. ADAM DROBOT, CHIEF TECHNOLOGY 

OFFICER AND PRESIDENT, ADVANCED TECHNOLOGY 
SOLUTIONS, TELCORDIA TECHNOLOGIES; ADVISOR TO 

THE BOARD, COMMUNICATIONS RESEARCH, 

TELECOMMUNICATIONS INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION 

Dr.  DROBOT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member  Ste-
vens and Members of the Committee. I am appearing today as the 
Chief  Technology  Officer  of  Telcordia.  I’m  responsible  for  its  re-
search  organization  and  also  an  advisor  to  the  Board  of  Tele-
communications  Industry  Association,  where  I  chair  the  Research 
Division,  which  is  composed  of  the  CTOs  of  our  600  members  and 
I’m  grateful  for  this  opportunity  to  be  able  to  testify  before  you 
today. 

I  think  the  first  point  I  would  like  to  make  is  that  communica-
tions  technology  is  not  just  another  thing  that’s  out  there.  It  is 
truly  vital  to  the  global  economy,  to  serve  as  its  central  nervous 
system, essentially, and it is really the foundation of what our soci-
eties will be based on in the future. 

As  an  industry,  as  you  look  at  it  broadly  in  the  United  States 
today, it represents 7.1 percent of our GDP. It affects all other sec-
tors  in  a  very  fundamental  way.  It  impacts  the  productivity  of  our 
industries,  of  our  economy,  educational  systems,  public  safety, 
healthcare  and  countless  other  functions  in  our  daily  lives.  I  think 
those functions will only grow as a matter of time. 

I  think  with  all  the  advances  we  have  seen  over  the  last  years, 
I’d  say  in  the  years  since  Sputnik,  what  you  will  find  is  that  we 
haven’t  seen  anything  yet.  The  underlying  technologies  that  have 
made  this  possible  continue  to  grow  at  exponential  rates  and  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

57 

nations  that  I  think  will  harness  these  technologies  are  ones  that 
will prosper in the future. 

If I were to steal the words from Bush, I think they ring as true 
today  that  all  of  this  affects  the  health,  general  welfare  and  de-
fense  of  our  population.  So  if  I  look  at  two  of  the  issues  we’d  like 
to  address  today,  one  is  communications  and  broadband  deploy-
ment and the other is the role of research. 

In broadband deployment, if you look at our next-generation sys-
tems,  I  think  it  is  necessary  to  have  incentives  to  deployment.  We 
have  heard  that  in  the  previous  panels  but  just  as  much,  removal 
of  barriers  and  experimentation  with  new  business  models  make 
this sustainable. 

In  the  past  several  years,  we  have  witnessed  a  demand  for 
broadband  growing  at  tremendous  rates.  In  the  U.S.,  the  market 
last year grew at 9.3 percent to come to almost $923 billion in rev-
enue, 11.2 percent worldwide. Somehow we have the feeling this is 
important  to  the  world  as  a  whole.  We  have  seen  technologies  like 
broadband video in the entertainment sector, Voice over IP, mobile 
data  services—all  of  those  flowering  at  this  point  in  time  and  as 
a  result,  cable  teleco’s,  wireless  operators  and  all  others  in  this 
field,  I  would  say  going  from  voice  to  Voice  over  IP,  the  bundle 
packages  to  consumers,  I  think  are  continuing  to  drive  down  costs 
and increase the services that are available. 

Broadband  video  is  one  of  the  driving  forces  behind  the  current 
deployment of things like fiber. It allows telephone carriers to com-
pete  with  the  cable  providers.  The  demand  for  broadband  has  also 
been propelled by Voice over IP. Whether it is by peer-to-peer Vice 
over IP or between service providers, again something that has had 
a great take up by consumers. 

The  forecast  is  that  34  percent  of  all  U.S.  residential  landlines 
in  2010  will,  in  fact,  be  based  on  broadband  Voice  over  IP  service. 
I would say there is a tremendous amount beyond entertainment. 
The  creation  and  sale  of  information  and  communication  tech-
nology  equipment  creates  jobs  in  our  economy.  I  think  if  you  look 
at  our  problems  in  healthcare,  it  has  a  tremendous  role  to  play 
there,  the  same  as  in  education,  financial  services,  transportation 
and public safety. 

What  is  important  to  TIA  and  its  membership  is  that  next-gen-
eration  communications  capabilities  will  be  available  and  will  fa-
cilitate  public  safety,  allow  our  nation’s  first  responders  to  assist 
the  public  in  times  of  emergencies  and  that  technology  also  plays 
a crucial role in the safety and security of our country. 

The  expectation  of  technology  in  telecoms  is  important  because 
it  has  a  day  to  day  impact  that  improves  the  productivity  of  indi-
viduals,  of  governments  and  corporations  and  that  allows  us  to  do 
new things and to do things that we have done in the past at much 
lower cost. The impact on the economy is really profound. 

There  was  a  point  in  time  that  for  information  and  communica-
tions  technology  the  U.S.  was  an  undisputed  source  of  ideas  and 
their implementation. Increasingly, we’re finding that the source of 
new ideas is as likely to come from Europe and Asia as it was from 
the United States. 

I’ll  cite  one  example  of  that.  SAP,  the  German  company,  recog-
nized early in time that the use of distributed systems, PCs, would 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

58 

allow  you  to  run  large  corporations  in  a  very  efficient  way.  They 
deployed  their  systems  ahead  of  anybody  else.  If  you  look  at  the 
world’s  largest  corporations,  they  tend  to  run  on  those  systems 
today  and  so  the  ability  to  creatively  use  new  technologies  is  no 
longer  a  monopoly  that  we  have.  We  share  it  with  the  rest  of  the 
world but it has an effect on our standing. 

I  believe  that  in  the  United  States,  we  must  focus  on  next-gen-
eration  broadband  services  and  capabilities,  especially  in  rural 
areas  because  it  brings  in  those  areas  to  become  part  of  the  world 
economy, essentially. 

I  think  it  was  mentioned  earlier  by  some  of  the  speakers,  the 
USDA  has  made  progress  through  no-interest  loans,  to  spur 
broadband  deployment  for  this  purpose.  While  there  may  be  ques-
tions  of  how  the  program  is  being  administered,  I  think  repairing 
it  and  making  it  deliver  on  its  promise  would  be  of  tremendous 
value. 

I think this is something where we must all work together to bal-
ance  the  role  between  government  involvement  and  incentives  in 
the private sector that are going to build our systems for us for the 
future.  We  should  first  determine  where  broadband  deployment 
has  not  occurred  and  why  so  that  we  can  identify  those  incentives 
and eliminate the barriers to moving forward. 

Let  me  now  turn  to  long-term  telecommunications  research.  I 
think it is the underpinning of what we do and that the impact on 
next-generation systems there again, is profound. 

Other countries have discovered the importance of basic research 
and  now  are  starting  to  reap  the  benefits.  If  you  were  to  take  a 
look at Framework Programs in the European Union, they are now 
starting  their  seventh  Framework  and  actual  programs  in  Korea, 
Taiwan,  Hong  Kong,  Singapore  and  Japan—all  of  those  are  part-
nerships  between  their  national  laboratories,  their  private  institu-
tions  and  government.  Those  programs  are  really  starting  to  ac-
complish pretty profound things. 

A  good  example  of  that  would  be  deployment  of  what’s  called 
WiBro  in  Korea.  It  is  a  form  of  WiMax.  What  they  have  done  is 
perfected  the  mobile  form  of  that,  which  delivers  high  speed  serv-
ices anytime, anyplace and they are likely to be the first geography 
in which that kind of service is actually deployed universally. 

Another  technology  that  again  started  in  the  United  States, 
IPV6,  the  next  generation  of  protocols  for  the  Internet,  was  really 
perfected  in  Europe  in  the  Fifth  and  Sixth  Framework.  While  the 
United States is still the single largest market for communications 
and has the most robust economy, we now fall behind others in the 
penetration of high speed broadband and we have not commercially 
brought next-generation services to consumers. 

What  I  believe  is  important  is  that  those  who  have  done  the  de-
ployment  are  now  experimenting  with  next-generation  business 
systems,  next-generation  e-Government  systems.  They  have  the 
test  beds  on  which  we  can  do  the  experimentation.  We  do  not,  at 
this point in time. 

The  experience  from  my  own  corporation,  in  fact,  finds  that  the 
ability  to  fund  research  of  a  pre-competitive  nature  early  on  is 
very,  very  difficult  to  do  and  sustain  for  the  long  term.  While  we 
were  part  of  the  Bell  System  before  divestiture,  where  there  was 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

59 

a mechanism for funding this kind of broad research, it is very dif-
ficult to do today in a very competitive industry. 

To  maintain  our  edge,  we  are  finding  the  necessity  to  rely  on 
growth  in  foreign  markets  and  are  facing  increasing  foreign  com-
petition,  which  is  advantaged  by  public  spending  in  the  local  mar-
kets and long range government funding. 

So  in  summary,  we  believe  there  are  a  number  of  things  that 
Congress  can  do  and  I  think  the  first  of  those  is  to  do  no  harm. 
It  is  vital  that  Congress  continue  in  its  current  path  and  facilitate 
deployment  of  next-generation  broadband  technology.  I  think  Con-
gress  has  already  taken  steps  in  that  direction  and  in  particular, 
we  commend  you  for  making  available  valuable  spectrum  through 
legislation  over  the  last  few  years.  Congress  must  continue  to  rec-
ognize that application services with a use for entertainment, pub-
lic  safety,  business  or  health  will  continue  to  be  the  single  largest 
driver of future broadband deployment. 

I’m  not  going  to  through  the  list  but  the  TIA  has  a  number  of 
governing  principles  that  it  has  enunciated,  including  universal 
availability, but in regard to our assessment of high speed Internet 
services  in  the  U.S.,  we  believe  it  will  be  very  useful  for  the  Fed-
eral  Government  to  create  a  set  of  metrics.  This  is  both  valuable 
to the public and to the service providers so we have transparency 
on  the  impacts  of  broadband,  where  it  exists,  where  it  doesn’t,  the 
quality  of  services,  what  the  rate  of  penetration  is,  and  what  it  is 
being  used  for.  That  kind  of  information,  in  fact,  would  allow  peo-
ple  to  make  much  more  informed  decisions  on  the  way  we  do  our 
investments. Second, we are asking the Federal Government to in-
vest more of its research dollars in this critical area. 

Before closing, I would like to share a number of examples where 
the impacts of this would really be profound on our citizens. In ev-
eryday  life,  devices  with  much  simpler  interfaces  but  at  the  same 
time,  much  more  functionality,  can  be  greatly  adopted  throughout 
our  society.  Everything  from  having  a  PC  or  a  camera,  HDTV, 
music  players,  things  of  that  sort,  without  a  button  in  sight.  If  I 
look at transportation, the deployment of communication networks, 
car-to-car  communications,  and  car  to  roadside  appliances,  can 
cause  a  reduction  in  traffic  accidents  and  deaths  and  again,  a  pro-
found impact on our Nation. 

If  I  look  at  our  aging  population,  healthcare  for  the  elderly,  the 
ability  to  look  after  chronic  diseases  from  diabetes  to  congestive 
heart  failure,  all  of  those  kinds  of  things  are  made  possible  by  the 
infrastructure  that  could  be  deployed.  I  would  say  last,  new  com-
mercial systems can really propel the economy. 

These  are  a  few  of  the  examples  among  many  that  correlate  our 
Nation’s next-generation communications infrastructure and its re-
lated services. New partnerships between industry and government 
are  needed  to  meet  tomorrow’s  challenges  to  position  the  United 
States  as  a  leader  in  the  world’s  economy.  Let  me  thank  you  for 
this opportunity and in particular, let me thank Senator Inouye for 
his  interest  in  funding  future  research  in  this  vital  area.  Thank 
you. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Drobot follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

60 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR.  ADAM DROBOT,  CHIEF TECHNOLOGY OFFICER AND 
PRESIDENT,  ADVANCED TECHNOLOGY SOLUTIONS,  TELCORDIA TECHNOLOGIES; 
ADVISOR TO THE BOARD,  COMMUNICATIONS RESEARCH,  TELECOMMUNICATIONS 
INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member  Stevens,  and  members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  I  am  appearing  today  as  the  Chief  Technology  Officer  of  Telcordia  Tech-
nologies  and  an  Advisor  to  the  Board  of  the  Telecommunications  Industry  Associa-
tion (TIA). 

I  am  grateful  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  among  this  distin-
guished  panel  of  witnesses  to  discuss  the  importance  of  communications  technology 
and broadband deployment to the United States’ competitiveness. 

Communications  technology  is  vital  to  the  global  economy,  serving  as  its  central 
nervous  system,  and  broadband  technology  will  be  the  foundation  of  21st  century 
global  communications  networks.  Telecommunications,  as  an  industry,  represents 
about  7.1  percent  of  our  gross  domestic  product  and  plays  a  fundamental  role  that 
touches all other industries, impacts the productivity of our industries and our econ-
omy,  and  pivotally  affects  public  safety,  education,  health  care,  and  countless  other 
functions in our daily lives. 

The  advances  we  can  expect  are  as  profound  and  far-reaching  as  what  we  have 
experienced  over  the  last  quarter  century—the  explosive  growth  of  the  Internet, 
computers  connected  by  high  speed  networks  driving  commerce  around  the  world, 
the  convenience  of  wireless  mobility,  and  information  services  which  are  changing 
everything from how we spend our time to how we interact with our fellow citizens. 
It is vital for the United States to maintain the leadership and future competitive-
ness in this critical industry—for the health, general welfare and defense of our pop-
ulation. 
Communications and Broadband Deployment Incentives 

Next-generation  broadband  communications  capabilities  are  dependent  upon  in-
centives, removal of barriers, and experimentation with new business models for de-
ployment.  In  the  past  several  years,  we  have  witnessed  the  demand  for  broadband 
and high-speed services fuel the revitalization and growth of telecommunications in-
dustry,  as  carriers  invest  in  new  fiber,  new  IP  technology  and  new  wireless  infra-
structure to provide state-of-the-art voice, video and data services. The U.S. market 
grew  9.3  percent  in  2006  to  total  $923  billion  in  revenue,  and  the  worldwide  tele-
communications  market  grew  11.2  percent  to  total  $3  trillion,  according  to  TIA’s 
Market Review & Forecast. 

We  have  seen  technologies  like  broadband  video,  Voice  over  Internet  protocol  or 
VoIP,  as  well  as  new  mobile  data  services,  spark  new  growth  in  the  telecommuni-
cations  industry.  As  a  result,  cable,  telcos,  wireless,  and  others  are  offering  more 
competitive all-in-one bundled packages, and consumers are seeing lower prices and 
more services. 

Broadband  video  is  one  driving  force  behind  deployment  of  the  state-of-the-art 
fiber needed to carry the high-capacity signal; it allows telephone carriers to provide 
a  competitive  TV  service  comparable  to  cable  TV.  Demand  for  broadband  has  also 
been propelled by VoIP. The broadband-based phone technology is forecast to make 
up  34  percent  of  all  U.S.  residential  landlines  by  2010,  or  25.5  million  subscribers, 
up from just 10 percent and 9.5 million subscribers in 2006. 

Beyond  entertainment,  the  creation  and  sale  of  information  and  communications 
technology  equipment  creates  thousands  of  jobs,  fosters  health  care,  education,  fi-
nancial  services,  transportation,  and  public  safety.  Important  to  TIA  and  its  mem-
bership,  next-generation  communications  capabilities  will  facilitate  public  safety 
communications  and  allow  our  Nation’s  first  responders  assist  the  public  in  times 
of  emergencies.  Technology  plays  a  crucial  role  in  the  safety  and  security  of  our 
country. 

The exploitation of technology in telecom is important because it has a day-to-day 
impact that improves productivity for individuals, government and corporations. For 
example,  advancements  in  technology  have  led  to  the  removal  of  economic  barriers 
in  the  enterprise  market.  Advancements  of  technology  accomplishes  two  things,  it 
promotes  creativity,  and  as  we  mentioned  earlier  drives  the  economy  to  improve-
ments  in  productivity.  In  other  words,  there  are  new  things  that  can  be  done,  and 
old things can be done at a lower cost. 

There  was  a  point  in  time  that  for  information  and  communications  technology 
the U.S. was an undisputed source of ideas and their implementation. Increasingly, 
we are finding that the source of new ideas is as likely to come from Europe or Asia 
as it is from the United States. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

61 

A  good  example  is  SAP,  a  German-owned  and  operated  company,  which  recog-
nized  early  on  that  technology  could  improve  day-to-day  business.  SAP  created  En-
terprise  Research  Planning  (ERP)  systems,  which  perform  accounting  functions  for 
large corporations around the world. With the proliferation and use of PCs and the 
Internet, SAP recognized that large centralized mainframes were not necessary and 
that  it  is  possible  to  share  data  within  large  enterprises  if  one  took  advantage  of 
the  fundamental  communications  technologies  that  are  available  already.  SAP  per-
fected a system that allows data to travel wherever the user demands the informa-
tion,  using  basic  telecommunications  capabilities  available  to  ordinary  users.  SAP 
created a new way of doing business by taking advantage of the telecommunications 
infrastructure that already exists. 

In  the  United  States,  we  must  focus  on  next-generation  broadband  services  and 
capabilities, especially in the rural areas of our country where deployment is costly 
due  to  challenges  associated  with  terrain,  low  population  density,  etc.  Health  care 
in  rural  areas  are  in  demand,  which  will  serve  as  an  incentive  to  next-generation 
broadband deployment in those areas. The USDA has made progress through no in-
terest  loans,  in  order  to  spur  broadband  deployment  for  this  purpose.  We  applaud 
this effort, and we believe that it serves as another example of how innovative prod-
ucts and services can stimulate deployment of next-generation broadband infrastruc-
ture. 

We must work together to determine what is the proper balance between govern-
ment involvement and incentives, and the hands-off approach which has proven suc-
cessful in the last several years. We should first determine where broadband deploy-
ment  has  not  occurred  and  why,  so  that  we  can  identify  incentives  and  eliminate 
barriers to moving forward. 
Basic Long-Term Telecommunications Research 

I now turn to the importance of long-term basic telecommunications research and 
the  impact  that  it  can  have  on  next-generation  communications  capabilities.  Other 
countries  have  discovered  the  importance  of  basic  research  early  on,  and  they  are 
now  reaping  the  benefits.  The  Framework  Programs  in  the  European  Union;  na-
tional  programs  in  Korea,  Taiwan,  Hong  Kong,  Singapore  and  Japan  conducted 
through  national  laboratories  and  economic  development  authorities;  and  growing 
investments in China targeted at all aspects of communications. These programs are 
further accompanied by coordinated transitional activities which forge academic, na-
tional  laboratory,  and  local  industry  partnerships  aimed  at  native  deployment  and 
eventual domination in international markets. An example would be the deployment 
of ‘‘Wibro’’ in Korea—this is high speed Internet connectivity at speeds greater than 
10  megabits  per  second  for  ubiquitous  fixed  and  mobile  wireless  services  based  on 
the WiMax standards. A by-product of the early stage investment in innovation that 
these  geographies  have  made  is  the  deployment  of  next-generation  systems  signifi-
cantly ahead of the United States. 

Another  technology  that  came  out  of  Europe  and  is  being  deployed  around  the 
world  is  IPV6,  which  has  been  widely  adopted  by  leading  countries  including  the 
United States. 

While the United States is still the single largest market for communications and 
has the most robust economy, we now fall far behind others in penetration of high- 
speed  broadband,  and  we  have  not  commercially  brought  next-generation  services 
to the consumer. As a consequence, it is more than likely that the next wave of serv-
ices  and  technologies  will  be  developed  where  test  beds  and  deployment  of  infra-
structure  will  support  experimentation  of  new  concepts  and  ideas  and  where  the 
human  capital  is  concentrated—locations  where  business  executives,  scientists  and 
engineers are familiar with the technology. 

The experience from my own corporation confirms this. Telcordia, which traces its 
heritage  to  ‘‘Bell  Labs’’  and  which  participated  in  the  invention  of  much  of  modern 
communications,  is  the  largest  seller  of  Operations  Support  Systems  to  the  tele-
communications industry. To maintain our edge, we are finding it a necessity to rely 
on  growth  in  foreign  markets  and  are  facing  increasing  foreign  competition,  which 
is  advantaged  by  public  spending  in  the  local  markets  and  long  range  government 
funding. 
What Must Congress Do 

First, do no harm. It is vital that Congress continue on its current path and facili-
tate deployment of next-generation broadband technology. And indeed, Congress has 
already  taken  steps  in  this  direction.  In  particular,  we  commend  you  for  making 
available  valuable  spectrum  through  legislation  over  the  past  few  years.  Congress 
must  continue  to  recognize  that  applications  and  services—whether  used  for  enter-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

62 

tainment, public safety, business, or healthcare—will continue to be the single-most 
driver of future broadband deployment. 

TIA  believes  that  public  policies  should  foster  a  climate  conducive  to  innovation 
and  investment,  avoiding  overly-prescriptive  regulatory  regimes.  The  constant  goal 
must be to achieve a market-based policy framework that fosters investment in net-
work  facilities  and  competition  in  the  provision  of  converged,  multimedia  services 
and applications. TIA’s key governing principles are as follows: 

• Universally available, high quality, and affordable broadband connectivity 
• Competition among existing and emerging platforms and providers 
• Increased  availability  of  unencumbered,  prime  spectrum  in  adequate  blocks  for 

commercial services 

best uses 

• Utilization  of  market-based  mechanisms  to  drive  spectrum  to  its  highest  and 

• Light-handed, narrowly focused regulation, where it is necessary 
• Technology neutrality and flexibility 
• Uniformity  in  regulation,  where  appropriate,  including  national  rules  wherever 

possible 

• Elimination of regulatory barriers to investment 
In regard to an assessment of high-speed Internet access service already available 
in the U.S., our industry would greatly benefit from an increase in accurate report-
ing  that  is  monitored  at  the  Federal  level,  based  on  metrics  that  are  valuable  to 
the public and the service providers. This would be a good first step in determining 
which parts of the country are most in need of access to broadband communications 
technology. We look forward to working with Congress to determine the next steps. 
Second,  we  are  asking  that  the  Federal  Government  invest  more  of  its  research 
dollars in the critical area of basic telecommunications-specific research. Fierce com-
petition  and  financial  realities  have  made  it  difficult  for  U.S.  industry  to  self-fund 
long-term,  basic  research,  and  because  the  U.S.  Government  is  not  devoting  suffi-
cient resources on long term communications research, the U.S. position in this vital 
area is waning. 

I  would  like  share  some  examples  where  the  investments  that  we  propose  could 

impact the citizens of our great country: 

• In  everyday  life—devices  with  much  simpler  interfaces,  but  at  the  same  time, 
much more functionality with greater adoption in our society—Imagine a single 
device  the  size  of  your  cell  phone  today,  which  is  your  PC,  your  camera,  a  pro-
jector,  shows  HDTV,  plays  music,  is  a  portal  to  the  Internet—without  a  button 
in sight? 

• Reduction in traffic accidents and deaths—sensors on a car that could alert you 
to  hazardous  conditions,  such  as  black  ice,  another  vehicle  in  your  blind  spot 
when  you  are  about  to  change  lanes,  a  deer  in  the  roadway,  a  washout  in  the 
highway, and the communications system that can convey warnings about such 
hazards to traffic behind you. 

• Health  care  for  the  elderly—a  handheld  device  that  your  grandmother  has, 
which  could  diagnose  and  warn  about  medical  problems,  call  for  a  nurse  or  a 
doctor’s  intervention,  or  improve  quality  of  life  by  fostering  the  ties  with  a 
grandchild  three  time  zones  away  through  effortless,  high-quality  communica-
tions. 

• New commercial systems—a slim and light portable device to securely purchase, 
receive, redeem, and store concert tickets, airline boarding passes, subway tick-
ets,  and  conduct  financial  transactions  from  anywhere—without  printing  a 
thing? 

These are only a few examples, among many, that correlate our Nation’s next-gen-
eration  communications  infrastructure  and  its  related  services  and  applications  to 
the  economic  growth  of  the  United  States  and  the  world  and  the  quality  of  life  for 
all  consumers.  New  partnerships  between  industry  and  government  are  needed  to 
meet  tomorrow’s  challenges  and  to  maintain  the  competitive  position  of  the  United 
States in the communications industry. 

Thank you again for the opportunity to appear before you today. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. Dr. Wolf? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

63 

STATEMENT OF DR. JACK KEIL WOLF, STEPHEN O. RICE 
PROFESSOR, UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA AT SAN DIEGO; 

VICE PRESIDENT, TECHNOLOGY, QUALCOMM, INC.; 
MEMBER, COMMITTEE ON TELECOMMUNICATIONS 

RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT, NATIONAL RESEARCH 

COUNCIL, THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES 

Dr. WOLF. Good morning, Mr. Chairman, Mr. Vice Chairman and 
Members of the Committee. My name is Jack Keil Wolf. I’m a Pro-
fessor of Electrical and Computer Engineering at the University of 
California  at  San  Diego  and  Vice  President  of  Technology  at 
QUALCOMM. I was a member of the Committee on Telecommuni-
cations Research and Development of the National Research Coun-
cil  that  authored  the  report,  ‘‘Renewing  U.S.  Telecommunications 
Research,’’  which  was  issued  in  August  2006,  on  which  you’ve 
asked me to testify. 

The  modern  telecommunications  infrastructure  made  possible  by 
research  performed  over  the  last  several  decades  is  an  essential 
element  of  the  U.S.  economy  and  society  and  it  plays  a  vital  role 
in U.S. national security and homeland defense. Yet, telecommuni-
cations is not a mature industry and major innovation and change, 
driven by research, can be expected. 

Without  making  an  expanded  investment  in  research,  however, 
the  Nation’s  position  as  a  leader  is  at  risk.  Strong  competition  is 
emerging from Asian and European countries that are making sub-
stantial  investments  in  R&D.  As  many  telecommunications  prod-
ucts  and  services  become  commodities,  continued  U.S.  tele-
communications strength requires a focus on high value innovation 
that is made possible only through research. 

However,  as  our  report  concluded,  the  U.S.  position  as  a  leader 
is at risk because of the recent decline in domestic support for long- 
term  fundamental  research.  Prior  to  the  restructuring  of  the  tele-
communications industry that began in 1984, the Bell Systems Re-
search  Labs  played  a  vital  role  in  U.S.  telecommunications  re-
search and stable funding was provided through what amounted to 
a tax on the service revenues of the Bell operating companies. 

Following the 1984 restructuring, industrial support for research 
has declined, become more short term in scope and become less sta-
ble. Because the benefits of much telecommunications research can-
not be appropriated by individual firms, especially in today’s much 
more competitive environment, public funding of such research ap-
pears  necessary.  However,  Federal  funding  of  long  term  research 
has not increased to cover the decline in industry’s support. No sys-
tematic  efforts  such  as  took  place  for  the  semiconductor  industry 
with SEMATECH have emerged. 

The National Science Foundation and the Defense Advanced Re-
search  Projects  Agency  have  been  the  two  primary  sources  of  Fed-
eral  telecommunications  R&D  support.  NSF,  long  a  broad  sup-
porter of telecom R&D, is currently emphasizing new approaches to 
telecommunication  through  its  Networking  Technology  and  Sys-
tems  program  and  its  proposed  Global  Environment  for  Network 
Innovations experimental facility. 

DARPA,  which  funded  a  number  of  important  past  communica-
tions  advances,  including  elements  of  the  Internet  itself,  has  been 
generally  shifting  its  emphasis  toward  more  immediate  military 
needs and giving less attention to long term telecommunications re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

64 

search.  Our  report’s  recommendations  reflect  the  view  that  a 
strong,  effective  telecommunications  R&D  program  for  the  United 
States  will  require  a  greater  role  for  government-sponsored  and 
university  research,  together  with  more  funding  of  long  term  re-
search by industry. 

In  our  first  major  recommendation,  we  aim  to  underscore  the 
challenge  with  a  bold  recommendation  that  the  Federal  Govern-
ment  establish  a  new  research  program,  which  we  call  the  Ad-
vanced  Telecommunication  Research  Activity  or  ATRA,  to  stimu-
late and coordinate research across industry, academia and govern-
ment. 

In  recommending  ATRA,  we  recognize  the  challenges  of  coming 
up  with  new  funds  for  telecommunications  research  and  did  not 
want  to  see  enhanced  Federal  support  for  telecommunications  re-
search come only at the expense of other areas of science and engi-
neering. 

I  am,  however,  hopeful  that  the  present  budget  environment  in 
which  significantly  increased  investment  in  scientific  research  is 
being  considered,  offers  opportunities  for  supporting  additional  re-
search  in  telecommunications.  For  more  on  the  broad  case  for  in-
vestment in science and technology, I would refer you to the NRC’s 
recent report, ‘‘Rising Above the Gathering Storm.’’ 

Even  with  the  establishment  of  a  national  research  program, 
NSF  and  DARPA  would  remain  key  contributors  to  U.S.  tele-
communication  research  efforts.  Both  have  successful  research 
management  cultures  that  compliment  each  other  and  the  activi-
ties envisioned for ATRA. 

Our  second  major  recommendation  was  that  all  segments  of  the 
U.S. telecommunications industry increase their support for funda-
mental research, such as through participation in joint, cooperative 
research activities organized by ATRA, which would provide indus-
try  with  a  way  to  pool  funds,  spread  risk  and  share  beneficial  re-
sults. 

Indeed,  we  recommended  that  industry  should  provide  a  signifi-
cant  fraction  of  ATRA’s  funding  and  observe  that  participation  in 
ATRA’s activities by both service providers and equipment vendors 
would be required to help identify the most critical research needs. 
Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, our recommenda-
tions  envision  an  enhanced  and  multifaceted  role  for  government- 
sponsored and university research, an additional investment by the 
telecommunications  industry  that  together  would  strengthen  the 
Nation’s  telecommunications  research  institutions  and  programs, 
the  telecommunications  industry  and  infrastructure  and  our  na-
tional  security.  Thank  you.  That  concludes  my  comments.  I  would 
be happy to take any questions you may have. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Wolf follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JACK KEIL WOLF,  STEPHEN O.  RICE PROFESSOR, 
UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA AT SAN DIEGO;  VICE PRESIDENT,  TECHNOLOGY, 
QUALCOMM,  INC.;  MEMBER,  COMMITTEE ON TELECOMMUNICATIONS RESEARCH 
AND DEVELOPMENT, NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL, THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES 
Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  My  name  is  Jack 
Wolf.  I  am  professor  of  electrical  and  computer  engineering  at  the  University  of 
California  at  San  Diego  and  Vice  President,  Technology  at  QUALCOMM.  I  served 
as  a  member  of  the  Committee  on  Telecommunications  Research  and  Development 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

65 

of  the  National  Research  Council  that  authored  the  report  Renewing  U.S.  Tele-
communications  Research,  issued  in  August  2006,  on  which  you  have  asked  me  to 
testify. This study was requested by the National Science Foundation. 

The  National  Research  Council  is  the  operating  arm  of  the  National  Academy  of 
Sciences, National Academy of Engineering, and the Institute of Medicine of the Na-
tional Academies, chartered by Congress in 1863 to advise the government on mat-
ters of science and technology. 

I will start with an overview of the study’s key findings before turning to our rec-

ommendations. 

The  modern  telecommunications  infrastructure—made  possible  by  research  per-
formed  over  the  last  several  decades—is  an  essential  element  of  the  U.S.  economy 
and  society.  Telecommunications  research  has  yielded  major  direct  benefits  such  as 
the Internet, radio frequency wireless communications for cellular systems and wire-
less local area networks (which have enabled modern mobile voice and data commu-
nications), optical networks (which have revolutionized communications by providing 
extraordinary communications bandwidths at very low unit cost), and Voice over IP 
(which  provides  voice  communications  with  enhanced  flexibility  and  efficiency).  It 
has  also  had  important  spinoffs,  from  transistors  to  lasers  to  the  UNIX  computer 
operating system. 

Telecommunications  has  expanded  greatly  over  the  past  few  decades  from  pri-
marily  landline  telephone  service  to  the  use  of  fiber  optic,  cable,  and  wireless  con-
nections offering a wide range of voice, image, video, and data services. Yet it is not 
a  mature  industry,  and  major  innovation  and  change—driven  by  research—can  be 
expected  for  many  years  to  come.  Promising  opportunities  for  future  research  in-
clude  enhanced  Internet  architectures,  more  trustworthy  networks,  and  adaptive 
and cognitive wireless networks. 

As our report concluded, the U.S. position as a leader in telecommunications tech-
nology  is  at  risk  because  of  the  recent  decline  in  domestic  support  for  long-term, 
fundamental telecommunications research. The risk is magnified by the long period 
of time—as much as a decade or even longer—that it can take to translate a funda-
mental discovery or big new idea into a commercial product or service or to educate 
and train a new researcher. 

The recent fast pace of innovation, the array of new ideas to be pursued, and the 
substantial  investment  in  telecommunications  by  other  nations  are  all  indications 
that  telecommunications  remains  a  high-value  sector  in  which  the  United  States 
should strive for continuing leadership. The importance of maintaining U.S. leader-
ship  is  underscored  by  telecommunications’  critical  contribution  to  U.S.  leadership 
in  information  technology  in  general,  its  important  contribution  to  improving  pro-
ductivity in nearly all industries, and its role in national security and homeland de-
fense. 

Indeed,  without  a  continuing  focus  on  telecommunications  R&D,  the  United 
States  will  increasingly  be  forced  to  purchase  telecommunications  technology  and 
services from foreign sources. Risks include: (1) U.S. dependence on foreign sources 
of  technology  to  meet  critical  defense  needs;  (2)  loss  of  exclusive  or  early  access  to 
state-of-the-art communications technology; (3) loss of know-how to employ state-of- 
the-art  technology;  (4)  opportunities  for  other  nations  to  introduce  security  holes 
into  equipment  and  networks;  and  (5)  loss  of  technical  capability  for  cyberdefense. 
Strong  competition  is  emerging  from  Asian  and  European  countries  that  have 
identified telecommunications as a strategic area for economic development and that 
are  making  substantial  investments  in  telecommunications  R&D.  Equipment  ven-
dors in a number of countries (such as China) now compete strongly with U.S. firms 
and have been very successful in emerging markets. 

Telecommunications  products  and  services  generally  have  become  commodities 
over time as multiple firms acquire the know-how to supply similar, competing prod-
ucts, and such competition has benefits in terms of lower prices for goods and serv-
ices.  To  maintain  leadership—or  even  a  strong  position—in  telecommunications  in 
the  face  of  pressures  from  lower  costs  overseas  for  labor  and  other  essentials  re-
quires  that  U.S.  firms  constantly  focus  on  achieving  high-value  innovation  as  a 
foundation for developing new, non-commodity products and services. 

For example, notable benefits have accrued to the United States as a result of its 
leadership  in  defining  the  Internet’s  design.  However—by  virtue  of  its  very  suc-
cess—the  existing  Internet  architecture  has  become  difficult  to  change.  Despite 
many potential avenues for significant improvements in areas ranging from security 
to  real-time  audio  and  video  transmission,  research  and  development  has  become 
largely  incremental  in  nature.  Moreover,  the  current  architecture  is  largely  a  com-
modity,  and  firms  from  other  nations  will  become  increasingly  able  to  deliver  com-
petitive  products  and  services.  Research  aimed  at  defining  future  architectures 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

66 

promises particular benefits because U.S. firms will be positioned to offer new kinds 
of services and not just incremental improvements to existing ones. 

Sustaining  a  base  of  researchers  and  research  institutions  is  critical  to  the  long- 
term  health  of  a  research  discipline.  Without  adequate  research  funding,  it  will  be 
hard  to  attract  new  students  to  the  field,  retain  foreign  students  in  the  United 
States, provide critically needed support for postdoctoral researchers, or attract and 
develop new faculty and industrial researchers. 

Nevertheless, as the report notes, research support has fallen off in recent years. 
Prior  to  the  restructuring  of  the  telecommunications  industry  that  began  in  1984, 
the  Bell  System’s  research  labs  played  a  vital  role  in  long-term,  fundamental  tele-
communications  research  for  the  United  States.  Stable  research  funding  was  pro-
vided  that  amounted  to  a  tax  levied  on  the  service  revenues  of  the  Bell  operating 
companies. Post-restructuring, industrial support for such research has declined, be-
come more short-term in scope, and become less stable. 

It  is  notoriously  difficult  to  compile  definitive  data  on  support  for  industry  re-
search and development, but the general shape of the situation became clear in tes-
timony  to  the  study  group.  Industry  support  for  telecommunications  research  has 
decreased  (as  measured  in  dollars,  numbers  of  researchers,  and  publications),  and 
the  work  that  is  funded  now  has  become  increasingly  short-term  in  focus—evolu-
tionary rather than revolutionary—at a time when global competitors of the United 
States  have  placed  a  priority  on  long-term  research  in  this  area.  Anecdotal  reports 
indicate  that  basic  research  scientists  in  industry  are  being  shifted  to  development 
work  and  that  publication  by  industry  researchers  in  telecommunications  journals 
has decreased. 

The diverse array of competing telecommunications firms—telephone, cable, Inter-
net, and wireless that have emerged—have for the most part left research to equip-
ment  vendors,  which  have  themselves  increasingly  focused  on  short-term  goals.  As 
a  result,  telecommunications  research  is  increasingly  being  done  at  universities 
rather than industry, and outside rather than inside the United States. 

Another consequence of changes in the industry structure with implications for in-
novation  is  that  the  diversity  of  players  in  today’s  telecommunications  industry 
makes it more difficult to design and deploy major, end-to-end innovations. Multiple 
visions  are  now  being  pursued  by  various  segments  of  the  telecommunications  in-
dustry,  and  although  an  increased  diversity  of  players  provides  more  fertile  ground 
for  new  ideas,  it  also  makes  widespread  deployment  of  good  ideas  more  difficult. 
Moreover,  no  single  entity  is  able  to  appropriate  the  results  of  long-term,  funda-
mental research or to comprehensively address the engineering and standardization 
issues  associated  with  end-to-end  solutions  that  must  span  multiple  service  pro-
viders and multiple sectors of the industry. As a result, vendors tend to favor incre-
mental  improvements  to  today’s  networks  over  more  fundamental  and  high-risk  re-
search  that  seeks  major  advances  in  new  or  enhanced  end-to-end  applications  and 
services and the architectural innovation that supports them. 

The  National  Science  Foundation  and  the  Defense  Advanced  Research  Projects 
Agency have been the two primary sources of Federal telecommunications R&D sup-
port. NSF, long a supporter of telecommunications R&D spanning a range of topics, 
is  currently  emphasizing  new  approaches  through  such  efforts  as  the  Networking 
Technology  and  Systems  (NeTS)  program  and  the  Global  Environment  for  Network 
Innovations  (GENI)  experimental  facility  being  planned  by  NSF  in  collaboration 
with  the  research  community.  DARPA,  which  funded  a  number  of  important  tele-
communications advances in the past (including elements of the Internet itself), has 
been generally shifting its emphasis toward more immediate military needs and giv-
ing less attention to long-term telecommunications research. 

Despite these significant investments over the years, Federal funding of long-term 
research did not increase sufficiently to compensate for the decline in industry sup-
port for long-term research. Because of the Bell System’s ability to fund and conduct 
so  much  research  in-house  the  Federal  Government  historically  did  not  emphasize 
support  for  academic  research  in  telecommunications  and  university  researchers 
themselves tended to concentrate on research areas more amenable to work by indi-
vidual  investigators  or  small  research  groups,  such  as  semiconductors,  communica-
tions  theory,  and  signal  processing,  leaving  to  industry  research  related  to  the  de-
sign  and  operation  of  large-scale  communications  networks.  Notable  exceptions  to 
this  pattern,  such  as  computer  networking  research  supported  by  the  Defense  Ad-
vanced Research Projects Agency and National Science Foundation (which led to the 
Internet),  illustrate  the  enormous  potential  payoff  from  government-supported  and 
university-based research on new architectural ideas. 

Long-term  concerns  similar  to  those  now  faced  in  the  telecommunications  sector 
prompted  the  establishment  of  research  organizations  for  the  semiconductor  and 
power  industries,  with  the  implicit  or  explicit  participation  of  government.  Indeed, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

67 

the  current  situation  in  telecommunications  is  somewhat  analogous  to  the  crisis 
faced  by  the  U.S.  semiconductor  industry  in  the  1980s  when  international  competi-
tion  and  decreased  R&D  funding  threatened  that  industry’s  long-term  viability.  In 
response,  the  Semiconductor  Research  Corporation  and  SEMATECH  were  formed. 
Their work is widely credited with having played an important role in the recovery, 
renewed leadership, and long-term viability of the U.S. semiconductor industry. No-
tably,  there  have  been  no  parallel  systematic  efforts—either  government-  or  indus-
try-led—for telecommunications. 

I will now turn to the Committee’s key recommendations. 
Our report’s first major recommendation reflected the view that a strong, effective 
telecommunications  R&D  program  for  the  United  States  will  require  a  greater  role 
for  government-sponsored  and  university  research,  and  more  funding  of  long-term 
research by industry. To underscore the seriousness with which the study committee 
viewed  the  challenge,  we  made  a  bold  recommendation,  that  the  Federal  Govern-
ment establish a new research program with the objective of stimulating and coordi-
nating research across industry, academia, and government. This proposed research 
program,  called  the  Advanced  Telecommunications  Research  Activity  (ATRA)  ,  was 
envisioned  as  a  hybrid  of  activities  of  the  sort  historically  associated  with  DARPA 
(which  through  the  ARPANET  program  managed  a  research  portfolio,  developed  a 
vision, and convened industry and academia to build what would become the Inter-
net) and SEMATECH (which brought the semiconductor industry together, initially 
with  some  Federal  support  to  complement  industry  dollars,  to  fund  joint  research, 
development, and road mapping activities). 

ATRA’s mission would be to: (1) identify, coordinate, and fund telecommunications 
R&D,  (2)  foster  major  architectural  advances,  and  (3)  strengthen  the  U.S.  tele-
communications  research  capability.  Key  suggested  steps  for  implementing  ATRA 
are: (1) establishment of mechanisms for carrying out project-based research; (2) es-
tablishment of advisory committees with high-level industry participation; (3) explo-
ration of the need for R&D centers; and (4) establishment of a forum for key parties 
to discuss critical technology development issues. 

Our  report  urged  that  telecommunications  research  funding  should  be  consistent 
with  the  vital  role  played  by  telecommunications  in  the  U.S.  economy  and  society 
and  with  the  direct  contributions  made  by  the  U.S.  telecommunications  industry  to 
the  Nation’s  economy  and  security.  The  study  committee  recognized,  however,  that 
budgets are often a zero sum game, and that a bold proposal of this sort would have 
been  quite  difficult  to  implement  in  the  budget  environment  at  the  time  its  report 
came out. Moreover, we were not charged with making budgetary recommendations 
nor  examining  tradeoffs  between  research  needs  in  telecommunications  and  other 
areas  of  science  and  technology  research—nor  did  we  in  any  case  believe  that  in-
creased  investment  in  telecommunications  research  should  come  at  the  expense  of 
other  areas  of  scientific  or  engineering  research.  But  our  report  points  to  tele-
communications research as an area where investment is critical. 

For  more  on  the  broad  case  for  investment  in  science  and  technology,  I  would 
refer  you  to  the  National  Research  Council’s  recent  report  Rising  Above  the  Gath-
ering  Storm:  Energizing  and  Employing  America  for  a  Brighter  Economic  Future.  I 
am  hopeful  that  the  present  budget  environment,  in  which  significantly  increased 
investment in scientific research is being contemplated, offers new opportunities for 
supporting an initiative in telecommunications. 

As  for  where  within  the  Federal  Government  the  ATRA  program  could  fit,  there 
are multiple options, each with its own set of tradeoffs, and our report provides sev-
eral of these. For example, ATRA’s proposed mission would align with that of exist-
ing  agencies  within  the  Department  of  Commerce,  and  NSF  has  developed  mecha-
nisms  for  joint  academic-industry  engineering  research,  albeit  more  focused  and  on 
a smaller scale. 

Even  with  the  establishment  of  an  ATRA  research  program,  NSF  and  DARPA 
would  remain  key  contributors  to  U.S.  telecommunications  research  efforts.  Both 
have successful research management cultures that complement each other and the 
activities  envisioned  for  ATRA.  NSF  has  significant  strengths  in  supporting  basic 
research, training researchers, and building research communities that can play an 
important  role  in  strengthening  the  U.S.  research  base  in  telecommunications. 
NSF’s  commitment  to  supporting  research  in  this  area  has  been  evident,  and  NSF 
has  a  number  of  opportunities  for  sustaining  such  attention,  including  making  ef-
forts  to  attract  and  develop  young  research  talent  in  telecommunications.  DARPA 
is  well  known  for  a  culture  of  focused  programs  with  active  program  management 
and  significant  industry  participation.  In  considering  investments  in  telecommuni-
cations  research,  DARPA  should  consider  the  telecommunications  capabilities  at-
tainable  by  potential  U.S.  adversaries  by  virtue  of  the  burgeoning  commercial  tele-
communications  sector  overseas  and  the  risks  associated  with  the  United  States 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

68 

having  to  rely  on  communications  components  and  systems  that  are  increasingly 
being developed overseas. 

Second,  the  report  also  recommends  that  all  segments  of  the  U.S.  telecommuni-
cations  industry  increase  their  support  for  fundamental  research,  possibly  taking 
advantage of the avenue provided by participation in joint, cooperative research ac-
tivities  organized  by  ATRA.  Indeed,  the  Committee  recommended  that  industry 
should  provide  a  significant  fraction  of  total  R&D  funding  for  ATRA,  which  would 
support  researchers  from  academia  and  industry  and  provide  industry  with  a  way 
to pool funds, spread risk, and share beneficial results. 

Moreover,  effective  expansion  of  Federal  support  of  telecommunications  research 
through ATRA will require participation from both service providers and equipment 
vendors  to  help  identify  the  most  critical  research  needs  together  with  complemen-
tary  industry  investments  in  research.  ATRA  can  play  an  important  role  in  facili-
tating mechanisms to enable service providers to pool research support. 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  our  report  contemplates  a  multi-
faceted,  reinvigorated  telecommunications  research  program.  Our  recommendations 
envision  an  enhanced  and  multifaceted  role  for  government-sponsored  and  univer-
sity  research  in  telecommunications  as  well  as  additional  investment  by  the  tele-
communications industry in more work of a fundamentally high-risk character, and 
thus  a  strengthening  of  the  Nation’s  telecommunications  research  institutions  and 
programs, industry, and infrastructure. 

You  can  find  more  information  about  these  and  related  studies  on  the  website  of 
the  Computer  Science  and  Telecommunications  Board  of  the  National  Research 
Council at http://www.cstb.org. 

Thank you. That concludes my comments. I would be happy to take any questions 

you may have. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Dr.  Wolf  and  may  I  now 

recognize Dr. Wallsten. 

STATEMENT  OF  SCOTT  WALLSTEN,  PH.D.,  SENIOR  FELLOW 
AND  DIRECTOR,  COMMUNICATIONS  POLICY  STUDIES,  THE 
PROGRESS & FREEDOM FOUNDATION 
Dr.  WALLSTEN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Mr.  Chairman  and  mem-
bers  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  here  and  giving 
me the opportunity to testify today. 

My  name  is  Scott  Wallsten.  I’m  a  Senior  Fellow  and  Director  of 
Communications Policy Studies at the Progress and Freedom Foun-
dation as well as a lecturer for Stanford University. 

Notwithstanding  the  international  rankings,  the  evidence  indi-
cates  that  the  U.S.  does  not  have  a  broadband  problem.  The  re-
markable  investment  in  broadband  infrastructure  and  rapid  in-
creases  in  subscribership  suggest  the  market  is  working  well.  Any 
policy  or  regulation  intended  to  further  accelerate  deployment 
should clearly identify and target the market failure it is intended 
to mitigate. 

Meanwhile,  government  can  continue  to  remove  arbitrary  bar-
riers to competitive entry by, for example, continuing to make more 
spectrum available for today’s high value uses. 

The  relatively  low  position  of  the  United  States  in  international 
broadband rankings creates consternation every time new numbers 
are  released.  These  rankings,  however,  provide  little  real  informa-
tion.  Part  of  the  problem  is  that  it  is  difficult  to  evaluate  the 
rankings  themselves  because  the  OECD  and  the  ITU  do  not  ex-
plain how they derive their estimates. 

More importantly, many factors differ across countries that affect 
both  the  cost  of  supplying  broadband,  such  as  population  density 
and existing infrastructure, and the demand for broadband, such as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

69 

the  ability  or  inability  to  subscribe  to  television  services  over 
broadband lines. 

Rather than worry about rankings per se, it is more useful to ask 
whether  any  market  failures  or  other  obstacles  hinder  broadband 
investment, competition and adoption by consumers. 

The  evidence  shows  tremendous  investment  in  broadband  infra-
structure. According to the FCC’s latest data, in the first 6 months 
of  2006  alone,  the  number  of  broadband  connections  increased  by 
26  percent  to  a  total  of  more  than  60  million  high  speed  connec-
tions.  Moreover,  this  impressive  number  masks  the  emergence  of 
new delivery methods and hence, enhanced competition. The latest 
statistics  show  the  importance  of  mobile  wireless,  a  category  inci-
dentally, that the OECD does not count. 

More  than  15  percent  of  all  connections  were  wireless  in  June 
2006,  a  figure  no  doubt  even  higher  today.  In  addition,  broadband 
providers  like  Verizon  and  AT&T  are  rapidly  deploying  fiber  optic 
networks. More than 1.3 million homes are now connected to those 
networks and fiber is available to about 8 million homes, twice the 
number of only a year ago. 

These are especially welcome developments given that the empir-
ical  economic  research  shows  the  importance  of  platform  competi-
tion  to  spurring  investment.  Indeed,  cable  companies,  which  pro-
vide  the  largest  number  of  broadband  connections,  are  not  sitting 
idly  by.  They  are  expected  to  invest  about  $15  billion  this  year  to 
upgrade their IP networks. 

Overall, North American telecom service providers put about $70 
billion  into  capital  expenditures  in  2006  and  this  number  is  ex-
pected to increase over the next several years. 

Wireless competition is poised to become even more vigorous. The 
recently  completed  AWS  auction  put  more  spectrum  in  the  hands 
of firms wanting to provide high speed wireless services. T-Mobile, 
for  example,  acquired  enough  spectrum  to  build  out  a  3G  service 
to  compete  with  Verizon,  AT&T  and  Sprint/Nextel.  The  upcoming 
auction for spectrum in the 700 megahertz band promises to bring 
even more options for wireless broadband access. 

Congress could further stimulate wireless broadband competition 
by  continuing  to  move  inefficiently  used  spectrum  into  the  market 
so that it can migrate easily to higher valued uses. 

Given  the  large  amount  of  investment  and  stunningly  fast  tech-
nological  change,  it  is  not  obvious  that  there  are  market  failures 
to  correct.  However,  the  quality  of  the  available  data  is  low  so  it 
is difficult to get a solid grasp of this market. 

While  some  groups,  like  ConnectKentucky,  in  particular,  have 
made remarkable strides in assembling useful data, the data prob-
lem  has  no  simple  solution.  It  is  easy  to  criticize  existing  informa-
tion but it is not easy to know what data to collect, how frequently 
to  collect  it  and  how  often  to  reconsider  what  information  remains 
relevant in an industry exhibiting such rapid change. 

For  example,  the  FCC  currently  reports  how  many  broadband 
providers are in each Zip Code. These data are rightly criticized as 
flawed  since  a  firm  serving  even  only  one  customer  in  a  Zip  Code 
is  counted  as  a  broadband  provider,  possibly  exaggerating  the  ex-
tent of competition. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

70 

But  what  is  the  right  geographic  level  of  analysis?  A  census 
block?  The  number  of  broadband  access  choices  available  to  each 
household?  How  would  one  measure  the  availability  of  wireless 
broadband?  How  we  should  we  go  about  measuring  bandwidth  to 
consumer? 

Well,  one  might  be  tempted  to  demand  as  much  information  as 
possible at as a detailed level as possible but it is important to re-
member that data collection is costly, both for the firms that must 
report it and for the agencies that must collect and process it. The 
more  detailed  the  data,  the  more  costly  they  are  likely  to  be.  Any 
new  data  requirements  should  take  into  account  both  the  costs  of 
acquiring that data and the benefits we expect to obtain from hav-
ing it. 

Nevertheless,  FCC  data  collection  is  due  for  an  overhaul.  The 
FCC  still  requires  telecom  firms  to  report  data  once  used  for  rate 
regulation  but  they  no  longer  perform  any  particular  regulatory 
purpose.  It  is  conceivable  that  both  the  FCC  and  the  reporting 
firms  would  be  amendable  to  dispensing  with  some  of  the  current 
data  requirements  that  were  intended  for  regulation  in  another 
era, in exchange for more useful and perhaps less burdensome data 
that would better inform decisions in today’s digital world. 

To  conclude,  let  me  reiterate  that  the  key  issue  in  making 
broadband  policy  is  not  our  rank  in  the  world  but  whether  we  can 
identify particular market failures or artificial barriers suppressing 
broadband  investment  and  adoption  and  whether  any  policy  inter-
ventions  are  likely  to  yield  net  benefits.  The  rapid  growth  of 
broadband  implies  no  market  failure.  Some  policies  are  likely  to 
yield unambiguous benefits such as moving inefficiently used spec-
trum  to  higher  valued  uses.  The  effects  of  other  proposals  are  less 
clear. Precisely because the Internet is so important, it is vital that 
Congress  be  cautious  and  consider  carefully  any  interventions  in 
this  fast  changing  industry  to  ensure  that  it  does  not  unintention-
ally reduce incentives to invest in the very infrastructure we all be-
lieve is so important. Thank you very much. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Wallsten follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SCOTT WALLSTEN, PH.D., SENIOR FELLOW AND DIRECTOR, 

COMMUNICATIONS POLICY STUDIES, THE PROGRESS & FREEDOM FOUNDATION 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  here 
and  giving  me  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  My  name  is  Scott  Wallsten.  I  am 
a  senior  fellow  and  director  of  communications  policy  studies  at  The  Progress  & 
Freedom Foundation as well as a lecturer for Stanford University. 

Notwithstanding  the  international  rankings,  the  evidence  indicates  that  the  U.S. 
does not have a broadband problem. The remarkable investment in broadband infra-
structure  and  rapid  increases  in  subscribership  that  have  taken  place  suggest  the 
market  is  working  well.  Any  policy  or  regulation  intended  to  further  accelerate  de-
ployment should clearly identify and target the market failure it is intended to miti-
gate. Meanwhile, government can continue to remove arbitrary barriers to competi-
tive  entry  by,  for  example,  continuing  to  make  more  spectrum  available  for  today’s 
high-value uses. 

The  relatively  low  position  of  the  United  States  in  international  broadband 
rankings  creates  consternation  every  time  new  numbers  are  released.  These 
rankings,  however,  provide  little  real  information.  Part  of  the  problem  is  that  it  is 
difficult to evaluate the rankings themselves because the OECD and ITU do not ex-
plain how they derive their estimates. More importantly, many factors differ across 
countries that affect both the costs of supplying broadband—such as population den-
sity—and  the  demand  for  broadband—such  as  the  ability  or  inability  to  subscribe 
to television services over broadband lines. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

71 

Rather  than  worry  about  rankings,  per  se,  it  is  more  useful  to  ask  whether  any 
market  failures  or  other  obstacles  hinder  broadband  investment,  competition,  and 
adoption by consumers. 

The  evidence  shows  tremendous  investment  in  broadband  infrastructure.  Accord-
ing  to  the  FCC’s  latest  data,  in  the  first  6  months  of  2006  alone  the  number  of 
broadband  connections  increased  by  26  percent,  to  a  total  of  more  than  60  million 
high-speed connections. 

Moreover, this impressive number masks the emergence of new delivery methods 
and  hence,  enhanced  competition.  The  latest  statistics  show  the  new  importance  of 
wireless. More than 15 percent of all connections were wireless in June 2006—a fig-
ure no doubt even higher today. 

In  addition,  broadband  providers  like  Verizon  and  AT&T  are  rapidly  deploying 
fiber  optic  networks.  More  than  1.3  million  homes  are  now  connected  to  those  net-
works, and fiber is available to about 8 million homes.1 

These are especially welcome developments given that the empirical economics re-

search shows the importance of platform competition to spurring investment. 

Indeed,  cable  companies,  which  provide  the  largest  number  of  broadband  connec-
tions, are not sitting idly by. They are expected to invest about $15 billion this year 
to  upgrade  their  IP  networks.  Overall,  North  American  telecom  service  providers 
put about $70 billion into capital expenditures in 2006, and this number is expected 
to increase over the next several years.2 

Wireless  competition  is  poised  to  become  even  more  vigorous.  The  recently-com-
pleted  AWS  auction  put  more  spectrum  in  the  hands  of  firms  wanting  to  provide 
high-speed  wireless  services.  T-Mobile,  for  example,  acquired  enough  spectrum  to 
build out a 3G service to compete with Verizon, AT&T, and Sprint/Nextel. 

The upcoming auction for spectrum in the 700 MHz band promises to bring even 

more options for wireless broadband access. 

Congress could further stimulate wireless broadband competition by continuing to 
move  inefficiently-used  spectrum  into  the  market  so  that  it  can  migrate  easily  to 
higher-valued uses. 

Given the large amount of investment, rapid adoption, and stunningly fast techno-
logical  change,  it  is  not  obvious  that  there  are  market  failures  to  correct.  However, 
the  quality  of  the  available  data  is  low,  so  it  is  difficult  to  get  a  solid  grasp  of  this 
market. 

While  some  groups  like  ConnectKentucky  have  made  remarkable  strides  in  as-
sembling useful data, the data problem has no simple solution. It is easy to criticize 
existing information, but it is not easy to know what data to collect, how frequently 
to  collect  them,  and  how  often  to  reconsider  what  information  remains  relevant  in 
an  industry  exhibiting  such  rapid  change.  For  example,  the  FCC  currently  reports 
how  many  broadband  providers  are  in  each  Zip  Code.  These  data  are  rightly  criti-
cized as flawed since a firm serving even only one customer in a Zip Code is counted 
as a broadband provider, possibly exaggerating the extent of competition. But what 
is the right geographic level of analysis? A census block? The number of broadband 
access choices available to each household? How would one measure the availability 
of  wireless  broadband?  How  should  we  go  about  measuring  available  bandwidth  to 
consumers? 

While one might be tempted to demand as much information as possible at as de-
tailed  a  level  as  possible,  it  is  important  to  remember  that  data  collection  is  costly 
both for firms that must report it and for the agencies that must collect and process 
it.  The  more  detailed  the  data,  the  more  costly  they  are  likely  to  be.  Any  new  data 
requirements should take into account both the costs of acquiring that data and the 
benefits we expect to obtain from having it. 

Nevertheless,  FCC  data  collection  is  due  for  an  overhaul.  The  FCC  still  requires 
telecom firms to report data once used for rate regulation but that no longer inform 
any  particular  regulatory  purpose.  It  is  conceivable  that  both  the  FCC  and  the  re-
porting  firms  would  be  amenable  to  dispensing  with  some  of  the  current  data  re-
quirements  that  were  intended  for  regulation  in  another  era  in  exchange  for  more 
useful  and  perhaps  less  burdensome  data  that  would  better  inform  decisions  in  to-
day’s digital world. 

To conclude, let me reiterate that the key issue in making broadband policy is not 
our  rank  in  the  world,  but  whether  we  can  identify  particular  market  failures  or 
artificial barriers suppressing broadband investment and adoption and whether any 
policy  interventions  are  likely  to  yield  net  benefits.  The  rapid  growth  of  broadband 
contradicts  the  presence  of  an  obvious  market  failure.  Some  policies  are  likely  to 

1 http://telephonyonline.com/home/news/ftth-household-connections-041707/. 
2 http://www.infonetics.com/resources/purple.shtml?msna07.cpx.2h06.nr.shtml. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

72 

yield  unambiguous  benefits,  such  as  moving  inefficiently-used  spectrum  to  higher- 
valued uses. The impacts of other proposals are less clear. 

And  precisely  because  the  Internet  is  so  important,  Congress  should  be  cautious 
and  consider  very  carefully  any  interventions  in  this  fast-changing  industry  to  en-
sure  that  it  does  not  unintentionally  reduce  incentives  to  invest  in  the  very  infra-
structure we all believe is so important. 

Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. Thank you to our panelists and 
I  just  wanted  to  first  follow  up  with  what  you  were  talking  about, 
Dr.  Wallsten,  with  trying  to  connect  and  get  the  information  that 
we have. I, too, have struggled with this as I’ve seen some statistics 
in our own state and then I talk to some of our smaller, local tele-
phone  companies  and  they  assure  me  they  are  offering  broadband 
and  competing.  You  correctly  laid  out  the  problem  with  the  data 
collection,  including  the  FCC  issues,  where  they’re  just  doing  it  by 
Zip Code and so that leads one to believe that it might be an exag-
gerated number. 

But  you  laid  everything  out  on  how  it  would  be  inefficient  to  re-
quire too much data collection. What you didn’t answer is what you 
think would be best for collection data so that we could best meas-
ure our broadband penetration. 

Dr.  WALLSTEN.  Well,  I  have  some  conflicting  interests,  I  guess, 
because  as  a  researcher,  I’d  like  to  have  as  much  as  possible.  I’m 
always interested in more data. But I don’t think the policy answer 
is  obvious.  I  mean,  in  the  first  panel,  we  heard  several  different 
opinions  about  what  the  right  approach  should  be.  There  was  one 
suggestion for block-by-block analysis, another suggestion for using 
geographic  information  systems.  ConnectKentucky  has  adopted  a 
particular model that may actually end up serving as the model for 
everyone else and I think that they are really hard questions to an-
swer. 

So  far,  I  believe  that  the  comments  have  been  mostly  along  the 
lines of criticizing what the FCC has done and those criticisms are 
certainly  justified,  even  though  people  at  the  FCC  are  certainly 
aware  of  them.  I  don’t  think  there  has  been  a  lot  of  thought  yet 
as  to  what  exactly  the  right  information  is  that  we  want.  I  think 
a good question is what problem do we see or what problem do we 
think  we  see  and  how  would  we  actually  measure  whether  that 
problem  exists  and  what  sort  of  things  would  we  be  looking  for  to 
decide whether particular policies mitigate that problem. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Your  testimony  also  was  critical  of  other 
ideas but I what I was trying to get at, and maybe you can provide 
it  to  me  later,  is  just  your  idea  of  how  we  best  collect  this  data. 
It  just  seems  to  me  in  other  areas  of  the  economy,  we’re  able  to 
measure  how  many  people  use  phone  lines  and  how  many  people 
go on airplanes, that we should be able to figure out how we want 
to  measure  this  because  as  we’re  making  major  decisions  about 
broadband  investment,  it  would  be  good  to  get  ideas,  as  you  said, 
and not just criticisms. 

Dr.  WALLSTEN.  Well,  you’re  asking  somebody  who  can’t  keep  a 
waterfall.  But  no,  it’s  an  important  question  but  I  think  the  type 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

73 

of  data  we  want  has  to  be  driven  by  the  particular  questions  we 
want to answer and I’m not sure yet that there is actual agreement 
on  that.  With  technological  change,  the  things  that  we  want  to 
measure,  it  seems  to  keep  changing.  And  these  are  difficult  ques-
tions to answer and I don’t have the answer. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. Dr. Wolf, you made this comparison to 
the semiconductor industry in the 1980s. I was in college then, not 
quite  following  the  semiconductor  industry  in  the  1980s.  You 
talked about how that industry rebounded with a focus. Could you 
tell  me  the  story  of  what  happened  there  and  how  you  think  it  is 
relevant  to  the  situation  we’re  in  now,  trying  to  compete  inter-
nationally? 

Dr.  WOLF.  I’m  not  sure  I  know  the  complete  story  but  basically, 
in  the  1980s,  there  was  the  fear  that  we  were  losing  our  expertise 
in  semiconductors  and  that  the  industry  was  going  to  move  over-
seas.  So  there  were  several  efforts  that  were  made  but  one  was 
SEMATECH and basically, the U.S. Government put money into it 
and  companies  partnered  in  it  and  eventually,  the  government 
funding  was  weaned  and  they  found  a  way  where  the  companies 
could  work  together  on  a  pre-competitive  basis,  and  do  research 
that  benefited  all,  I’ll  jump  to  the  end  of  the  story.  The  end  of  the 
story  was  that  the  U.S.  semiconductor  industry  recovered  nicely. 
There’s been some criticisms of SEMATECH. This is something we 
could  learn  from.  On  the  other  hand,  the  SEMATECH  model,  I 
think, is a good one. 

Let me, if I could, deviate a little from your question. Let me ex-
plain why the communications field is so poorly funded by the U.S. 
Government.  The  fact  is  that  back  before  divestiture,  there  wasn’t 
a  great  need  for  the  government  to  fund  communications.  There 
was  Bell  Labs,  which  at  that  point  was  spending  $500  million  a 
year on R&D. When I was a young professor, I spent a year at Bell 
Labs,  essentially  learning  how  to  do  research  in  telecommuni-
cations.  Thus  Bell  Labs  trained  our  educators,  it  trained  our  re-
searchers, and played many other roles. 

At  no  point  after  divestiture  did  the  U.S.  feel  or  see  a  need  to 
jump in and say, okay, there is this gap. I believe we are suffering 
from  this  now  and  we’re  going  to  suffer  from  it  a  great  deal  more 
unless we do something about it. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Dr. Drobot, you wanted to comment? 
Dr. DROBOT. Let me actually—I had a couple of things. I actually 
run an organization that came from Bell Labs and in fact, was cre-
ated in 1985 as part of the divestiture. It had two charters to look 
after  the  reliability  and  security  of  the  U.S.  communication  plant 
and  part  of  that  organization  was  the  researchers  that  then  went 
on  to  support  the  Baby  Bells,  the  ARBACs  until  the  Communica-
tions Act of 1996, essentially. 

Indeed, the funding for all of this came from tax collections, went 
on  to  the  researchers  and  there  were  a  couple  of  things  that  hap-
pened. I’d say the first one is that we were trusted enough to deal 
with  the  real  communications  system,  the  real  data  and  the  real 
hard problems. 

One  of  the  things  that  you  find  in  the  Internet  age  is  you  can 
go through and do what people call plug and play. I go and connect 
to  things  and  I  can  show—hey,  I  can  get  a  video  signal  from  here 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

74 

to there. It is a very different thing from saying you can get a video 
signal  from  here  to  there,  do  it  twice  in  a  row  in  the  same  way  so 
there  is  consistency  and  number  three,  deploy  it  at  large  scale  so 
it  is  economically  feasible.  Because  a  lot  of  the  research  was  not 
about  the  glossy  functional  things  that  we  find  at  the  surface,  it 
was the ugly things under the covers that gave you reliability, that 
made  the  system  recover  in  a  short  period  of  time,  that  drove  a 
high  degree  of  automation  that  in  fact,  ended  up  driving  down  the 
economic  barriers,  which  made  this  useful  universally,  essentially. 
This is what is missing today. 

I think when you look at it, you see this in the marketplace and 
I’ll start off with the following. You look at video on demand, video 
services,  things  of  that  sort.  I  have  now  seen  five  waves  of  deploy-
ment  of  video.  The  first  one  was,  I  can  show  that  a  place,  I  put  a 
business  together  and  I  find  I  really  can’t  afford  to  deploy  this  at 
large scale. Second, the same thing. Technology not quite ready. 

Today when you ask me what are important metrics in this busi-
ness, I can tell you some and they are very relevant. When you do 
telephony, video services, anything that is critical, I’d like to know 
what  latencies  are  there  in  the  communications  plan?  How  can  I 
measure them? How can I make that stuff available? Because if we 
can’t deal with it, this stuff will not work at large scale, essentially. 
Do you want to experiment and build out a national system that 
you tear down a few years later because there is no money for that 
investment? I think that kind of clarity, being able to develop that 
kind of data really does have tremendous value. 

The  next  thing,  I  take  a  look  at  events  such  as  Katrina.  There 
are parts of our communications system that failed. If I’m going to 
go through and run voice services over IP, I need to be able to run 
the  things  that  are  critical  for  us,  like  9-1-1,  calls  for  help,  things 
of  that  sort,  and  make  sure  that  system  is  available  when  other 
things go down. It’s the underpinnings of our infrastructure. If the 
communications  system  goes  down  and  the  power  system  goes 
down,  you  cannot  bring  the  power  system  up  without  the  avail-
ability  of  communications.  Those  kinds  of  ties  exist  in  our  society 
today. 

Same  is  true  of  banking,  ATM  machines.  You  just  went  through 
something  like  Katrina.  You  want  to  go  to  the  bank  because  you 
have  to  go  somewhere  else—those  ATM  systems  are  down  and  not 
functioning, essentially. 

So there is a tremendous amount of stuff that has to be done and 
I  want  to  come  back  to  the  question  you  actually  asked  with 
SEMATECH.  What  SEMATECH  did  for  the  semiconductor  indus-
try,  is  it  created  roadmaps.  It  created  the  common  bases  on  which 
that  industry  could  build  some  infrastructure  that  could  be  shared 
by  all  and  competed  on  things  that  mattered.  The  design  of  the 
chips, the way the costs could be brought down essentially, the fun-
damental  things  that  would  have  to  be  there  for  the  next  genera-
tion of chips to be able to go to higher speeds. Everybody benefited 
as a consequence. 

While  the  manufacturing  may  have  gone  overseas,  the  intellec-
tual  property,  the  fundamental  designs,  those  things  stayed  in  the 
United States, essentially. I think the same is true of telecommuni-
cations if the right investments are made. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

75 

Dr. WALLSTEN. Could I make an additional comment? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Sure. 
Dr.  WALLSTEN.  The  first  point  is  we  just  heard  another  possible 
piece of data that should be collected and I think, that sort of illus-
trates  why  it  is  going  to  be  hard  to  answer  the  problem  because 
everybody points to another piece of information that should be col-
lected  and  I’m  not  saying  it’s  not  important.  It  just  points  to  how 
difficult it is to figure it out. 

I’ve also done a fair amount of work on science technology policy 
and the question of how to spend funds on research is an important 
one. Research demonstrates this classic market failure that the re-
turns  can  be  appropriated  by  other  people  than  just  the  investor. 
The  old  AT&T  was  able  to  get  around  that  by  being  a  monopolist 
and it could fund Bell Labs as a result and as a country, we bene-
fited  from  that  particular  part  of  the  monopoly.  We  certainly  don’t 
want  to  go  back  to  those  days,  however,  and  the  question  is  how 
to sort of recapture some of that. 

In going forward with something like that, it’s important to think 
in  advance  how  you  might  want  to  measure  whether  such  a  pro-
gram is successful. SEMATECH was controversial. Some of the eco-
nomics  research  shows  that  SEMATECH  mostly  just  crowded  out 
private sector spending and wasn’t successful. 

There  are  other  opinions  on  this,  obviously  and  so  you  want  to 
ensure, for example that when you try to evaluate whether such an 
approach is successful, it’s not just whether it funds something that 
ultimately succeeds in the market because then you could just fund 
things that would succeed anyway. So it’s hard to figure out wheth-
er you’re funding something on the margin. 

We’ve  seen  other  programs  like  this  that  weren’t  successful  at 
all. The partnership for a new generation of vehicles, we might re-
member that. It was a federally funded program meant to develop, 
I  think,  100  mile  per  gallon  car  and  while  we  were  sort  of  playing 
around with that for years, we didn’t develop hybrid cars. 

So there are lots of examples of these kinds of research programs 
that  need  to  be  thought  about  very  carefully  in  advance  to  make 
sure that what we’re measuring is really what you want to achieve 
in  the  end  and  that  might  include,  for  example,  funding  a  lot  of 
failures,  too,  because  people  have  to  be  able  to  work  on  something 
and  have  it  not  succeed.  But  failed  programs  often  are  not  some-
thing that are politically sustainable. 

Those  are  some  things  to  think  about  if  implementing  this  sort 

of program. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. So when we’re not in the monopoly environ-

ment anymore, how would you suggest we do it? The funding? 

Dr.  WALLSTEN.  Well,  I  haven’t  looked  at  the  specific  funding  of 
research  in  telecom  so  I  don’t  want  to  comment  on  that.  I  just 
think these principles are important to keep in mind and there are 
other  tools  as  well.  For  example,  antitrust  policy  has  taken  an  in-
creasingly lenient view toward research joint ventures, for example, 
starting  in  1984  with  the  National  Cooperative  Research  and  Pro-
duction  Act  and  extending,  being  looser  and  looser  until  in  2004, 
they  passed  the  Standards  Development  Organization  and  Ad-
vancement Act, which basically makes it easier for firms to cooper-
ate  on  standards  without  worry  of  being  prosecuted  for  antitrust 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

76 

violations. There are plenty of tools to use to try to help move these 
interests along. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  allowing  me 

to go on. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. Eleven years ago when we completed 
the  drafting  of  the  Telecommunications  Act  of  1996,  we  were 
amazed  with  the  broad  scope  of  communications  and  I  must  say 
that we are rather proud of ourselves. Now, Dr. Drobot, you spoke 
of  the  Internet  age.  If  my  recollection  is  correct,  the  Telecommuni-
cations Act of 1996 uses the word Internet twice. We really had no 
idea  what  it  was.  We  had  a  very  vague  idea  of  the  potential  of 
broadband. The thing that amazes me today as I look back to that 
time, we looked upon the breakup of AT&T in 1984 with the polit-
ical eye. Monopolies should be broken up but then we began to re-
alize  in  recent  years  that  with  the  breakup,  we  also  broke  up  the 
Bell  Labs,  the  one  thing  that  made  America  foremost  in  this  area 
because  they  did  research  on  a  long-term  basis.  They  did  basic  re-
search  and  today,  research  is  done  for  product  and  for  selling  and 
for the bottom line. 

Now  I’m  glad  all  of  you  are  here  to  testify  but  what  we’d  like  to 
know is, what can we do first, simply put, to make up for the lack 
of  a  Bell  Lab?  How  should  we  go  about  increasing  our  activity  in 
research? Because obviously from what we’ve heard about basic re-
search, we’re going to stay where we are. And the numbers indicate 
that  we  are  no  longer  the  way  we  were  15  years  ago  or  20  years 
ago. So what do you suggest? 

Dr.  DROBOT.  I’d  say  a  couple  of  things  on  this.  The  first  one  is, 
when you look at Bell Labs, while there were a tremendous amount 
of things that came out of it, at the heart of it, it really was driven 
by  telecommunications.  The  applications  were  in  telecommuni-
cations.  So  you  had  a  driver  that  forced  you  to  think  along  a  cer-
tain path. 

The  second  thing,  as  Dr.  Wolf  said,  is  there  was  ample  funding 
and  it  was  long  term.  I  think  it  is  very  important  and  I  have  to 
say, I don’t know any other way of doing it, but encouraging a part 
of  our  population,  starting  at  the  kindergarten  level,  to  be  partici-
pants  in  this,  to  look  forward  to  a  career,  I  would  say,  in  science 
as much as they would to a career in the arts, in law or some other 
endeavor. I don’t see many television shows that feature a scientist 
in  something  like  L.A.  Law,  where  thousands  or  millions  of  people 
think of this as their future. I think that’s important. 

You  mentioned  earlier  that  40  percent  of  the  PhDs  granted  in 
the United States are actually not U.S. citizens. I can tell you when 
I look at two fields, which are sort of fundamental for telecommuni-
cations,  electrical  engineering  and  computer  science,  we  did  a  sur-
vey of that recently and we found that at the undergraduate level, 
this  country  produces  roughly  50,000  graduates  each  year.  Ninety 
percent  plus  of  those  tend  to  be  U.S.  citizens.  At  the  Doctorate 
level,  it’s  roughly  5,000.  Of  those,  something  like  67  percent  are 
non-U.S. citizens. So I look at it from one point of view. It’s a great 
export  for  us  as  a  country.  I  look  at  it  from  another  point  of  view 
and say it is fairly sad that we cannot attract people to enter these 
exciting fields from the best and brightest in our society. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

77 

So  I  would  say  there  would  have  to  be  some  economic  incen-
tives—money  for  education  and  I  would  say  money  for  research 
that  is  plentiful,  that  drives  people  to  these  disciplines  and  funds 
them  well  so  they  have  careers  in  the  future  and  don’t  experience 
the  ups  and  downs  that  they  have  seen  over  the  last  15  or  20 
years, essentially. I think that’s important. 

I  would  say  the  next  item  is  that  in  this  kind  of  research,  you 
do have to have access to real things. The partnership with indus-
try has to be deep. Again, as Dr. Wolf said and I’ve heard this from 
a  lot  of  my  academic  colleagues,  they  say,  we  don’t  know  who  to 
interact with in industry. 

There  isn’t  a  place  to  go  in  the  summer  where  you  spend  time 
with  the  telephone  company  and  get  to  see  the  nitty  gritty  of 
what’s  actually  going  on.  This  is  where  you  contribute  your  ideas. 
Again,  who  funds  it?  What  is  the  mechanism?  It’s  hard  for  me  to 
tell.  But  I  find  at  a  corporate  level,  it’s  very  hard  when  you  are 
under  pressure  from  Wall  Street  for  the  next  quarter  for  the  bot-
tom  line  to  actually  supply  those  funds.  This  is  where  the  public/ 
private partnership makes a tremendous difference, essentially. 

I  would  say  last,  when  I  look  at  things  like  USAC,  I  can  think 
of  some  small  portion  of  it  saying  this  is  what  we  do  to  renew  the 
future, essentially. I think all of those are things that should be ex-
amined.  I  don’t  a  see  monolithic  solution.  I  think  there  has  to  be 
some  experimentation  that  is  done.  But  having  places  that  have 
the  critical  mass,  that  are  focused  on  a  problem,  I  think  are  much 
more likely to see the results. Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Dr. Wolf? 
Dr.  WOLF.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  In  answer  to  the  question 
of  what  should  be  done;  our  Committee  did  make  a  recommenda-
tion about an ATRA program. 

Let  me  give  you  numbers  as  to  what  other  countries  are  doing 
now.  The  European  Union’s  Sixth  Framework  program  funds  tele-
communications  at  about  $300  million  a  year,  U.S.  Japan’s  Na-
tional  Institute  of  Information  and  Communications  Technology 
has  an  almost  entirely  government  funded  budget  over  $500  mil-
lion  a  year.  I  believe  the  government  has  to  step  in  at  this  point, 
if  something  is  going  to  be  done.  The  only  research  that  is  being 
conducted now in telecommunications, outside of the universities is 
very,  very  short  timeframe  research  and  it’s  being  done  mainly  by 
the  equipment  manufacturers.  To  the  best  of  my  knowledge,  the 
service providers aren’t doing any research at all. 

As  far  as  university  research  in  telecommunications,  as  I  said, 
the  money  has  come  in  the  past  from  NSF  and  DARPA.  NSF  has 
a Directorate of Computers and Information Science and Engineer-
ing (CISE) and it has a reasonable budget. 

But the amount of research that is being funded in telecommuni-
cations  is  a  very  small  percentage  of  the  budget  of  that  division. 
If  you  look  at  the  number  of  proposals  that  are  being  funded  by 
NSF,  in  telecommunications  the  success  rate  is  very  low.  That 
means that the vast majority of the proposals are not being funded. 
There  may  be  some  poor  ones  but  I  can’t  believe  it  is  anywhere 
near the number of rejected proposals. 

If  the  U.S.  Government  does  not  pick  up  the  slack  I  don’t  know 

who else will. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

78 

Dr. WALLSTEN. That’s not my particular area of expertise. I’ll try 
not  to  say  too  much.  But  I  guess  I  would  want  to  know  then  what 
the  right  share  of  PhDs  should  go  to  Americans  if  we  think  that 
the  current  number  is  too  low.  I  just  don’t  know.  I  mean,  as  Dr. 
Drobot  said,  it’s  good  that  people  come  here  and  get  PhDs.  I  don’t 
know what the right number is. The fact that other countries have 
government  funding  of  a  particular  kind  of  research,  again  by 
itself,  doesn’t  say  that  we  should.  We  should  look  at  the  effective-
ness of their programs and I know that there are big debates about 
the  effectiveness  of  government  funded  research  aimed  at  markets 
because  it  is  so  hard  to  figure  out  what  exactly  it  is  you  want  to 
measure.  That’s  true  of  our  Small  Business  Integration  Research 
Program,  the  Advanced  Technology  Program,  several  similar  pro-
grams  around  the  world  and  it  still  remains  controversial.  I’m  not 
going to speak to whether or not we need something like that here 
but  we  should  consider  carefully  the  evidence  around  the  world  to 
the effectiveness of their programs. That’s all I would say. 

Dr. DROBOT. Senator Inouye, let me just add one item. We actu-
ally  polled  the  CTOs  of  our  organizations  and  the  TIA  last  year 
produced  a  White  Paper  that  did  two  things.  A,  it  pointed  out  the 
areas in which investment should be made. It pointed out the insti-
tutions that are most likely to handle these programs and they in-
cluded,  in  fact,  DARPA  and  DOD,  NSF,  National  Institute  of 
Standards  and  DOE  as  the  organizations  that  have  the  infrastruc-
ture to conduct the research. 

Then  we  also  put  in  a  section  that  looked  at  how  this  should  be 
governed  and  the  belief  that  you  should  put  together  some  kind  of 
a  national  board  that  has  representation  from  industry,  academia, 
and in fact, the Federal Government but focused on this particular 
problem. 

I would say there is one element that is probably worthwhile sort 
of  picking  up  on.  You  mentioned  that  in  the  Telecommunications 
Act  the  Internet  was  mentioned  twice.  A  lot  of  what  it  was  about 
wasn’t  anticipated.  Look  at  technology  and  sort  of  the  underlying 
goods  from  which  we  build  the  Internet  and  from  which  we  build 
telecommunications. I’d put computing in there, storage of informa-
tion, the interfaces that we use, the software that binds everything 
together and the ability to transmit stuff at various speeds, wheth-
er  it’s  wireless,  whether  it’s  over  fiber.  All  of  those  technologies 
amazingly  are  on  exponential  curves  today.  They  follow  a  Moore’s 
Law. They double every one to two years in terms of what you can 
expect.  As  far  as  we  see  technically,  this  will  be  true  for  the  next 
10 to 15 years. The roadmaps are there. 

I think what is not appreciated is that as the cost of goods come 
down,  the  kind  of  services  you  can  provide  are  also  likely  to  grow 
exponentially,  if  there  are  no  barriers  to  the  deployment  of  those 
services.  In  economic  terms,  what’s  happening  is  that  the  trans-
action costs for the services have come down very significantly and 
will  continue  to  do  so.  So  you  can  anticipate  even  more  than  the 
Internet as the next round. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  wish  I  could  continue  this  discussion  for  a 
while longer but I’ve just been notified there is a vote pending. You 
should  realize  that  we  politicians  are  usually  much  more  sensitive 
to people’s needs. For example, in this area, under the guidance of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

79 

Senator Stevens, we developed the Universal Service Fund to take 
care  of  the  folks  in  the  rural  areas,  in  the  millions.  But  we  have 
done very little in the other areas where we don’t have much pres-
sure  or  activity  like  research.  It  has  to  emanate  from  the  govern-
ment itself, like the Defense Department saying, we need more re-
search money. 

Senator  Stevens  and  I  are  convinced  that  we  have  to  do  some-
thing  about  this  because  if  we  do  business  as  we’ve  been  doing  it 
for the past few years, we’re not going to get anywhere. So if I may, 
will you share with me your ideas of what can be done to fund re-
search?  Should  it  be  something  with  a  new  agency  or  should  it  be 
a  group  with  a  board  or  should  we  just  go  through  the  process  of 
providing  monies  to  DARPA  and  providing  monies  to  DOE  and 
such? 

Dr.  DROBOT.  My  own  feeling  is,  I  think  you  should  have  some-
thing  like  a  board  that  focuses  on  this  area  and  spend  as  little  of 
that  money  building  yet  another  bureaucracy  and  another  infra-
structure. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  So  can  you  share  those  thoughts  with  us?  We’ll 

be submitting questions for the record. 

And with that, the hearing stands adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 12:24 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:32 Feb 13, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\78804.TXT JACKIE

